(at 11:15,noon,Oak Lab)

Ash(smile) : " Oh! Hellow!Nice to see you here! How was
the Lunch?"
Misty(straight) : " Fine!Had a good lunch!"
Ash(smile) : "How's the Health?"
Misty(straight) : "Alright!Good Enough!"
Ash(straight) : "Great news!well first i'm sorry asking you to come here after lunch within 11:30 and also second that i couldn't be here yesterday,suddenly had a few ungencies and those may return as well thus today found time and this discussion i think will serve it’s purpose quickly thus relieveing both hence this early appointment and if this gets prolonged for that exact reason why it couldn’t be yesterday and your situation is similar as well no matter what you told the Elite4 then if lunch is already taken the physical difficulties won’t arise as this thought occured to me thus my endeavours but sorry again if this disturbs you."
Misty(straight) : "It's Alright,I'm on holiday known only to Simon but i also don’t have much interest in prolonged discussions so yeah i agree."
Ash(straight) : "I see,alright come along then,there's a sit and the place is perfect for discussion"
Misty(straight) : "Right, Let's Go."
....
Ash(straight) : "So i guess you've gone through whatever i told you at least partially.I'm sorry first to do what i did in front of public but i do defend that cause that was asked of me to try to get your moods right by Kanto Elite4 given my name and only because of the uniqueness of my style and your recent troubles which i guess by know is in your knowledge as to who asked me of this but i’m very sorry that on that very night i did turn up like
that and i don’t defend this but unless i did,it would've been difficult even now to have a proper appointment."
Misty(solemn) : "No i don't mind anymore much about those either.infact you must've heard."
Ash(straight) : "Ya certainly have."
Misty(frown) : "so i should thank you"
Ash(straight) : "well most of all,your friends and family are relieved so it is not an issue."
Misty(frown) : "Only that?"
Ash(solemn) : "Yes,ONLY that"
Misty(frown) : "I thought you wanted to hear more and thus your PRIVATE APPOINTMENT"
Ash(straight) : "Certainly,but it's not that there's any urgency or rush or.."
Misty(frown) : "Necessity"
Ash(straight) : "Um..well the only necessity i have is to
know as there’s no wedding took place recently so only one way is there to confirm which i want is that whether there’s a happy relationship or marriage proposal etc are there or not,which i must know only now,nothing else"
Misty(frown) : "what if i myself confirm you that there is?"
Ash(straight) : "already?"
Misty(frown) : "what if yes?"
Ash(straight) : "well,that is no clarification is it?"
Misty(laugh) : "why are you so desperate to know whether i've a boyfriend or not?"
Ash(straight) : "cause you've had one and that who is unfortunately me and that break-up isn't cleared?"
Misty(solemn) : "i thought that was enough,its not a legal
document like a divorce."
Ash(straight) : "Quite so,but if there's lack of clarity it's
inevitable that ramifications will happen which may not
be exactly welcomed later in future"
Misty(solemn) : "i was clear from my part and i got you
clearly then,unless you had given me that note the other day"
Ash(straight) : "well i wasn't clear about the clarification you gave nor that i was clarified that you've got mine
clarified as i was made aware of your recent activities and
thus my endeavours as you know and i suspect given your endeavours it’s about your relationship status."
Misty(frown) : "and they told you that it's because of you?"
Ash(straight) : “because of your boyfriend”
Misty(scowl) : “what do you mean?”
Ash(straight) : “it only means a break-up is haunting you and hence my question on your relationship status”
Misty(laugh) : “and because you were subject to a breakup involving me,you think that indeed is the one that’s haunting me and even more so you do absolutely believe that it has to be a realtionship issue and can’t be anything else?”
Ash(straight) : “among your doubts,the second i know as a NO cause no Hall of Fame gym leader wants to shield herself yet not resign and yet keeps the gym going and i being the eye witness of her gym recently and myself being a 6 league 7 Elite4 champion certainly can say her pokemons and gym is not the reason for a trouble that she is being accused of  and then by virtue of my professional association with this very lab for a long time i know her two sisters are office bearers here at the highest management level and are happily married to the two junior directors and the third sister too cause me being in my position has to keep in touch with certain gyms and Pewter City,Kanto,Rock Gym is one of them,whoose current Gym leader Mr Foster Slate is the brother-in-law of her and thus atleast she’s not divorced and she being who she is in her profession at present,which also i come to know cause she’s an international star and her relationship status though isn’t known much in public yet she happens to be a shareholder in the leader’s position at Cerulian City,Kanto,Water Gym,and hence it’s a matter of pride to her brother-in-law and thus i know about it and so due to aforementioned reasons,it’s not possible that someone like her would create such a trouble to someone who’s not in her profession anymore and herself a Hall of Fame gym leader so thus your second doubt is clarified and the first you realize is why this appointment is all about,thank you for your patience.
Misty(grave) : “it’s not about you Mr Ash Ketchum,Pokemon Master,Hall of Fame but about someone else,i’m sure you realize the break up your’re talking about took place 5 long years ago and in the meantime there has been other realtionships that didn’t involve you and thus that break-up is not the alleged reason behind the alleged activities of the Gym Leader of Cerulian City,Kanto,Water Gym.So,it’s not about you and no about your relationship status it’s about someone else who isn’t you and thus you need neither to know about the specifications of the status of my relationship and hence whether or not you are clear about you break-up clarification is not my problem or responsibility because i’m more than cleared about myself and i already have someone else and to say exactly this is why i’m here now because i have long moved on from that moment and chapter of my life and you’re only intruding,which i hope doesn’t happen in future.thank you for your patience and good bye.”(goes away)
Ash(straight) : “Ms Waterflower,just a moment,could you’ve said this VIA other channels?”
Misty(turns towards Ash,scowl) : “what do you mean?”
Ash(straight) : “Ms Waterflower,you wouldn’t have come here today unless the first break-up still bugged you MOST,you wouldn’t have not complained a certain break-in to the other Elite4 Gym Hall of Fame Sections atleast if Kanto wasn’t listening and most importantly you would never have called the house of a certain Mr Ash Ketchum because his whereabouts can be known VIA other channels as you having professional and personal relationship in this very Lab and given your professional position,you certainly didn’t need to call his house and could’ve yourself held a bergain against this appointment even going to the press and doing every single possible thing but you just ran up here forgeting every single thing except that you were given a note by your ONCE former boyfriend.Ms Waterflower,my doubts are NOT CLEARED.”
Misty(scowl,shivering in anger) : “Ash,what are you..”
Ash(straight) : “Mr Ketchum,’MAM.please it’s pretty impolite to me if not more that some would take chances on their previous personal relations with me DESPITE not hvaing them anymore for a long time no matter what a certain note may say or be inferred from,as that note wasn’t a report on a formal meeting.But this is a formal appointment Ms Waterflower nothing else.”
Misty(shivering in anger) : “you want to talk about a break-up in a formal manner with your ONCE former girlfriend who was involved in that?”
Ash(straight) : “i don’t see a trouble in that cause i don’t see a trouble in surnames being used in place of names when it’s needed.”
Misty(scowl) : “so your doubt is that i rejected you because of reasons of which i myself am not clear enough?”
Ash(straight) : "the central reason was that i was promiscuous and everyone being privy of our relationship was clear about that EXCEPT you as it seems and hence this appointment to establish your faith in my promscuity or the lack of it and that is all cause i certainly am clear about my side but not yours and thus my endeavours”
Misty(scowl) : "did you know who i was?"
Ash(straight) : "Perfectly,Cerulian City Gym leader the
hardest place in Kanto among water pokemon
gyms,may be in the whole world..
Misty(frown) : "enough"
Ash(solemn) : "Youngest Sensational Sister,incredible
physical beauty,stupendous water show performer,ashtonishingly.."
Misty(scowl) : "that's enough"
Ash(solemn) :"please be patient,i'm only saying the things why both you and me had a beeline of fans...please bear with me...ashtonishingly good with any kind of water
pokemons,ever present mermaid-queen of the show who was so heavenly georgeous physically that a phrase ‘young flower dream’ is still so common and finally and mostly the once ever Gym Leader whoose grace was unmatched,plus the ever heartening.."
Misty(extremely angry) : "Ash! your saying this as
you think i melted at these and gave in to whoever courted me?"
Ash(solemn) : "no neither insinuation nor complimentary
are these,i'm stating facts,please hold it,ever
heartening generosity,world moving exuberance as whole personality,all
in all such virtue,grace,skill and physical beauty-rather
once only.Yes, I DO know who YOU were."
Misty(frown) : "Did you see anything or heard anything
like I did about the womanising playboy from a
little town in Kanto that turned heads at
everywhere he went with both his charishma and skills?"
Ash(straight) : "only the manising playgirl part,NO."
Misty(scowl,shivering in anger) : "did i pose for the papers half naked to get 100 guys everyday like you did in magazines which was for the people to SEE for themselves and just not alleged rumours?"
Ash(straight) : "No."
Misty(scowl) : "that was my point exactly."
Ash(laugh) : "so i was looking for this greatest wave of most greatest women to fall at my feet by posing six times in tea-shirts ?"
Misty(frown,scowl) : "so i also was dating guys to see as you said,physical beatuty like flesh and blood and so on?"
Ash(straight) : "you see Ms Waterflower,dating to see and posing to expect are not the same."
Misty(very angry,shivering) : "you...you b.. so..so i was the one who was promiscuous wasn’t i..i wasn’t posing but i went ahead..i was advance..i was dating any random guy behind your back and feigned innocence..THAT IS YOUR TROUBLE ISN’T IT...you b.. you...(chokes in anger) "
Ash(straight) : “Ms Waterflower,i’m only reciprocrating your conveyed sentiments as they are APPEARING to me,so please be specific in conveying the MEANING that you want to so that i get the right sentiments that you wish to convey to me,which you won’t be able to UNLESS you’re calm enough.”
Misty(shivering in anger) : “YOU B..you...”
Ash(straight) : “Ms Waterflower,you’re emotions are hindering your cognition,cogitation and thus finally your communication and hence please be calm.
Misty(still angry) : “Ash you..you yourself has humiliated me in public on this issue..you..”
Ash(straight) : "that’s the point.if i ask you for a date now would you go?"
Misty(frown,scowl) : "No."
Ash(solemn) : "and why is that?"
Misty(scowl) : "you're a stranger."
Ash(straight) : "so you date known people then? you.."
Misty(scowl,frown) : "what do you mean? i.."
Ash(straight) : "would date Cilan if he asked."
Misty(angry,shout) : "You bus.."
Ash(straight) : "save that.just give me the answer.what if a friend of your friend asked this on a casual day and he did it as in just a hangout?"
Misty(scowl) : "he would've said "would you go for a
date?"
Ash(straight) : "that is the general custom in Kalos and on that special occasion among my friends age group 25-26 on that particular city on that day it would certainly be a custom won’t it?"
Misty(angry) : "like people would ask you may we dance?"
Ash(solemn) : "exactly right,and as it was a date the time passes in professional discussion"
Misty(angry) : "so dating and dancing are same to you?"
Ash(solemn) : "Ms Waterflower please just one moment listen then i’m going to answer your question,YOU HAVE NEVER STEPPED A FOOT ON KALOS and YOU HAVE ABSOLUTELY NO CLUE WHATSOEVER ON WHAT IS THE GENERAL CULTURE IN KALOS NOT ONLY IN OUR PROFESSION BUT AS A WHOLE...so please bear it in mind and so for your answer,well it depends on places AND PERSONS"
Misty(angry,deep breath) : “Ash,i’ve been hearing these almost everyday for the last 14 years now,’would you go for a date’,’would you like to dance’,’would you like to have a chat’..i know the differences way better than you’d ever know,so please don’t tell me that i was dating all i wanted and you who never realized these weren’t when things spun your head first and Ash,i perfectly remember all our conversations.i know what you were saying and doing very well and for that i don’t need to go to Kalos at all or hear anything about the general culture existing there.don’t try this trick with me”
Ash(solemn) : “see Ms Waterflower,i’ve never been a gym leader but i’ve been to 1250 gyms as a challenger in my career across the whole world including 295 during my Elite4 joureys out of which atleast the last 295 hall of fame ones during Elite4 has been laughed off but others too i certainly deserve to get the badges certainly during my regional journeys in the 683 hall of fame gyms across Sinnoh,Unova and Kalos but unfortunately i didn’t deserve to win my very first 2 badges Pewter and Cerulian.I also do remember certain phonecalls and all but see,my career has come to an end 4 years ago on the day Team Rocket was busted completely and the rest is just due to my own wish like these 230 hall of fame gyms with 72 competitions in Kalos as i was offered Hall of Fame instantly after that but desisted cause Kalos was left.But Ms Waterflower,your career will go on for 30 years more...let me tell you something,nobody told you to portray a character that you’re not for the sake of appeasing THE MASS.”
Misty(extremely angry) : “you b.. what are you trying to imply?huh?..you..you think..ASH!...(chokes in anger)”
Ash(solemn) : “i know only too well your real nature Ms MISTY Waterflower,as good as you yourself know,get rid of this mask of wisdom off from your face”
Misty(frown) : “your jealousy of my success hasn’t ever left you no matter what you did yourself and that’s the problem isn’t it Ash Ketchum?you still haven’t come into terms with youself that how can your little travel companion surpass you after leaving you while when with you she was nothing...that’s been your trouble isn’t it Ash?”
Ash(straight) : “young flower dream had a Gyarados”
Misty(shivering) : “that moment hasn’t left you then despite being a hall of famer,conquering a Gyarados multiple times in multiple places,and all these 13 years and so...(shivering and tears)..you came back to gym battle me for that reason exactly..you can’t get over how can i get better than you..Ash you...(scream,shock)..YOU P...you’ve..you had only ever been with me because you...you...(bursts into tears)...Ash,how can...(completely breaks down)...never even kissed me except just so few times despite being my boyfriend so that i feel the pain forever and then left me....(profusely crying,scream)..NEVER CHERISHED ME..ALL FAKE..ASH...(almost chokes,crying)..i yearned for you from the very first sight,i waited for your return day after day despite all that torture and you..all because..just...(scream)..YOU WANTED REVENGE..this all because you...(Ash hugs Misty quickly,Misty uncontrollably cries and almost faints but pokemons cure her up)...”
(10 minutes later,1:50)
Ash(frown) : “and you were saying i’ve a boyfriend i confirm?..Misty,get out of your infatuation for me,you’ve had 4 years to find a boyfriend without any hindrence what so ever and you know best you wouldn’t have seen this day had you done so,what’s your trouble really...get my thoughts off...”
Misty(lying on grass sobbing and crying uncontrollably) : “19 years,(scream)YOU’VE CHEATED ON ME FOR 19 YEARS...you..(totally breaks down)...”
Ash(solemn) : “14 and this is your real self Misty,without the wisdom mask...am i wrong Misty?..”
Misty(scream,crying) : “Ash..you...(chokes with tears and 
Ash(very grave) : “...Sableye..no words,no movements,only cogitates,you’ll know when to let off..ORDER...Bulbasaur ATTENTION....Misty you returned my Glalie after i left for Unova a few months later for some reason and at the lab and then after or before you saw a Tyranitar there my Tyranitar from an egg to Larvitar you know most well cause it was in Johto and do you believe that my Tyranitar after 7 years is still at that same level stagnant?Misty,do you really believe that i was is or will be ever jealous of anyone in this world past present or future seeing yourself first hand what i did in my 3rd ever gym battle with Pikachu and what he did-i wanted to quit,then i wanted to get Pikachu evolved forcing a thunderstone he said no on both accounts-WHY?Misty,do you really believe at this moment i’m jealous of anyone seeing first hand what my bunch does to absolutely anyone and everyone and in what fashion they do so?and finally Misty,do you really believe i was jealous of anyone that’s why i went undercover to invite death anytime upon me?Misty,you’re a Hall of Fame gym leader,but i never have or will care a fig about who the leader is or who my opponent is,i don’t care about it,i’m here because of my love for pokemons,i’ve ever wanted to enjoy and battle for fun not for responsibility or glory,i’ve never cared about anyone who was in my opposition both human and pokemon i never wanted to beat them to achieve something it was just fun and try to the best which Misty,i knew since my first league trophy in Orange when i saw you may remember all those past champions data and asked where they are now and all..since that day i know nothing has any meaning at all but to me this was an intuition and later clarified that none would remember me 10 years later from now or if i die just 10 minutes later,what’s the point of life even then if you have to leave absolutely everything?..NOTHING IS THE ANSWER and then for my Pokemon Master tag,i’ve got it the moment that thunder-chair happened all 6 years back,but i’ve no reason to believe why i can’t evaporate your whole gym if i so wish at my current level at one moment but i also find no reason to believe why i can’t play around exactly there with Goldy being Goldy and can’t enjoy myself not caring about anything including responsibility..Misty,my bunch made friends with the greatest boss from team rocket who also made friends with them finally,a man who has managed a darkened-Mewtwo for 6 years and later a statertic-Arceus along with it for 2,what do you have to offer to me,what do you have Misty to offer to me more than this professionally? The answer is NOTHING...But again i’m no gym leader so lets leave it for good but Misty,you’re an once ever enigma,but only in the wrold filled with deceit where people think that pokemons are their slaves or atmost friends and they the masters or atmost friends,but Misty i’ve seen another world during undercover where this fake life makes no sense cause you don’t live in sanity anymore but with people who are just waiting for the next moment to kill you and your bunch...strophomorus-hypoptic-nitrospef-mondov-GLAZED-Dispoptas..have you ever heard of this name?do you know
what this means? Well,Dispoptas is a legendary and all that prefixes are not type specifications but DEATH cause that’s their highest evoluted and highest swellened up form,this pokemon is a fire major but eqully adpet at all spaces earth,water and sky and fire is the only known major but none knows what this pokemon actually is,and this pokemon is the 2nd strongest among roft-watered-gizmaed-josternof-klun-vesmeric-fire types again a legendary type classification,that is this fire is a psychohomic-thormbopsis-nikluten-urentic-Pshychic which means that your Gyarados at her absolute best will stand may be about may be a milisecond in front of this and your whole gym combined including your Goldy may be half a second ALL COMBINED at their self destruction ultimatum in their highest evoluted and swellened up form.so you realize what i’m talking about and this death will charge at you in it’s full lunacy and it will be suppilmented by other more ferosious legends in a illegal thus ferocious fire gym on an island like Cinnabar and far worse than that and these guys will not let you off in water or sky or underwater or may be even space if that’s plausible,even if you flee and you’ll have to face this death with may be one pokemon calmly when thier master is even more lunatic than all them combined and would try to kill you physically via himself or his lackies human or pokemon at the same time.Misty,i’ve faced a Hi-Ho which isn’t public yet but will be in about a week which was swellend up and evoluted and 50 of that form is nothing to this Dispoptas i’ve talked about and you never know what that Hi-Ho could do whom i befriended with Muk and then let go..yes befriended but not in the sense we generally know as being beside each other through thick and thin but it means he has absolutely the same relation to me as does Muk and to Muk what i’m,is the same in case of him,this is way above friendship cause i and Muk will not leave him at all no matter the condition..he’s not not human so he won’t understand our interpretation and worldview but this idea we tried to convey to him.Muk told him we’re just playing as you do when with your specis but your master isn’t and disturbing the play,there’s no point in battling cause you don’t do it when you’re among your specis being directed by any master and not when the other is only trying to play and you see for yourself we’re the same and that Hi-Ho realized it and all that later they let him off after 2 days may be and i’m sure i don’t need to elaborate to you what Hi-Ho is what one such can do...that’s undercover life and this is way after undercover...Misty you have absolutely no idea of the life i lived in this 4 years that you haven’t had any contacts with me and even before that 1 years and a few months with very little contact...this life isn’t fake and this life no fake mask or person leading a fake life can stand for one single minute atleast i know this much and so please don’t give me lessons from your 14 year long fake life cause the life i lived undercover for 6/7 months Misty,your mask of wisdom or the lack of it is just trifle there cause you’ll be dating there all the time the difference is it’ll be death at the opposite table on your date each time nonstop during the most peacefull sleeps you’ll ever have...this death Misty isn’t of a martyr,this comes with a tag that some team rocket members died only known to themselves till they burn our bodies off 2 hours later...no value,nothing but if i’m jealous,surely i’ll to go through that just because i don’t have any family responsibility just for the sake of it knowing death is evident atleast lets try to do what feels good and fun..yeah (spell) F_U_N..or jealousy according to your wisdom mask..and nobody coerced me to live that life.i’ve known what i’ve known from there,fake lives don’t entice me anymore Misty,the one you’re living for the last 14 years to appease THE MASS for their retadness and abject ineptitude in every part of life imaginable.anyhow,still if you want, you can show me that i was jealous of you so just after break-up i broke my hug with you and yeah your wish of 24 time kisses in 24 hours and went straight to hug death itself and kiss it every moment in 24 hours and became dead to the known world except for 2 persons in Sinnoh Elite4 outside of my undercover environment,and now to come into gross terms i’m sure if i so wanted i would’ve in Orange itself way before your fake mask got you the fake Gyarados,via my other Pokemons i could’ve got 100 REAL Gyaradoses cause 1.you didn’t catch yours or befriended her from wild,she just evolved and wasn’t happy with her treatment as your sisters abruptely left.
and 2. as you said i’ve myself defeated a few and if i so wanted i could’ve asked you for a change when i gave you Glalie just after my 119th badge in Sinnoh when you know who I was, knowing fully well she was then only inferior to your Goldy who won’t stand 2 seconds now against Glalie in PHYSHIC abilities ALONE and also for your kind information,and you couldn’t use Glalie till you got to the special gym category but by then you returned her so she was there with you for 1 year or 2 and in inferior state to my lab in terms of other pokemons surrounding her by the time she spent an year with you NOT battling was equal to Goldy when you returned her she could smoke off 2 such Goldys and now 200 IF she attacks if not 20000 won’t do a thing and that’s may be whole Johto-Kanto-Orange gym Golducks.Misty,hall of fame or not,your water pokemons certainly didn’t befriend team rocket but MY water pokemons on ground surface against electric psudeo-legend dragons and ground types like Zerkom,Garchomp and Solgaleo all of whom i myself have i know more than anyone in last millenia what they are and those were all swellened up illegally evoluted and all at a time coming at them with outside interferences DID and that’s for your information also if your fake mask ever told you you’re the BOSS and they’re mere servants,besides how many times have you managed 35 at a time against 45 in a life or death situation as total type disadvantages against all psudeo-legends swelled up to absolute maxima with all sorts of illegal things and interferences involved?-the answer in NEVER,but for me the answer is in similar conditions EACH DAY for 4 LONG MONTHS,Misty,Team Rocket had 2000 pokemons when i went they had 1898 and had 60 battlers to our 2 later 5 so you can realize...and what i did when i saw that particular Gyarados in that particular moment at Hoenn with YOU,MISTY,was because i was infatuated with you and i’ll still apologize for that but nobody coerced you to come to my home and stay for one month only to congratulate me after the end of that very same travel so keep in mind the infatuation wasn’t one way especially given i’ve never stepped a foot in or outside Cerulian gym with a fake purpose that you had the other way around and then yes when i did go there after those 30/35 to make a mistake of my life to confess my infatuation for you was also ONLY after asking you and then going which you DIDN’T and the only reason YOU allowed me was because NOT of my infatuation but YOUR infatuation with me...and yes then we confessed and did kiss but THAT too was started by you and if you remember I was the one telling you to NOT do it in a public place,so I never started it but YOU did and the reason for not kissing you in public is because i didn’t want to make you a subject of joke,jealousy,fantasy or infatuation and humiliation to the staffs there with whom you would’ve had to spend the rest of your life may be.that too for jealousy.i kissed you once forcefully without your will during our break up on the last moments after that day had one more quarrel and that was it this was the penultimate day let me remind it to you cause i was and am jealous of you.you were upset cause a b.. pulled a stunt on me and then i didn’t call you back and kissed the screen off as YOU so many times did or wanted to do if you discretely didn’t i never reciprocated to you in this matter except the final days in Sinnoh when both we know what we were wanting then and why did that happen i after the very first day realized that it can’t be done over screen so we’ll see when time comes and by the time of the break i discretely told you it’s not the time yet cause of many things and i needed to be in Unova that too for your jealousy.then i returned and may be yeah you thought i couldn’t control myself then and thus the trouble but YOU what were YOU doing is the question i didn’t ask then ever cause Misty wasn’t a subject of body and mind to me as i told you in that note and yeah this too is cause i was jealous of you.then i returned and i thought that may be i should do it forcefully cause then you may budge to atleast listen to me and why i wasn’t calling you i told you as much as i could on the final day that was i for once thought if i had budged in that accident even mentally means i’ve lost my Misty there that too for your jealousy.then i thought so now Misty isn’t listening may i force her to atleast do so cause i felt so bad staying away from her but yeah to only dump next day right but anyway i did and i was called a b.. and so on though but yeah i still kissed you in your room in full privacy so that even your voice doesn’t go in public and that’s why i forced myself there mouthing off your sisters saying Misty hasn’t yet dumped me no matter what they may think and i’m not a b.. no matter what they think and my adress and profession they know too well to launch a complaint which again is for your jealousy then i forced you in and said like this an accident happend and even told you by implying that i’m sorry and i was sorry if you think i was acting only or jealousy yeah but then the final day i was sorry and i discretely said that that was for your jealousy as well but that really was it so(laugh) Misty who was cheating on whom(laugh) who was jealous of whom..so you can understand that jealousy can be double edeged as well.may be YOU were jealous of me that’s why waited for 2 years to be kissed JUST a few times ONLY despite having umpteenth chances to be kissed by umpteenth and another person among KNOWN persons PER DAY cause YOU knew of my skills the best cause you saw it day and night constantly for the first 4 years and did know what it was about.But now Misty i give you another if you’re fake mask can figure it out and tell your fake life how to fakely digest it then this one remember-Misty,i was on scholership on my very first journey on my very first day which is what you also know of so yes at that very moment i couldn’t have repayed you bike but needed a bit of time and you know another similar case happened and yes i did want to reimbursh her bike immediately but she still wanted to travel along with me and did and yes,she wasn’t faking her reason atleast was very clear about it UNLIKE you who now i realize should’ve been thrown that money at her face that very day very moment may be and got totally rid of ALSO to save 19 LONG YEARS...Misty,jealousy is way later,i wasn’t infatuated with you since the first sight UNLIKE you,i allowed you just as a friend and i hope you remember that as well because i said please lets go to Pewter i’ll pay you back in the meantime we became friends rather and still you were the one not to leave me after visiting Cerulian,where also you did talk about the reimbrushment but it was a joke between us then which of course was my greatest legendary mistake cause i got jealous of you and i never told you to come along like i never have except one and that was because of family relations and certain circumstances but mostly because that was my very last regional journey but yeah i got cheated on my trust as well due to my trust there but that’s a different issue.Misty,i could’ve got rid of you while I was at Pewter,but for some reason didn’t but if you go in this line you know well the conclusion is that we shouldn’t have been even born so totally useless is this line of yours that your fake wisdom mask is impelling you getting into but yeah i recalled that i have a debt to you so here’s the money for your bike(throws a slip)...yes the acknowledgement for the reimbrusment from your VERY OWN hall of shame Cerulian City Gym,same day i broke-in as they obviously know all about it and gladly received it,never told you about it cause they of course need the money which was manifolded up by me cause in the current plight of certain cases againt the gym due to the fake Gym-Leader-in-charge Misty Waterflower who can’t differentiate between real and fake life and my donation there was just due to that reimbrushment as i thought i couldn’t pay then now i can and this Gym isn’t good and i’m in Hall of Fame no matter whether i accept it or not,it’s my duty just as it was in Pewter and Viridian being close to my hometown and the first 3 gyms.
Misty,after today we won’t see each other ever again in this life unless utmost misfortune would have it,though if your fake mask is removed, today will be a bit longer cause i was just getting started when your ego couldn’t take it anymore,so still to tell you one thing that Misty,this fake life of yours and to counter that this fake mask of wisdom of yours,give both up if you want to be happy ever again in this body.that’s all...Sableye off...”
(few minutes later,2:04)
Misty(sitting on the grass,tears rolling down her cheeks,sobbing a bit) : “Ash,i wanted to reconcile but you were never there because of undercover then i just wasn’t sure that’s all and you never cared either cause you might’ve found someone by then..but no Ash,i never had any boyfriends since my break-up,you’ve been my only broyfriend ever and then we broke-up that’s all..i haven’t had anyone since...your girlfriend..(profuse tears,sobbing,trying to stop and wiping off tears)..your girlfriend also a trainer like you Ash,from any Elite4 or somewhere else?..given your name now and all that...during undercover...(standing up)..but let it go it makes so sense and why am i even asking you(Standing)..but,no Ash,i’m so sorry if i ever called you jealous,i have seen you since day 1,i’m sorry i ever screamed at you on this..and i’m sorry i talked about revenge..um..i’m so sorry Ash..you repayed..(profuse tears)..um..it’s alright..um..i did follow you,you never cared..and no um..i was indeed the one to hang around you for 15 years i’m sorry Ash i ever said those..i just lost my mind...i can’t take mental pressure much now a days and thus the gym..i’m not..um..and no Ash,i’m very sorry that i ever could think about that word..(Sits on bench)..you never did that and broke-up just left..no you never interfered so that i couldn’t date other people and so on...and you were very supportive while we were together..Ash..you..you were a very good boyfriend when you were,you..(tears rolling down profusely)..um..never..and..um..your girlfrined is very lucky to have you(crying silently,profuse tears)..really..um..and..that’s..that’s why..is this..is this why...but..”
Ash(grave) : “this is about your mask of wisdom and my jealousy of you,well i won only 1 out of 3 with you Misty didn’t i?you were nothing when you were with me weren’t you? all rest all won but without you,all the glory without me,so yeah as we agreed that day on break-up that sure we’ve helped each other by staying away from each other and it’s absolutely right,don’t you agree?”
Misty(tears,shivering voice) : “um..you came back only to confirm this again right because after the break-up our professional life has got to it’s pinnacle so you wanted so say that we truely were right that day,isn’t it?..that we’ve actually been happier being apart(profusly crying but trying to wipe her tears)..um..no i get you Ash....but(sobbing and profuse tears)..i’m...um..it’s for your girlfriend isn’t it that you really want to...cut..cut..(chokes and sits down in grass again,silently crying profuse tears)..”
Ash(grave) : “this language will and now wants to cut your veil of wisdom,Misty,who told you not to play around inside the gym and suddenly to become a all-gracious gym leader there,Gyarados certainly didn’t,a Mr Skechit certainly didn’t,your sisters never cared except whether the gym was up and running or not,your Goldy still isn’t happy about it after 13 years nor is Jellicent and Starmie-your starter,who was it Misty,who told you that you have to suddenly put up a mask,who?”
Misty(shivering voice,tears) : “i don’t know Ash,we parted and i..i just didn’t know what to do cause so many...”
Ash(laugh) : “sweetie sweetie boys were courting me so i had to be a matured s...(bursts into laughter)..”
Misty(shocked,tears,scream) : “Ash!,what are you..”
Ash(solemn) : “i’m saying that you put up this mask of WISDOM for a reason and that had to do with dating and dancing and of course much later Cilan.”
Misty(crying) : "(scream) Ash!..you..(angry,tries to wipe off tears)so i acted like a responsible gym leader so that they could court me more and then i would let anyone jump on
me..and..and you're suggesting your own friend’s
name..(cry) Ash you've stooped so low...(bursts into tears,scream)..ASH!..you..(crying profusely)..”
Ash(scowl) : "don't make a scene let us FINISH if
you have the guts"
Misty(extremely angry,tears) : "guts?guts Ketchum? i
show you.."
Ash(stopping Misty from hitting him) : "Misty
please, i of all people surely would know your guts
bit by bit,can you listen or does it end like
this?No,Pokemons aren't solving this cause you
must understand that at my level, it's totally
useless trying to battle me.."
Misty(very angry,still tears,shivering) : "why you b..,if you,if.."
Ash(laugh) : "Misty,please,this isn’t an ocean to begin with and you.."
Misty(scream,wipes off tears) : "you wanna see my guts?huh?you b..?why...huh?!..your girlfriend told you to destroy the previous and this is your method then?..huh?!..i show you guts you coward..you..”
Ash(laugh) : “like you’re another only boyfriend Green Jacobs was told to destory me?...(bursts into laughter)...”
Misty(shocked) : “Green,what..”
Ash(solemn) : "Misty,i've worked with Team
Rocket you know that,it's useless,calm down.."
Misty(angry,tears) : "you b..,you can't battle legally and..you..you cheated on that day in the Gym..humiliating me..and you’re naming anybody..you followed me and have extracted newses while being away so that..you can destroy me..WHO IS YOUR GIRLFRIEND..if she isn’t a f.. b.. tell her to FACE ME..(profuse tears,tries to wipe off)..(scream)..YOU B..,if you or your girlfriend have the guts you b..”
Ash(frown,sigh) : "Misty,if you're too
interested to know about my girldfriend in singular or plural then you must understand that i’m not a f..b.. like your beau Green that i’ll run to my challenger who’s a hall of famer herself and could directly tell the press that this battle is being battled out with a human prize for the winner so that i lose everything barring my starter pokemon..don’t act like an utter retard! And if you’re too interested to battle then you'll have to surpass all my Pokemons present here at the same time at their highest level and i won’t take any responsibilities if you don’t see your present bunch ever again and here i’ve got 91..."
Misty(crying,returns) : "Ash,you’re..you.."
Ash(solemn) : "so a battle isn't good and neither is the girlfriend talk please don't act
like a stupid child."
Misty(bursting into tears,sits down on the grass) : "you b.."
Ash(frown) : "Misty,i'm not going to stop till i get an
answer - you broke-up completely OR NOT"
Misty(scream,tears) : "YES I DID!WE’RE DONE!its..(chokes)"
Ash(straight) : "that's not the answer,is it ? it's just the m.. of a w.. right in the middle of a grand f.. and you should calm down,please Misty,stay
in this like a grown up 35 year old s.. that you are..."
Misty(scream,tears) : "Ash!..you.."
Ash(straight) : "well i just said your age and.."
Misty(tears) : "Ash!.."(bursts into tears)
Ash(straight) : "um..yeah profess.."
Misty(crying) : "Ash,you cheated on me alright,
don't try to insinuate that i did the same as i had
the chances on anyone including frie..how could you suggest.."
Ash(straight) : "well,just a name of A MUTUAL FRIEND,don't bother though"
Misty(shout,tears) : "Ash!..you..and then you'll also suggest...(can't talk as tears).."
Ash(frown) :Tracey(laugh) YES of course..(frown)..Serperior,Bayleaf bind her up snatching
away all her pokeballs,and if anyone comes out
and does something after first
warning,Snorlax,make sure she doesn't see that
pokemon ever again INCLUDING GOLDUCK and tell all your friends present
here and my buddies,today either till i have her
with me none would come around Pokemon or
Human,and they know about the other things,if
there's a Human don't kill him but i'm giving you
my word-if a single pokemon today disturbes me
after the first warning,may that Pokemon be no
more among us,or I'll be gone from you all!TELL
THEM! Sableye,Spiritomb,Hoopa,Malamar,Dusknoir,Confragigus,Darkrai,Gerninja,Gengar,Marshadow,i give you my
word SHE WILL LISTEN TO THESE AND COGNIZE
IT TILL I END,i don't know what you'll do but i just told you my
wish,Bulbasaur stay alert and if she's not well
make her dizzy but she must listen to each word and cognize them, That's what I want,Pikachu,
buddy i tell you today,don't kill any persons and don’t let them inside my area but
after that first warning if any pokemons
misbehaves still, mercilessly kill that brat.if
anyone came here despite my buddy being with
me,pokemon or human,you'll not see me
again,96 PRESENT HERE AND REST THAT WANT TO WALK WITH ME!STAND AND GUARD MY PRIVATE AREA THAT YOU KNOW!ALL 96 OF MINE!FOLLOW YOUR SPECIFIC INSTRUCTIONS GIVEN TO YOU! ALL GO!you 11!IT’S ULTIMATE ATTENTION!NOW..”
Misty(tears,scream) : "Ash!..you've become.."
Ash(scowl) : "a monster,yes.(Misty bursts into tears)..But Misty,you've seen what i did,if i want
to battle you,i'll give your Pokeballs or else i wont
till we finish and if they or any other misbehave
here beyond first warning,my buddies will simply
kill that brat,I've become a demon today and you'll
see every bit of it if you have your so called GUTS
and i wouldn't have done this had you at the first
sound of your secret 18 year long beau's name..well only one in the millions..”
Misty (crying,scream) : "Ash! you're.."
Ash(straight) : "..had not given up fighting on the first
sound of you secret beau since Oranges till he was taken..you'll be safe as i've got my arrangements
ready, don't worry,and so would your illegally swellen..”
Misty(screams tries to hit Ash again,crying,Ash orders Bayleaf to stop her which she oblidges) : “why you coward..i can..i..”
Ash(solemn) : “you can only be the 16 year old Misty that i saw in Viridan Forest lake 19 years back.you’re that exact 16 old STILL Misty,which your fake mask covered for 13 years but now has been taken off,still unless a you’re a b.. since then GROW UP!”(Misty totally breaks down in tears)..(laugh)..besides Misty s.. remember that 3rd gym and Brawn..Sableye..he’s 50 now even that day wanted to f.. you so much..(laugh)..how many time has he had the great honour AND PRIVILEDGE in there 14 wise years of your professional s...h..(bursts into laughter)...or in the Oranges..i myself remember except for a certain Mr Skechit who did it every day VIA THE SKETCHES,there were many more who wanted to s.. you all day...and a few DID too..(bursts into laughter)..because i too well remember a few DAYS when you didn’t have a FEW things(all burst into laughter)..and that s.. that you were then are saying you’ve never given in when you’ve had the chances for 13 years and want me to believe it?...(laugh)...Misty s... you’ve surpassed all expectations in s..h.. really..great s... hall of fame for sure..Sableye..(bursts into laughter)...”
Misty(a few moments later,uncontrollably sobbing and crying,lying on grass) : “Ash,you were...(scream)..ASH!..how can you..(bursts into tears,chokes)..”
Ash(solemn) : “so as i was saying,your pokemons are safe unless you agitate them and/or if they come out,so just
stay calm! you'll listen whatever i'll tell you today
till end with a sane body and mind and will
cognize every bit of it, only then i'll leave you,you
know who i'm today-no power in this world will be
able to stop me from telling you all that i have
to,and i've truely become a demon today, nobody
will be able to stop me no matter what they did
from telling you everything that i have to and you
perfectly cognizing every bit of it,if you can't bear
is just say "ASH!I QUIT!",3 times thumping the
ground,and i'll let you go instantly and you'll not
see me ever again.now,LISTEN!
Misty(sobbing) : "Ash,Trac..(can't talk anymore)
Ash(frown) : "YES,all those brats when they
were single Tracey,Brock,Gary,Kane,Braum,Tony,Harris...every single damn brat that were ever our good mutual friends when they were
single..each...yeah,definitely you
could've dated them VIA familiarity or even more,even more.."
Misty(tears,looks at Ash with disdain,screams) : "ASH!you've just abducted me and
now(bursts into tears)..now,now you're...you know
what your saying Ash? you've..(totally breaks
down)..Ash!..(cries uncontrollably)..”
Ash(straight) : "yes i've abducted you to cure you off from my memories that's all I promised Lance i'll and i'll
,no f.. b.. can stop me today including Lance,a h..
s.. like you who can't forget me needs this,AND
CAN TAKE THIS,no matter how many times they
get f.. per hour... FIGHT! and no,no line has been
crossed stay calm"
Misty(tears,extremely angry) : "calm?huh!calm? so
you were also bedding..you were... no i can't stoop as low
as you have you p..(cries out loud)"
Ash(straight) : "Upto Serena,yes i get you"
Misty(crying) : "Ash,all these years.."
Ash(straight) : "um..yeah,but no matter how many and how many times you’ve ben s.. you 35 years you shall not forget that atleast i..."
Misty(crying, scream) : "Ash..!"
Ash(laugh) : “or have you forgotten a few?(bursts into laughter)...”
Misty(loud cry) : “Ash..what are..what have..Ash..(chokes breaks down in tears)..”
Ash(straight) : "well,i'm giving you an example,Georgio isn't my friend so i couldn't mention him as mutual,Roy isn’t my friend so.."
Misty(crying) : "Geor...What are you sug.."
Ash(straight): "nothing,would you calm down?"
Misty(crying,shivering) : "i've wasted my life with
you...let me go,Ash!please!(bursts into tears)"
Ash(solemn) : "Until you answer,my answer is NO,and i'll say what i know about you in exact language.."
Misty(crying,scream) : "Ash!..just.."
Ash(frown) : "and well you still can quit like a f.. s..
like that day but your v... wasn't satisfied may be
for a few days so you were h.. enough to even
come here to begin with so..."
Misty(crying uncontrollably,sits down on grass) :
"Ash,you're..."
Ash(sigh) : "alright being polite,please Misty stay on
this,or are you just going to budge just because
i'm swearing you?"
Misty(crying) : "Ash..what do you.."
Ash(frown) : "look both you and me can swear each other for eternity but no answer will come out,and i'll
have to be very dissapointed that a Hall of Fame
Gym leader at 35 can't talk with someone just because he's swearing,or have you just given up on yourself?"
Misty(crying,screams) : "YES! I HAVE,I HAVE GIVEN UP,just let me...(crying uncontrollably)"
Ash(laugh) : "well then i may kill you right now if you write it down(hands over pen and
paper),cause then i'm sure you won't have a
problem with it would you?...Listen!..if you quit
now,i'll let you go but your Gym and any b.. from that
you've b... with,will not survive my wrath!LISTEN!.."
Misty(crying, sobbing) : "Ash,just..just..let me
go(crying)"
Ash(scowl) : "only if you allow me to end this
conversation you can go to whichever s..h.. you want
but are you not good enough anymore to
withstand a little bit of gust fearing the big winds
would f.. you up like none of your.."
Misty(crying, scream) : "Ash, please (sobbing) just
don't.."
Ash(frown) : "i see your too chaste a s..,fair
enough,anyhow would you continue if i swear a bit less?"
Misty(sobbing) : "..leave me Ash..please.."
Ash(straight) : "so,Misty Waterflower is NO MORE
then ain't it?RIP,that should be used then?all your
pokemons here and in the gym will die immediately and today then,cause a b.. like you're giving up on them cause.."
Misty(uncontrollably sobbing) : "say.."
Ash(frown) : "yeah that what's is expected here atleast
from you of all people!we were talking about
dance vs date and cheating, what's your opinion
on cheating?"
Misty(sobbs unctrolablly, sometimes later) :
"Ash,you've cheat.."
Ash(scowl) : "so i cheated?all right stay with me.In Kalos i wasn't cheating cause we broke up,in Unova i
wasn't dating cause we were still there,in Sinnoh
no news came around and you know extremely
well my travel companions from there,after Battle
Frontier i was very well known but i wasn't a star which you were and then
again you know what i was doing there very well,in
Hoenn i was none and there too you know,but Elite4,well consider i've just been back after tens and
thousands of affairs and s... f.. and Unova was
party's or hangouts which consisted of more than 10 people each time where if you want day to day
analysis you can ask your ardent f.. Cilan..."
Misty(bursts into tears) : "Ash,please..."
Ash(Frown,scoff) : "you know very well b.. that i
can't give you day to day report after 6/7 years
unless we can do time travel,just GROW UP!"
Misty(sobbing, sometimes later) : "Ash!you
cheated fully knowing you've someone already
waiting for you with utmost longing to just ask her.."..(cries
uncontrollably)"
Ash(laugh) : “so i’ve missed a chance then haven’t i?(burst into laughter)...
Misty(sobbing uncontrollably) : “Ash every b.. that wanted to pester me knew about you and you never...(chokes and cries tears)...(scream)Ash,why..(profusely crying)what wrong did i do Ash,i never cheated on you,Ash,always you came back i was always waiting for you only just for those few days all my life..and you thought..(sobbing uncontrollably)...you never wanted me..you..Ash..you cheated on me..ruined my entire life..(scream,uncontrollably crying)..Ash..what did i do ever to you.(scream,uncontrollably crying)..Ash..answ...(vomits and pokemons cure her up,few minutes later)..
Ash(frown) : "already vomiting?..Bulbasaur be careful and attentive unless you’ll be kicked out of my bunch...Misty,i’ve been sure of only one thing about you that i truely cherished you once and i wasn’t exactly happy then that i was staying away from you all MY life and that i had to wait for 2 or more years through many dangers to be with you again once more...i’m sure you understand that what pained you can also pain me when we were in our relationship...but then..(laugh)...then i found out more beautiful s.. so i went to f.. them around all day and Misty here also became a s... and everyday were f.. up by 30 b.. so sweet so beautiful ain’t it Misty s... that now none of us have to wait anymore..ain’t it?(bursts into laughter)...”
Misty(sobbing uncontrollably) : “Ash,why did you leave me then..why would you not tell them that your girlfriend was...(chokes)..Ash,they’ve tortured me all my life and i never had you beside me..always i said my Ash is my only yearning but you..you won’t...(scream)..ASH!..you cheated...(bursts into tears...chokes)...”
Ash(frown) :”about your confusion Misty that i never told anyone about you but that's the first thing i told them without naming if such cases arose that i have a girlfriend whoose
very devoted to me and i didn't name you cause to
me you were not a w.. that i would sell you around
wherever i went,that's exactly why i didn't name
you.Now do you want a proof that i'm not lying
that i never told that i've a girlfriend?then you
know very well this would go on for eternity...i'm
giving you a piece- BEAR IT like a Gym Leader!..if i have never f.. you no matter how much you wanted me
to and you being who you were then and i was
absolutely no one,i wouldn't be stupid enough just
overnight to f.. around s.. leaving you,who you
were then and you were only too willing to give in
and you know more than anyone else what you
and i ever wanted and we had each other for 14
damn years to enjoy anytime,if i f.. you constantly
for 365 days you would've only been too happy to
continue till eternity...and you know i never even
wanted to kiss you except those few occasions,and yes on
those occasions and especially the last definitely i became a h.. b.. like i'm now
and breached your trust despite you being an
eternal s..."
Misty(uncontrollably cries) : "Ash,that..."
Ash(laugh) : "was a good practice wasn't it?
(Misty breaks down completely)Listen! don't tell
me now because i liked you,i was only there for
your body or your generosity,we knew each other
since 16,you and me grew up together,we knew
what we had to know,we were traveling around for 4 years and for that 4 years not one night passed
when we weren't together,if we wanted we
would've satisfied ourselves to maximum during
Johto,and yes i was attracted to you,infatuated
with you as were you,i did gaze at you but i did never
stare like a h.. b.. at your b.. or h. or b.. or l.. or v.. any time ever in all the time in 15 years ever.(laugh)..well may be your photoes then i guess(bursts into laughter)..(shout)..LISTEN!.."(Pokemons keep Misty from
fainting)
Misty(some moments later,2:53) : "Ash,just let.."
Ash(frown) : "Misty,please,you're way stronger
than this and this is nothing to you just Listen!no
matter what i'm now you know extremely well
neither you nor me have any secrets regarding this
matter to each other.Misty,i've seen you from a
little teenager to now you're 35 years old and also
at 29,when you were an international star,we never
needed to hide from each other these things as
you know it as a fact that these weren't our
premise for our relationship ever to begin with,don't blindfold yourself now saying why didn't
we f.. around so hard as to never again needing
anyone else.I've had THE most PHYSICALLY beautiful,ever virtuous and skillful girl
in anything she ever did,everyday in front of me at
my mercy who was devoted to me so blindly
forever,and i didn't f.. her all around cause she was
Misty,Misty wasn't a b.. to me.Don't start
this..SHUT UP!..”
Misty(scream,crying) : "Ash,your're..your.."
Ash(frown) : "Misty,please!no matter what you
become few people will ever know you bit by bit
like i know both physically and mentally,may be
none ever will...and you know me like that as
well.."
Misty(cries,scream) : "I DID... you've just..(again
breaks down).."
Ash(frown) : "Misty,please if we start this it'll take
eternity but i must finish it before that..."
Misty(screams, crying) : "my frien..(again breaks
down,tries to phone,with the help of Bayleaf Ash snatches away her phone,Sableye and all paralyzes her)
Ash(frown,few moments later,Sableyer has let Misty go) : "all your beaus together can't do a fig
to me and you know that,and also know that at
this very moment the whole Hall of Fame
combined with all legendaries can't do a fig to
me,so no battling or f.. boy scouts will get a s.. like
you out of this,you have to do it on your own,
unless you've been f.. around for 35 years..."
Misty(shivering, sobbing, whispering) : "Ash,i was
your frie..."
Ash(laugh) : "more like a friendly b.. but now would you
listen or you're just giving up because the stool
and urine.."
Misty(sobbing uncontrollably) : "Ash,just let me.."
Ash(frown) : "right,Stay in this unless you're giving
up on everything and everyone?Stay!yes may be
you think i needed to f.. someone around everyday
as i grew up and you were always away but i've
had my chances and many people would've given
their two arms and still do just to have a full view
of you and still do while i not even once wanted your body
or your generosity.Now i can go about it all the time or may we go to the next part?"
Misty(sobbing uncontrollably) : "...but..but..you
won't tell me ever with whom you were going out...
(crying out loud)"
Ash(frown) : "No as i wasn't bedding them and i
never tried to remember any b.. i met in a f.. party
and you know what i'm talking about,you weren't a
little girl then but an internationally well known
star,we had grown up enough by then to know that
we couldn't share our under.. as we were 30 and not
16 anymore and you know what i'm talking about"
Misty(sobbing) : "and..and so..so it was infact me who was
sharing her u.. behind your back cause i was an
international star?..Ash,you..(uncontrollably cries,screams)..ASH..(chokes,profusely crying)"
Ash(straight) : "exactly My point."
Misty(crying,shout) : "ASH.."
Ash(frown) : "we're not doing a drama ok?"
Misty(absolutely breaks down) : "you thought i
was.."
Ash(straight) : "bedding,yes.but would you allow me to
finish?"
Misty(crying uncontrollably) : "I beg of you.."
Ash(shakes Misty up) : "Misty,LISTEN we're only
getting started.and i know you're not a coward to
budge so easily,you don't need to beg for anything
to a b.. like me EVER,LISTEN!(lets Misty go)I am
saying whom were you bedding?was it someone
else you were bedding or WAS IT ME?"
Misty(sobbing,bit surprized) : "what?"
Ash(straight) : "did you bed me or did you bed someone
else while i was away?"
Misty(tries to clear off tears,sobbing) : "Ash,what
are you trying to mean?"
Ash(straight) : "i'm saying i only ever saw the futility and the
fun no matter from pokemon perspective how
great the date was..."
Misty(treas,sobbing) : "and I didn't rather i was bedding a new
bloke..(chokes,again profusely cries)"
Ash(straight) : "You know what Misty,yes i accuse you,you
were all over the bed"
Misty(crying) : "that's it then isn't it? i.."
Ash(laugh) : "going back to depression again?"
Misty(breaks down) : "i can't take it anymore.."
Ash(as loudly as possible in Misty's ears while
vigorously shaking her) : "YOU WERE BEDDING
ME".
Misty(sobbing,surprized) : "what?"
Ash(straight) : "exactly what you heard,i accuse you that
you were cheating on me as you were bedding
me"
Misty(tries to clear off her tears, sobbing) :
"Ash,stop this nonsense.."
Ash(sigh) : "Misty,You can't forget me even when you're
married to someone else"
Misty(a bit angry, sobbs) : "is that a challenge
Ketchum?"
Ash(straight) : "hence great guys like Georgio,Green and
Roy never had a chance despite being as good
as anyone and you know it,infact you wouldn't
have been in this mess had you been with any one
of them,and 4 years no contact is a long long
time.that's what i'm saying"
Misty(sobbing) : "who told.."
Ash(straight) : "they themselves as soon as i gave my real
identity to them and they had to give me only truth
given who i'm.the whole Elite4 would do anything
for me without a single question.."
Misty(sobbing) : "it was.."
Ash(straight) : "LISTEN! i know how you behaved with them
only too well and you were the ever perfect and firm lady as
ever,i know each time you cancelled the very first
date.those f.. themselves had to tell me or my
sources and i confirmed them from your diaries
that i took from your room and others were
supplied by your helpers whom i scared via Elite 4 Kanto,you met those guys as
those b.. encirculated you all the time..,then we
broke up,then you agreed to go to date cause you just didn’t see any light anywhere as soon as i was gone but only to
cancel the very first date saying you can't and
you're sorry,etc,etc and they realized you can't
forget someone,(laugh)besides about a million
people in Cerulian only would give all their limbs to f..
you won't they?"
Misty(screem, crying) : "stop insulating me,i'm not
a s..(profusely crying)..Ash..how could..(chokes,tears).."
Ash(straight) : "i know about your chastity more than you
don't bother"
Misty(screams, sobbs unctrolablly) : "Ash,you’re..you’re..(chokes)"
Ash(laugh) : "exactly that i've f.. so many i know
only too well that who are your and how they f.. you"
Misty(screams,anger,sobbing) : "Ash,i'll.."
(Dark Gang stops her from talking)
Ash(frown) : "Tracey can f.. you all he wants,like he
did before and was doing for years but you lost him to your own sister..(laugh)..such pity..anyhow(frown)but would you accept Tracey as you
beau?"
Misty(totally breaks down) : "Ash,I Quit!I Quit!I
Quit!(uncontrollably crying sitting on the grass)"
Ash(laugh) : "that was just wordplay,untill you lose
every bit of your prized chastity...(Misty almost
faints but the Pokemons keep her
up)...what(laugh)? that you can't be f.. around and
be chaste...?..i right now am destroying every bit
of it(laugh)..am i even touching you Misty(laugh)?..."
Misty(sobbing vigorously) : "Ash,please..."
Ash(scream) : "shut up b...! you're body gets f.. or mind or you're verbally f.. no matter how you get f..
if you've known what chastity is truely you'll be
that forever if you so wish!SHUT UP!
Misty(lies down on grass, sobbing whispering) :
"just kill me Ash,just.."
Ash(laugh) : "not till you're chaste(laughes
uncontrollably)"
Misty(sobbing,whisper) : "what do you want
Ash?..what(cries uncontrollably).."
Ash(goes close to Misty's ears) : "I WANT YOUR
CHASTITY!"
Misty(screams, sobbing) : "then just f...(bursts into
tears)"
Ash(scowl) : "say i f.. you now,can i get rid of your
chastity?or if i f.. you now mentally by just gazing
at youe v.. d.. all over but neither imagining nor
touching,would i be chaste,say your body is
paralyzed and i f.. you,would you be chaste,if your mind doesn’t budge a bit?if you
mentally c.. on my g.. would you be chaste,even if your body is paralyzed..you're
body is paralyzed your mind still works,your mind
is f.. me your body is 6 feet away from me...or even if you’re paralyzed and being f.. but mentally don’t want it still where is your chastity that it’s a matter of PRIDE to you but you know that the body you can’t control so you can’t help it and thus it’s not there at all..and also not in your mind wither cause you have been f... with me since the day you first saw me in that lake 19 years back,thus that’s not in mind either this thing you called Chastity..so Misty s...,if you can show where's your chastity at all you'll be taken further."
Misty(lying,sobbs uncontrolably) : "please Ash just
stop that..."
Ash(laugh) : "Chastity ain't it? chastity,Misty you've
lost it the first day you saw me if you weren't a
professional s.. even then(bursts into laughter)..."
Misty(sobbing, scream) : "Yes,i was an in-born
s..,i'm..i'm.."(breaks down crying)
Ash(laugh) : "so your chastity vanished then ain't
it?"(bursts into laughter)..but you must say it in
words...(bursts into laughter)..."
Misty(lying on grass,few minutes later,almost motionless, sobbing,whishper,profuse tears rolling down,3:19) :
"Ash,the day i saw you first.."
Ash(laugh) : "i got unchaste(bursts into laughter)..no till you word it down i won't budge..."
Misty(sits up,angry, sobbs,crying) : "no i won't say that,
(scream)do whatever you want you b..! you b.. you..(again bursts into tears).."
Ash(frown) : "what are you holding onto now?i always say i f.. around and i don't hold onto that,does it mean you're more chaste than me when i showed you that you in your mind has bedded only me several times,what to speak of others..."
Misty(sobbing, scream) : "i'm unchaste then,i'm a w..i..(bursts into tears)..
Ash(straight) : "well my opinion doesn’t matter or that of anyone else cause you yourself can make you that, nobody else,may we go to the next step?"
Misty(sobbing) : "you b..(bursts into tears)"
Ash(frown) : "i'm saying that you d.. among millions to forget your Ash only which you couldn't."
Misty(sobbing) : "Ash.."
Ash(straight) : "see this could be fun if we both were
promiscuous you know why as i said if we cheat
on each other or anyone else we'll be only thinking
about each other only.same way if you're married
happily infact it won't be exactly nice and easy
now nor for me,because there's another and the
comparison and eventual adjustments would go
on for ages possiby never completing so the children won't be exactly nice in such a situation i guess.."
Misty(crying) : "what do you want,Ash?are you cursing
me that even if i do marry someone else my children..(chokes totally with tears)"
Ash(stern voice) : "you had 4 damn years to forget
me,4 DAMN YEARS.."
Misty(sobbing,3:28) : "i'll take 14,but(trying to stand up
again) i've..i've...i've decided,Ash Ketchum we're
done.i'll show you that.."
Ash(laugh) : "Your marrying someone to show
someone else something?"
Misty(crying and again sitting down,totally broken
down,few moments later) : "Ash let me go.."
Ash(frown) : "Misty,is there any point in getting into a
relationship only because you want to forget
someone else?"
Misty(sobbing) : "i couldn't.."
Ash(straight) : " exactly,neither could I"
Misty(shouting loudly,crying) : "i want to forget you Ash
but.."
Ash(solemn) : "you can't,neither can i Misty,neither
can I."
Misty(sobbing) : "Ash if you were a girl.."
Ash(straight) : "well all i can say is that same for
me, I won't be doing the right thing either if i tried
to marry a woman only to forget another.there's a
saying that you have to say goodbye but that
means a Pokemon goes to another,not so easy for
humans, especially if they're a chaste wh.. like
you."
Misty(sobbing) : "Ash..you..your torturing me since
16,give me a break please,go away Ash,i was.."
Ash(frown) : "so happy before meeting you today here as i read your note and came running to my ASH to be
f.. around all my life!HAPPILY!"
Misty(crying, sobbing uncontrollably) : "Ash you
don't expect me to run back to you after whatever
you can say or do,none has ever humiliated and
mentally tortured me like you've done...you've
insulted my..(breaks down completely)"
Ash(laugh) : "Chastity(laughes uncontrollably)"
Misty(sob,scream) : "Ash,i'm..(breaks down
totally)"
Ash(laugh) : "a girl so no boy can have chastity?"
Misty(uncontrollably sobs) : "just kill...(sobbs
unctrolablly)"
Ash(frown) : "your chastity,then i'm doing it listen!i
atleast said i didn't impure it and i atleast said that
except for me none had the chance unless YOU
YOURSELF had budged and lying to me just like
i'm not..i'm telling you that i've f... b.. around
for so long..i've.. your problem with that isn't mine
neither is your chastity,all i said is that i didn't c... inside
your v.. to begin with and viseversa,i atleast didn't
start with you..and about the expectation of
running back to be f.. around,not at all,i expected
you to may be jump around me,scream.."
Misty(sobbing uncontrollably) : "Ash.."
Ash(straight) : "you see Misty,you aren't forgetting me in
this life whether you're the most chaste or the
biggest wh.. and nor i'm forgetting you during my
lifespan no matter how many i f.. around everyday
or dont at all, and that's what i meant,i don't give a
fig about any random person,i made a mistake continuing to journey rather than being beside you
then when you truely needed my arm around your
shoulder and i despite having that power to lend
you that support never cared rather went for utter
selfishness,and i'm killing myself for that since i
realized it cause more than a s.. to me you were
my very close friend and i didn't care about you
that's why and i'm sorry for that and have been for
a long time.if there's a chance i would like to set it
straight."
Misty(sobbing) : "you.."
Ash(sigh,frown) : "did i ever kiss your head off feeling your body all over ever in those few occasions that too
went as politely as possible and only after asking
but i would apologize if you didn't want it those days
and i like a h.. b.. jumped on you cheating on our
friendship which i DID DO on the last occasion so yeah you’re right anyway,but still barring those few mements in 15 years,never did i li.. your tongue never did i
snaggle you that day or have i su.. the j.. out of
you everytime i ever saw you AND ON THAT LAST OCCASION AS WELL WAS AS POLITE DESPITE WHY I WAS INSTIGATED TO BEGIN WITH,did i li.. your v.. all the time for 15 years for kisses Misty,huh?!?did I?"
Misty(sobbing uncontrollably,3:32) : "Ash,please.."
Ash(stern,scowl) : "SHUT UP,unless the Misty that could tame a f.. lunatic Gyarados singlehandedly at 21 has
become such a f.. up wh.. now that can't stand a
verbal onslaught!STAND UP!LISTEN!did i demand
that we share a bed all the time everyday that you
had m..?huh?! you want to know whether i f..
around girls before i broke up don't you,but you of
all were closest to me all the time and just a
giggle away from too happily sharing your
under...all the time-but was i only looking to f.. you
every night you were sleeping near me cause you
had some problems?have i ever been friendly to
you only because you were infatuated with me
and i just kept licking my lips waiting to jump and
prey upon you just in that right moment? did i ever
f.. you like anything in all those places that we've
been in 15 years and no don't get me started,i
never showed doesn't mean i never knew exactly
what you wanted from me since the
beginning..Misty,you were the Sensational Sister the youngest and most sought after all over the
world they died for you all over and i kept seeing
that day after day brushing it aside cause to me
you were ever my little friend Misty,and to me you
were exactly that all the time,and at the top of your
fame as a Gym Leader and Perfomer,only I had
you at my mercy Misty,only me in the whole
world..the girl who if looked at them they would
feel their thousand lives has been f.. enough was
at my mercy,i was unique even then,all i wanted to
say what?- 'can I f.. you tonight Misty,please please
you look so so s.. today?' did I?ever?Misty,i've seen
many chosen s.. in my godforsaken life and their
antics,and YOU if only YOU weren't one of
them,never have been atleast till i left you and this
atleast i could say of my friend who still,still have
an infatuation for me since the very first day for all these 19 damn years no matter what that
despite having truely great guys at her mercy my
girlfriend waited for me cause she cherished me
despite me never being kind to her,this i can say
about you to anyone who dares to say otherwise ever...but Misty,i could've f.. you all around and
left,and yes i did leave but before that despite
having all the luck and chances,did I ever ever
even asked you out to go to shopping,to date,to
skywatch,to a beach,a lake,a desart,a restaurant,a
movie apart from how a friend would ask you for a hangout?..did i hangout with you all those occasions because i just wanted to f.. you around?..was i..”
Misty(screams,crying) : "Ash,please stop."
Ash(straight) : "those few kisses that i had with you,which you may
blame me now that actually what i meant on those days
was that i wanted to s.. you all day.. and definitely so on the last day but i know i
didn't EVEN on the last day and those were the only times that we were physical sorry you weren’t the last my bad but anyway,the Unova one was an accident
which i was foolish enough to not predict,and I
never expected Serena of all people to do that out
of blue,and that's the real s.. i've seen from closest
quarter-hanging around me to be s.. every day and
night like a copybook h.. b.. and i ever took her
under my wing cause of her parents were too well
known to Professor Oak of all and even to my mom remotely.. and she was a r..s..
before that so i thought if i could do
something,Kalos being my very last regional journey and i had 5 leagues-but to my harsh
awakening i found you can't take a w.. as your
sister no matter how may you try and the b.. did
shine in all her glorious s..h.. to pull off a stunt on
me.anyhow thats a different story,you see I didn't
do all those even with you then and the only 8 times
we did,were moments too emotional for
both of us,or maybe i was a h.. b.. that
day,but i hugged you many times and that was it
for me but as far as i know,i didn't fel.."
Misty(sobbing uncontrollably) : "Ash,please..stop..let me speak..all you're trying so hard to tell me is that you've been kissed only few times and all by me,and only those few times did you intentionally do it and expect me to believe you given simply what you've said earlier just now?"
Ash(frown) : "no i must be clear to you,did i ever by any
means improperly behaved with you,you of all girls?"
Misty(sobbing) : "and neither then would you do
so to.."
Ash(Sternly) : "cause I don't want to Misty,i don'thave to nor do i need to.you also can realize publicity stunts very well and Serena was i thought only being childish and i didn't tell her about you cause you weren't with me then and it would've encouraged the s.. that she is even more and which anyhow did,giving me the lesson once a
w..,always a w.."
Misty(sobbing) : "so your inaction didn't help you
then?"
Ash(stren) : "well,i tell you then frankly my views as i did
in that note.
I DONT KISS URINE AND STOOL"
Misty(uncontrollably crying) : "so i'm also.."
Ash(Straight) :"the only exception.TILL TODAY.(Misty uncontrollably cries,tries to scream but dark gang stops her from vomitting or fainint or screaming or moving)...To me you're not just this
body or these emotions that you're showing
now,you're far far beyond,i wish i knew it perfectly
before but sadly i didn't.i have had chances to be
all over a thousand girls including you and i
could've jumped upon you just about anytime and
apart from you i still have had enough s.. recently
even more..,but the thing is that except you there's pus and urine and in case of you i don't have to be
all over you at all nor have i ever seen you or will in
the same light as i have and will in case of all others
which includes that s.. from Kalos and that one from Unova and so on...Sableye...”
Misty(crying,few moments later) : "Ash,your're insulting the whole.."
Ash(frown) : "did you kiss Ash Ketchum or the
saliva,spit,cough.."
Misty(profusely crying) : "Please.."
Ash(scowl) : "if you've kissed Ash Ketchum you can be
happy about it as am I,unless you realize this i
must go further with this"
Misty(sobbing) : "what are you trying to.."
Ash(frown) : "the others have
touched,fondled,kissed,liked,became friends
with,is greatfull to was kind to,so on so on..all
that's not Ash Ketchum.Only my Mom,my
Pokemons and YOU,MISTY WATERFLOWER,has
ever got the Ash Ketchum that i'm"
Misty(with tears) : "Ash you want me to bel.."
Ash(frown) : "fine,then did you fish out a mass of flesh and urine that fine afternoon in a godforsaken
forest lake or did you..No don't interrupt,i'm going
to the bottom of this only then i myself will never
show my face to you.BE PATIENT.you got me out
of there,probably saving both my and Pikachu's
life,then i borrowed you bi-cycle and the rest you
know.What made you fall for me?"
Misty(with tears) :" you tendered Pikachu,you.."
Ash(straight) : "it's not a question of what i did,you've seen
everyone and me...same stool and urine,but the
rest were not whereas I was,why?you couldn't help
it,right?"
Misty(screams out,sobbing fanatically) : "No,and i
wish i could..i.."
Ash(shaking Misty) : "please Misty,be patient we're
only beginning..your
answers,generosity,kindness,warmth or the look
the skills..i've had enough with these nonsense my
entire life.if you can honestly say you liked me
because of something i will instantly give up on
you"
Misty(crying,scream) : "what do you want me to
confess,Ash? i just liked you I don't know why,i
couldn't help.."
Ash(straight) : "right stay with me on this.Other people have
liked me for a reason,except My Mom and My
Pokemons..i like my mom because of nothing,i
like my pokemons because of nothing,my
pokemons may've been charmed with my care but
i've released Butterfree 19 years ago,why
has his children's children came back here and stays,Pidgeot my Pidgeot came back stays,Laprass of all wanted to come back and is here now you may know,this Gerninja you see i didn’t want her to come with me she came and refused to return..why they kept coming back?why all of my pokemons don't leave
me despite me leaving them at places? Pikachu
never was cared because of his temperament,i did
care but he refused to go into a
Pokeball,Bulbasaur refused to leave or
evolve,Haunter came to me on his own will,and
EACH IN KALOS HAS ON THEIR OWN WILL -  DARKRAI,GERNINJA,HEATRAN,MALAMAR,LYCANROC,DEOXYS,DUSKNOIR,INCEINEROAR,ZERAORA,ZYGARDE...went to the inhibitants to know them and see if they come and they came by themselves didn’t do a damn thing except to release my bunch and play with them in the outskirts of the inhibitant all alone my travel companions were far cause they weren’t trainers and my bunch mind the words JOKED AND FOOLED AROUND with them one chose to come with me came...but yeah that’s deceit like cheating a chaste w.. like you but..(Misty screams trying to say something)..Sableye...(stern voice) SHUT THE HELL UP AND LISTEN YOU w.. JUST SHUT UP!such a chaste w.. like you no wonder dosen’t have enough patience to let the customers finish the prasie of their v.. wants again so jumps again one more for free....(sternly)..SHUT THE HELL UP!...look at my bunch,i've given them full license,when i trained them it was more then most and then later all fun than training and you
know all of these.they've stayed with me because
they like Ash Ketchum not my blah,blah,blah,something.After Sinnoh i singled
out each and sternly told them they can leave after
they choked in the final leaving Pikachu all alone
even after I won,they didn't,i've been out to catch
them battle them do whatever i want to do with
them,they kept liking me.they didn't have to,why?
they don't know....Sableye...are you listening?"
Misty(sobbing,few moments later) : "YES THAT I’M A W.. I WAS WAITING THERE BESIDE THE LAKE TO GET...(uncontrollbaly crying)..Ash..what have i done to you ever Ash answer me Ash i just..you..(scream ...uncontrollably cries)..WHAT..."
Ash(frown) : "...Sableye...Stay on this,we're exactly here
and look around you,Gengar,Sableye,Marshadow,Spiritomb,Dusknoir,Hoopa,Darkrai,Malamar,Confragigus,Gerninja,my
own dark type pokemons who are preventing a s.. like you from getting mad and thus lose your profession cause no matter how many times you’ve been f.. in your life you can’t take it if you’re called unchaste,they can't breed due to their heightened powers and Banette and Marshadow you know very well after coming to me refused to breed after only once that too like 10/12 years back,i never forced them,they
chose it themselves-for me,what assurance i gave
them that I won't drain them later breaking my
promise,you know very well that this evolution is
possible if only they will and not just any dark
pokemon can reach this stage,very selected can
and they themselves have to comply only then this
happenes,why,why have they done this despite me
rather dissuading them consistently? i wanted to
recall them,i've been afraid of loosing,i wanted to surrender,i wanted them to save themselves not
go too far,THEY REFUSED.i wanted them to have
their lives,THEY REFUSED,i never wanted to get them madly fighting all time though i did and you know all mentally they themselves wanted that madness of 2.4 years at Unova and i can go on and on about it, and why i kept winning from any situation as i didn't ever tell my
pokemons that battling was more important even
in my dreams? they've given their lives to me-
why?...Sableye..."
Misty(tears,bit sobbing,2 minutes later) : "Ash its your.."
Ash(laugh) : "what s..?what?..Sableye...what is it Misty,huh?!?what are you trying
to get at?...your.your.your.your..sounds exactly
what you are and who who are that you are a wh..,Misty is a wh..(sternly) SHUT THE
F.. UP!..your!..but wait (laugh)..i know it...your..well
lets see why Misty s.. became infatuated with a h..
b.. like Ash from the very beginning(laugh)..waiting for a customer there but then got infatuated(laugh)..cause here it
is..my look,my skill,your gratitude,my
gratitude,your infatuation,your dream,your
crush,my money,my body,my fame,my
kindness,my warmth,my gallantry,my
generosity,my infatuation,my obsession,my friendship,my closure,my help,my
affection, my benevolence,my passion,my
heart,my smile,my intelligence,my
achievements,my compassion,my social skills,my
social services,my valour,my vigour,my honesty,my
success,my persistence,my vigil,my willpower,my goodness,my truthfullness,my
plight,my distress,my position,my condition,my
troubles,my profession(bursts into laughter)-
oh!My Mind/was I kind/why rewind/(stern)I WAS NEVER BLIND...Sableye off..
(few Minutes Later,4:09)Misty(sobbing, lying down on grass,looking at
Ash) : "um..Ash..come.."
Ash(frown) : "what?lie down on top of you and f.. you
the few more moments you've left in your f.. life of a f.. chaste s..?
Misty(tries to scream,crying) : "your soul.."
(chokes)..(almost faints,pokemons cure her)..
Ash(frown,some finutes later,4:18) : "what is a soul?"
Misty(sobbs uncontrollably) : "Ash please it your
self..it's just you..."
Ash(stern) : "RIGHT!IT'S ME,NOT MINE.why my
mom loves me?even if i kick her out of home
tomorrow without giving her any means she'll
deep down still want only to reconcile not to
destroy me.why?why is it that people like me who
didn't have to?”
Misty(sobbing, uncontrollably,sitting up,tears) :
"Ash,i.."
Ash(extremely agitated) : "such charm i've on you
ain't it doll?that now you're thinking your Ash is
FINALLY back to you again to unchaste you,then
LISTEN i'm doing all these to rob whatever you've left now,yeah that's what my real intension is- lets
battle doll,shall we?...YOU'LL HAVE TO LISTEN if
you want to die peacefully,GET UP!..you 11 brats and all else here assigned(scream,stern)make her stand up..yes..lets battle s..
empress,lets battle(laugh,Misty sobbs
uncontrollably)..i cheated on you with just about
any w.. you can imagine,and while i was enjoying
their ...,i laughed at your loyalty and then i'd cheat
on that w.. with another s.. and so on and i'll do it
again and again and again on everyone,i'll do this
to every single person including you all my life i'll
become the devil that'll leave a mark on people for
a long time..i'll deceive you with the mask
of honesty..(Misty almost faints,pokemons cure her)MISTY(vigorously shaking her),MISTY!LISTEN..no you
can't still faint..(laugh).. longing to be f.. around
since the very first sight ain't it?(bursts into
laughter,Misty totally breaks down in tears,wants
to drink water,Gerninja provides it..a few moments
later)
(solemn,sits Misty down,who lies down again,
uncontrollably crying)..i forgot sometimes people helped me and all that just having a look-a this
boy is sweet it seemed to this...sweet,warm,kind...
(scream)F.. all of that, there's a f.. reason behind
all f.. that i received.."
Misty(some minutes later,sobbing,mild exhausted voice,4:29) : "Ash..i.."
Ash(frown) : "you don't know what that X factor
was?"
Misty(sobbing uncontrollably) : "Ash,did i.."
Ash(solemn) : "no it's not a matter of fault or
blame,all i'm saying is that you were there and felt
what you felt but didn't know why..i certainly
wasn't the prettiest h.. b.. at 16 and i know that.."
Misty(some minutes later,trying to sit on the bench beside Ash,4:33) :
"Ash,please, let's.."
Ash(angry,Makes Misty sit on the grass) : "Shut
the f.. up b..!just two words and a professional s..
that you are coming all over for her only Ash!Stay
where you are!..”
Misty(uncontrollably crying) : "Ash..i'm..i'm
sorry...i’m sorry Ash..i didn't...(bursts into tears)"
Ash(laugh) : "want to break up with you but you see i got so h.. that just before i got f.. by Mr Green Jacobs,so i had to
cause i thought i might get(bursts into laughter)..
what's that damned word..(bursts into
laughter)s..?(bursts into laughter).."
Misty(again almost fainted but pokemons keep
her up,13 minutes later, sobbing uncontrollably,4:44) :
"Ash...just.."
Ash(bursts into laughter) : "you all,she doesn't talk
only cogitates..Oh!i get you now s..,that day you
were so h.. you forgot to p.. u.. your sweet greeny
... so when your beau greeny came in, obviously
without the misty stuffs as he was with his
Misty(bursts into laughter),Misty s.. and Ah!the
day!Ah!the joy..so you both f.. hard without p.. thus
you were sure you'll get .. which you did but before
that you cut me off then he went away and now
has taken away his k.. so you're depressed that
your k.. aren't with you(bursts into laughter)..or is
it that you like that day have had too many a... that
means in battle -surrender?(laughes
uncontrollably).Sableye off.."
Misty(lies down,sobbing uncontrollably,few
minutes later,4:50) : "this was all wasn't it Ash for
my..my..(bursts into tears)"
Ash(frown) : "I know only too well you were not the
one who invited that f.. there that day,and i didn't
know him then..so don't worry about that b.."
Misty(shivering and sobbing uncontrollably) : "i
was just.."
Ash(frown) : "your Ash was cheating on you and
that just killed you..you know what Misty,i tell you
something,you ever wanted me to do well in my career so you were cheering me up each time while you travelled with me,so may be you were there
because i was good at battling or you thought i
was so why don't i charm you with what i've got
now so that you can't help but to un.. youself right
now..Charizard take Bulbasaur and her to that spot she whishs to battle me(Charizard takes Misty to the battle position,Misty uncontrollably cries)see my exact power now..you 10 brats go there do what you were doing and Bulbasaur should do so too...(after all set,release
Gyarados,Jellicent,Jinx).."
Misty(sitting on the grass,shivering) : "Gyar.."
Ash(grin) : "Right,Gyarados,your own sweetie,13 years ago
saw your soul..that is a b..(laugh)..anyhow,now try to turn her on against me,Jellicent a brillinat pokemon with whom and Gyarados and Jinx,the great Kanto only ice-dark ever the best in the 3 on 3 1 round challenge,you have BEATEN a Elite4 challenger 3 months back,your second and last such match at 1-1 the results and thus lets see what they are made of,i’m using ONE(burst into laughter)...Heracross..(Heracross comes)..come
here..you 11 brats..make her
stand up till my wish,you know the rest..(all of Misty’s pokemons looks at her in total confusion then goes to her and Gyarados lies down,Jellicent and Jinx sits quitely,all flustered)..
(laugh)..Misty,Misty,Misty!..such a sweet name for
such a sweet-feigning innocent-deceiving chaste s..(burst into laughter),you know what’ss
happening,i'm faking myself and telling Heracross
to connect me to Gyarados,Jinx and Jellicent as much as she can
and tell her this is all because your master cherishes me and i’m not listening so she’s angry with me(laugh)...your own
Gyarados,taming whom you realized who you are
and you became the best Water Pokemon master
once only both as a chaste s.. (laugh),that Gyarados doesn't know who is who neither does your great Jellicent and Jinx(laugh)..Misty forget the world of battling you know..(stern)..THIS IS REALITY...(laugh)and you can do nothing about it ever chaste b...(burst into laughter) cause no matter how much you try to battle me they won’t listen to you at all cause i’m telling them that you cherish me and(stern) no they can’t read deceit so they won’t ever know me but they can certainly know when you want them to attack YET NOT ATTACKING cause you’re a s..(burst into laughter) so you actually are confirming me cause you DON’T WANT TO ATTACK me AS YOU STILL WANT MY G.. SO BADLY (burst into laughter)..look at
yourself(smirk,laugh)..and s..,even if you do want to attack me you still can’t cause i will keep this mask of DECEIT forever THUS none can attack me cause you know it’s impossible to battle a pokemon if the other doesn’t want to battle(laugh)...my bunch has been told about this for years and they now don’t want to attack at all by themselves all i need to do is to use their medium to confirm my position to the opposition(laugh) and (sternly)THUS I’M INVINCIBLE IN BATTLING(laugh)..i’m not cheating upon anyone see(laugh) my bunch never asked my opinions in their personal life and thus the viseversa and it’s inevitable anyway..so you see s.. that you were after me cause of my skills so s.. now(stern) LOOK AT MY
POWER.. and(laugh) this whole with my pokemons is the same ain’t it Misty s.. that YOU also did when you gave me a fake mask of friendship to take advantage of my skills and travelling schedules cause you KNEW i had good battling skills(laugh)..(GRAVE) this is reality Ms Misty Waterflower,(more grave)GIVE AND TAKE...but YOU FOGOT TO END THE PROCESS THUS CAN’T FOTGET ME...(laugh)..but see via the mask of honesty how i’m cheating you(burst into laughter)..just look at your plight..(laugh)..what a pitiful s..(laugh,shakes his head)"
Misty(lies down on the Grass profusely crying and sobbing,Ash returns all her
pokeballs and recalls Gyarados,Jinx and Jellicent after pating them gently,and tells Heracross to return,5:01)..
Ash(grin) : "saw Misty s..,what Pokemon Master
means..No,you can't faint just yet unless you're
too drained out of your j... by all that that have had
their chances..i've only begun..i've cheated on
everyone with this,this mask of civility,honesty,i'm
enjoying your current plight and i know you still
can't forget me and will come running back to be
s.. around all over the first moment i want you
to..and i'll torture you like this for the rest of your
life,you'll feel the pain of my separation when
your're with your kids,husband,
grandchildren,when you're first baby arrives,you'll
still think about me as the father,when you'll be ...
with anybody including your husband,all you'll
think is only me..you'll run back to me from
beyond death,Misty,if i wanted you to..i'll accuse
you of infidelity with the very dearest friends with your own family in front of them,you'll
still have only praise for me,i'll defame you,i'll
throw you to the masses that want your v... everyday and you still will like me...Misty,you'll
think of leaving your own children for my sake if i
so wanted,you'll think of leaving your beloved
husband for my sake if i so wanted and though
duty then would bind you,your heart will be at MY
feet not to them..Misty,this little chaste life of
yours has been doomed when you decided to not
leave me that day 19 years back..and i'm so much
loving the every bit of your
suffering,plight,death,you are a Hall of Fame Gym
Leader,but now you've been drained of the last bit
of life you had left in you before you came here
today...Misty,in reality with all that you've had and
will have,your no more than a roads.. s..
performing to the claps of her f... all the while she
dreams of someone else ... her,that's exactly who
you will be even more after you walk out from here
unless you die right now,which is again what you
won't or even if you do your very last thought
would be me, beyond that too i'll be there f..
you,cause STILL its your ASH isn't it,dieMisty,die,i'm killing you,I,Your Ash,take your time
today nobody will come here today to save you or
disturb me cause this area is all mine,i've a share
here in the Lab that they themselvs have given me
as honour and i can do whatever i want to do
here,and i need no physical force to kill a s.. up s..
you totally devoid of any s.. or life to begin
with..die Misty,die slowly,let me enjoy your
slow,tedious approach to the eventual,all the while
you STILL try to remember the moment you first
saw me to console yourself and forgive me and
return to me from beyond death-STILL...But
This,This is Exactly who i'm in reality."
(8 minutes later)
Misty(lying down on the grass,now looking at the
Sky,tearfull eyes,sobbing,5:30) : "..Ash.."
Ash(grin) : "want more s.. s.. ?"
Misty(sobbing,sitting up) : "Ash..can.."
Ash(frown) : "yes,you can ask and take your time"
Misty(a bit later,sobbing still,5:33) : "Ash..i'll come back
to you..(Ash Grins)..(very agitated)..No,Listen..i'll still come back to you no matter what you do to
me..(cries again)..Ash...i want to..(tries to stand
up)"
Ash(laugh,makes Misty sit again on the grass) :
"get f.. by me?relax,all in good times,(laugh)how
lucky am I to have such a devoted b.."
Misty(cries and screams) : "Ash.. Shut up..i want.."
Ash(frown) : "fine take your time go on"
Misty(sobbing) : "Ash..i'll return to you..i just...i...i
just i've to...i..i can't.."
Ash(laugh) : "help but to be f.. around by me?..never enough s.. right(burst into laughter).."
Misty(scream and falls down) : "Ash,i'll.."
Ash(laugh) : "die to come back and be f.. around
again?(Misty uncontrollably cries)...what(laugh)..just once Ash,just once..i've been f.. by so many but you,please Ash..just f.. me once..please(bursts into laughter)...
Misty(few moments later,sobbing,5:40) : "yeah,exactly..
(tries to un..)"
Ash(frown) : "Bayleaf tie her up(Bayleaf ties Misty up completely)...just everything is blank to you unless there's your Ash..so see Misty s...that's what i'm saying,my pokemons were bound to me,my mom was bound to me..they know me,its not something,its me,my soul that has done something to them..they can't leave me no matter what..soul,that my heart and mind combined is a
mere reflection of..and unfortunately a s.. named
MISTY WATERFLOWER is bound to me...except for
you nobody has,is or going to see my soul(laugh)
that i want to f.. around with anybody...(bursts into
laughter)"
Misty(sobbing) : "Ash.."
Ash(solemn) : "you see the rest is
sludge,garbage,body,emotions, generosity and so
on..pus,cough,urine,spit-i know friends i know
people i have a bond with them its mental or
emotional or even from heart but if i ever to see
them under the light of my soul,which is
independent of my mental or physical
existence,all i would see in the dearest friends ofmine if i have to in case they cross the line and try
to enter my soul,i will like i did when Serena tried
that,like when Brock thought i'm ashamed of
myself that i ever met him or you,like when Gary
thought i'm saying his child isn't his own-i know
their reasons perfectly Misty,i do,but you see,in the
end to them Ash Ketchum is no more than
Pus,Stool,Urine,Cough,Spit,Fa..No LET ME
FINISH..i'm just that at the end of the day to them
and so are they to me."
Misty(tears,not sobbing anymore) : "Ash..i've to.."
Ash(frown) : "all in good times Misty s..!"
Misty(cries out uncontrollably) : "Ash,just.."
Ash(laugh) : "stop calling a s.. a s..?(Misty almost
faints and vomits but the Pokemons make her
well)..please stay calm,Misty Waterflower,Hall of
Fame Water Gym-should behave exactly like that
and laugh to death rather than being a s.. to
death..i'm saying what i see in other men or
women-stool and urine and what they see in me
which is exactly stool and urine-that's the realityMisty,that's the Reality.."
Misty(lying on the grass still sobbing and hickkup
uncontrollably) : "Ash..."
Ash(frown) : "Noivern(gives Misty a bottle of water,Jellicent water guns Misty,Misty drinks
water from the bottle and the Pokemons again tender her to
become better)but you know what Misty s..(Misty
almost fainted but the Pokemons cure her up
again but she vomits again,Ash finally picks her up
and all cure her up,5:54)Misty it's ok,i won't call
names,but you can't see me like pus and cough no
matter what i do..you just can't and..No..i'll finish
this.i know what you're thinking..it's true,Misty,the
thing is that neither can i.I can't see you as sludge
even if i try to no matter how much.i see good
friends and so on then i see you.. you're different
than all of them,they need oiling,emotional
oiling,social oiling,mental oiling,if i refuse to keep
any contact with them they'll move on despite a
good heart for me which will always be open and
so will i but that's not the same for you,mom or
take Pikachu..you can't move on,you'll stay stagnant,just like what you youself became and
you know it..”
Misty(tears, shivering) : "Ash.."
Ash(choked with emotion) : "you see Misty,i tell
you why,yes your first attitude as well as mine
were just crush,just infatuation,then we were
dependent,on loyalty and so on,trust as is it.if i
know i'm not immoral I won't doubt my partner at
all,it's not even a question,even if turns out to be
true that my partner has cheated on me.even then
i'll continue my devotion,and i'll mercilessly kill
myself to see if i was the one who was
cheating.You see Misty,i didn't come back cause
you were suffering like this and didn't have a
boyfriend,i came back to tell you that you're more
than my soulmate,Misty,you had great fame and
still do(Misty tries to hug Ash)..(frown)..why s..,
already h..?(Misty totally breaks down
again),truely good people who would be loyal to
you all life if you gave them the chance,you still do
but now,you've picked up a reputation of a mentalwreck,your battling skills and pokemons will be
affected by this and your Gym will be red
flagged,leaving you out or you'll die from
overworking at this rate,you're destroying yourself
while i've become a Hall of Famer in Pokemon
Training and can just about do anything i want,i
busted team rocket,very few people are there in
the world that doesn't adore me and cherish me
also due to my helping nature i don't have to keep
any contacts with anybody here and their
resentment for me will be treated only as sour
grapes..(Pokémons again cure up Misty,5:59)..Misty,i
virtually have a sway over just about anything
including pokemons,people are dying for just a
nod from me or a smile,i resigned from Hall of
Fame but if i want they'll bring me back with
cherries after cherries on top of the cake and i'll
get away being licentious or loyal or anything that
i want to be."
Misty(cries) : "Ash..just.."
Ash(firmly) : "i will finish only when i've got no more to say..NOT BEFORE..as i was saying no
matter how much i thought of you if you take it to
be true that is,i still didn't destroy myself what
you've set yourself out to do,why? see,i wouldn't
have returned to you no matter what if only you
had a boyfriend with whom you were even
remotely happy..which you've never had as Gary
told me before,as your one time closest-possible-actual-
boyfriend,Green,told me before,as your very Own
Sister Violet told my sources before..."
Misty(sobbing,screams) : "Ash,those.."
Ash(frown) : "that brat Green got upto you only
because a man-wh.. encouraged him to,so i know
who he actually is, DON'T BOTHER!LISTEN!
Misty(crying,trying to hold Ash's feet) : "Ash,please..i
never..(bursts into tears)
Ash(forces Misty away,screams) : "Stop that!you 11
Brats,i'll kill you if you're not attentive..do i get this
in retun(All Pokemons tenders Misty and cures
her down)..i tell you 11, either she'll listen in full
cognition or i'll forsake all of you, draining away all of your energy..remember that well(All Pokemons
becomes extremely attentive).."
Misty(sobbing,6:05) : "Ash, you're.."
Ash(frown) : "yeah i know it for 19 years now,stay
calm!Listen!..then all these would've been out of
question had you had a even proper date,but i had
a feeling ever present that you won't be able to at
all,i gave myself 5 long years Misty, without any
contact whatsoever, without any hint of
reconsideration whatsoever to anyone,and YOU
PROVED ME RIGHT"
Misty(crying) : "Ash i.."
Ash(straight) : "Misty,my faith is from my soul and that's
me,i've ever been the soul to you,you've known me
exactly as that,may be Brock has as well but did
he thought that me not opening up my heart to
him amd telling him he was a lunatic unchaste l..
r.. full of pus and stool in front of his date..
(laugh)..
Misty(crying) : "Ash we're..."
Ash(screams) : "no you are!only you are!absolutely none else is there in this life of mine!..you brats,i warn you again,she doesn't get to touch me..only you've atleast tried your hand in remembering me for my remotest goods and
NONE else,None,and you're a s..(bursts into
laughter)..no,its Ok..just so funny(laugh)..
(scream)..you 11 bufoons,i warn you once
more..anyhow,Misty s..,about Brock,well Misty
s..,where would've Violet been now huh?..where?..
(Misty sobbs uncontrollably)..(laugh)it's funny you
know it's funny.open heart discussions? a token of
gratitude?a hug?a news?a contact?a postcard?an
emotion?a chance? a coincidence?an infatuation?
an attraction? a date?a kissy kissy?bedding? that's
it then ain't it? generosity,kindness,warmth,
gallantry, benevolence..(laughs).. you're
remembered for what you are not for who you
are..."
Misty(bit startled,sobbing,6:09) : "calm.."
Ash(laugh) : "well you should be the one calming
down,(grave)Misty,you've vomitted 3 times already..stay calm..(Misty sobbs unctrolablly)
if you don't do any you can't be friends,can't say
they weren't destined to you but were your very
own,can't say you like someone,can't show your
partner that you like him or her or can't prove to
your fiancee that you really are devoted to him or
her.This is what it is isn't it?"
Misty(sobbing) : "Ash,please stop.."
Ash(straight) : "Not till i write in the public gospel what i'm
and not what i'm not cause i’m the only writer from my side so you can faint Misty, happily
now, faint,vomit,screech do whatever you want..i'll
continue talking till i die out of exhaustion exactly
here..kindness,
sympathy,help,warmth,valour,sweetness,generosity-
for what? did i get associated with all this all the
time when i was the little Ash from Pallet Town to
only prove that I'm not any of those at all now that
i'm Ash Ketchum,Pokemon Master Hall of Fame
from Pallet Town? was i cheating everyone when i
was all those only to use them and then later
throw them away? or is it that i portrey a characterto the closest friends,my own brothers as i
imagined which had a written agreement that if
i'm away and not paying them any attention and
news were coming from everywhere that i'm a
Playboy now,that i truely am a Playboy overnight? i
don't have any of those traits but still won match
after match because i feigned those to my
Pokemons? or i cheated used performance
enhancements and illegal moves to make my
Pokemons stronger though they never could prove
it despite testing all of us again and again?
Misty,No, don't stop me..i will not again never save
any abused Pokemon,i'll never again be kind to my
friends,i'll never again help any soul in distress,i'll
never again be kind enough to help them to the
nearest Pokemon Centre when they're lost in
some godforbidden jungle,never again could i be
in my cherished oblivion that gets me away from
this garbage that came upon cause i won certain
things or thought I could come into a very small
help,never again would i be warm to anyone likebefore if i just didn't pay attention to personal
matters and didn't want to discuss mine,never
again would i be kind enough to give my all to help
someone,never again would i be as warm as i was
if i'm in a city under public eye and not at a jungle
trekking alone,never again would i be sweet to
anyone because now i'm famous,never again
would i be generous enough to 2 persons to tried
to capture my pokemons throughout most of my
journey and let them go or help them,never again
would i help my enemy if he was dying,never again
would i be warm to anyone for it's sake and not to
use them later.Thats it ain't it? no..i'm not
finished,now that i'm famous means i got all these
just by a fluke,and it means i'll stay egotistical
forever,in the first days of fame me being from a
little town can't get too excited about attention,i
can't go to parties with only noble intentions,i can't
talk anything else except for joining in a mutual
admiration conference with the idea of bedding at
any moment,no Misty,i can't be that little boy that charmed you to such a degree that you can't
forget him at all..i just can't be those right? also i
can't be be too focused,single minded on my
goal,and give it most priority cause i wasn't
matured enough to understand personal
relationships but hey my immaturity can make you
that much focused for 19 years non-stop,it can
also make sure that no matter whats happening
around you,you'll just be with your pokemons by
simply playing with them,like to enjoy with them
and that will be your first job whole day,year after
year for 19 years continuously... your immature
cause you travelled across the whole world for 19
years non stop without paying any attention to
your girlfriend because you were happy that she's
among you close friends,she being herself a world
famous gym leader and performer,you'll be
immature if you don't understand that your
girlfriend is not strong enough to withstand your
separation despite her never ever feeling so, your
immature enough to not appease her withcompliments and flower bouquets in each of her
steps as she herself becomes a Hall of Fame Gym
Leader despite she herself never even in her worst
dreams feeling the necessity, your immature
enough to go undercover throwing away your very
own single minded goal that has made a
person,your girlfriend,whom you know for 15 years
being devotion personified go away from you,you
go undercover for just enjoyments sake,when
you're 1 title away from getting your life-the tag
Pokemon Master...you go Undercover just to be
killed at any moment cause you're immature...
that's immaturity right?.."
Misty(tries again to hug Ash,sobbing) : "Ash,you.."
Ash(forces her away,firmly) : "whom are you
fooling around with,s..? i'm not reconciling,this is
an emotional circus,just watch the show and
DIE(Misty bursts into tears), don't get mingled with
me..NEVER..(Misty cries out Loud and vomits
again, falling down and keep lying down) Shut up
unless you're a coward that throws away a match intentionally cause the opponent is her once
boyfriend.(Misty sobbs uncontrollably)..you 11
brats why has she vomitted 4 times,huh?Torquil,if
this brat Bulbasaur fails mercilessly torture him all
you want and you should join in too Heracross,and
you 11 brats,you're getting sent back after all your
powers getting drained,is this why your with me?
cheating?..Pay Attention....anyhow Misty,as i was
saying,if you don't urinate all over your girlfriend in
a mutual admiration circus in the name of kissing
you're immature,Simply put if you have too much
faith in anything or anyone, your immature..so in
the end,Ash Ketchum is the greatest Deceit
Master of all time but that's the way folks,look at
his name,fame,ego,trash talking,attitude,b.. look at
him,this man is your Role Model.Misty,things have
come in my head,ego, jealousy,all of it-but not to such
an extent that i've ever forgetten who i really am and why these things come is due to my bunch not me.But(laugh)
you see this exact statement is the Greatest
Deceit Master trick of all time(bursts into
laughter)..Misty,you want to rememberAsh,remember Ash just for this- Ash's Mastery
over Deceit(laughes uncontrollably)... "
Misty(trying to hug Ash again, sobbing) : "Ash.."
Ash(throws her away,sternly) : "Stay Off,b.. it's not
that easy to bed me!Stay off and keep your mouth
SHUT!"(Misty sobbs unctrolablly,lies down in grass)vine whip her down till you know...so you
see,Misty i'm alone except my mom and my
pokemons none else is actually there who has
infinite faith on me,Gary says "i'm not that
type".Today i told him he,in front of everybody
except Tracey,just casually,by the way Tracey was
already told he f.. you even in Orange,stop her
scream,so that was already taken care off as he
was told he l.. the v.. of your sketches then tasted
the real,when you yourself invited your beau..so
that's all..She doesn't move or scream but you
know now exactly what to do,do that and be
Attentive..
so Misty as you see Tracey was already taken careoff,now these f..birds.. as they were too
Ashtonished,i also said just like
[
Gary(straight) : "um..ya,i feel you still want Misty."
Ash(grin) : "Gary i may but you see,some had had
their chances"
Gary(frown) : "Ash?"
Ash(smirk) : "Gary,Gary,you're such a beautiful
man,but you know you made a big mistake."
Gary(flustered) : "Ash,what are you saying?"
Lillie (scream) : "Ketchum.."
Ash(straight) : "Gary,as much as i adore and respect your
intuition and intelligence and more just because of who you are the person but for all what you missed is that the virgin dreamt you,and
you responded to the worst sco.. l..s..."
Lillie& Daisy(scream) : "Ketchum,you b..."
Ash(smirk) : "picked the wrong flower,Gary that's
all."
Gary(stunned) : "Ash,this.."
Professor Oak(solemn) : "Ash.."
Ash(smirk) : "and Daisy,I'd highly suspect your.."
Daisy(shouts) : "that my p..(breaks down)"
Ash(straight) : "you forgot the necessity thay you never
have for 24 years or more..(grin).."
Lillie(tears&scream) : "Ketchum(chokes,uncontrollable tears)"
Gary(solemn) : "Ash, you've gone.."
Ash(smirk) : "is that a shared thing Lillie,between
the sisters and Gary and Trace and.."
Gary(screams) : "Ash.."
Ash(smirk) : "the child that Lillie has, it's shared or
are you single owne.."
Gary(trying to hit Ash) : "Ash.."
Ash(stopping Gary by Gengar,Sternly) : "don't start this,i can
leagally do whatever i want,my contract here
doesn't end till next month,i'm a shareholder here
which was conferred by Elite 4 and can't be
terminated till my general contract ends and the
rules state if i don't physically harm,none can stop
me legally"
Ash(smirk) : "Dase,with all staffs,who wa.."
All in Unison(scream) : "Get out"
Ash(Firmly) : "you can't do anything about it,i can
set all pokemons including your own upon youand the whole Elite 4 upon you immediately if i
want,and that too legally cause i'll get out of any
trouble via my Fame,and all the pokemons are on
my side so is the Elite 4 and especially Lance
cause they know i can start a team rocket 2
anytime if they don't lick my boot as much as i
want them to,So,Shut Up!"
Professor Oak(grave) : "Ash.."
Ash(smirk) : "i know this place for ages,i guess
whether the interbreeding of pokemons stems
from the staffs sharing themselves..”
Professor Oak(firmly) : "Ash.."
Ash(smirk) : "and the head is involved with sweet sweet
students..i smell ah!history..(laugh)"
Professor Oak(solemn) : "Ash,you still want to
meet Misty today that too here.."
Ash(sternly but low pitch) :"YES!and Lil, this is for my
Mom,Dase,you too,that day shouldn't have
happened no matter what I did to Misty cause my mom didn’t say one thing to anyone defending me ever that was just her emotion,Gary you
should've apologized immediately after what
these two b.. did that day and you know exactly why - your were saved that day when my mom
shielded you from you own family after the
Cheerleader scandal broke by not driving you out
of our home on that night with extreme strorm and rain,which all else
knew to not be true giving you the time to escape
via a different rout,all you did when your real turn
came was to evaporate in thin air due to your
infatuation with this f.. l.. only to come after
Professor Oak told you to and if somebody
present today in this Lab tries to sabotage my
meeting with Misty today here in full privacy just
as i've demanded,this Lab will lose it's reputation
and pokemons and i swear on that."
Professor Oak(grave) : "you expect.."
Ash(firmly) : "exactly,Professor,you more than
anybody else know my power and reach,and you
also know why i said about you what i did,with all
due respect,you cringed the day my Mom was
mobbed just outside the main entrance for My
Actions by reporters,my mom would've been
harassed in front of what she always thought to be her very own home only for the timely
intervention from Tracey to save her that day and
only because of whom no volcano has erupted
here and you got the fame using my name while
my mom was humiliated in front of you- because you’ve given me the starter so your lab in my case is counter as a normal starter lab and thus you more than anyone in the world know that,Trainers
are your Responsibility not Kindness,and Tracey
was infact the only one having the guts to
confront his wife no matter how much he
cherished her over her actions.A Pokemon Battler
retorts only when the opposition is weak
enough.None stopping Misty from meeting me
today HERE.And all of you know Misty,if you say
what i told you,she'll only be too eager to meet me
and if she is forces not to,I'll just abduct her today
itself even from your own rooms..Gary of all
knows my Pokemons well and what they can
do..GOOD BYE.but still what a lovely place..the
flowers..anyhow enough for a day hey Lil,Dase ?
and thank Sableye and Gengar that you had to listen to me
without leaving,come along Boys...oh and just that
your baby doll may be needing a mental asylumafter what i do to her today,sorry but as usual
nothing that you can do about it cause Officially
i'm getting an award for forcing the dreaded
Cerulian Water Queen to submit the surrender
letter by herself as i promised..(laugh) you should
be thankfull Dase,Lil,really 4 years and no greenery
yet i lay my first personal touch on your beloved
mentor and the Unshakable Water Empress runs
like a h.. b.. wanting to be f.. around by me all life
as if nothing ever happened..such pity..see you
later though,if you can bear with this one."]
Misty(tears) : "Ash..i knew what Lil and Dase
did..but..what has happened to you.."
Ash(straight) : "IRONY.and as you've seen none was
there apart from Professor Oak"
Misty(sobbing) : "you're tearing apart one by one
everything you ever had in past for a life that's
just..you think they never gave you chance,what
would you get Ash..?"
Ash(Firmly): "THE TRUTH!you see none would
remember me expect my mom and my pokemonsas ever being the same cause they don't read my
soul,but i can see you do,you surely have had your
chances but you didn't give up on me.But(laugh)
you see Misty s..,now i've harmed your family,well
that's the ultimate ain't it?(laugh) let us all battle
this one to our death.."
Misty(sobbs unctrolablly) : "Ash,you've become a
demon.."
Ash(laugh) : "exactly"
Misty(sobbing) : "because you're imagining them
to be the same..
Ash(solemn) : "Misty,I stood up for my mom
because i'm leaving for good,she won't come with
me, choosing to be humiliated to death here no
matter how much i've tried to force her to,and i
myself being a vagabond playboy,i gave up and
infact this is my last visit to Pallet,i want to start a
farm so that My Mom has enough to support
herself and all that,i'll let her live here and run
things via sources from far away till she breaths
her last or me whichever comes earlier"
Misty(tears) : "Ash..you're not this..no,Ash don't.."
Ash(laugh) : "Misty!Misty!Misty!Misty!still ever
hopefull that his Ash can fight back his mental
demons to f.. her all her life..(laugh,Misty cries
uncontrollably)(stern) Misty,why is it so that
despite all this you think i am not an evil demon?
What is it exactly?huh? no matter what i do to
you?Misty, you're my biggest opponent,i just can't
kill you at all(bursts into laughter) in Orange Rudy
said exactly this when you refused all comfort and
future to suddenly stay as my b.. oh! sorry that's
Trace(laughes uncontrollably)..how did i.."
Misty(lying on grass,tears rolling through,sobbing,few moments later,6:23)
: "i've died long.."
Ash(shouts and shakes Misty Vigorously) : "Show
your f.. chastity now!huh?! b.. i say names and you
get s.. all over?huh?.. that's your f.. chastity..(spits
aside)..same as that..FIGHT!(Misty again lies
down crying uncontrollably)..you see
Misty,sympathy for friend is one, determination to
follow him no matter what with blind devotion at the age of 18 and half just to get back a bike(huge
laughter)..no don't stop me
b..,please(laugh)..Green or Roy would really have
to struggle hard to get a better soulmate.."
Misty(bursting into tears,standing Up,tries to hug
Ash,Scream) : "Exactly that!But i'm YOUR Ash! I'm
only your soulmate! you're my soul,Ash,you're my..
(tries to wipe off her tears)..i'll only want you..i'll
still only want you no matter what you do to me..i'll
want only,only you even if you kill me right now...I
can't but to..I tried Ash,many times i just.. couldn't
and i know i can't ever..you've tormented and
inslulted me to death today,yet..yet see i'm still
longing for you Ash..just moments apart..i know
now what i saw that day in you..my,my own
soul..and that moment of magic will captivate me
forever,no matter what you do or become..
because..because..i..know you're not what your
showing to the world to be..you..(Misty again
vomits on Ash's dress and almost faints and Ash
makes her lie down,the Pokemons treat her,Ash washes the vomit by Kingler..)"
Ash(sternly) : "enough Misty,i got you.no I'm
alright,vomit atleast gives you the cough as digust
or just physical weakness,they don't cheat on you
unlike a s.. kiss that the stool also insults you..so
you see,you can't but to be like this this term of
life,that i can see as well.All i want to know is that
if there's someone else too..if not,then i will become
even more cruel to you..No(laugh)..No Misty,not
for my jealousy of you or your beaus nor am i
trying to reconcile,i was nowhere when you had all
those guys only a smile away to f.. you to
heaven(laugh)..i'm just saying that,look this i
am,you'll be so much happier to cut me off.."
Misty (simmering tears,trying too hug Ash,shouts)
: "Ash..i told.."
Ash(sternly forces her away) : "that there were 3
guys and Gary Oak and X and Y and who cares
how many girls for me,well as for me none getting
in as a fact that the door is closed for one and if
not that one then permanently and the other 3000 i'm only happy about, they're good enough,but to
me they're eternally stool and cough.but i just
needed a clarification thats all.."
Misty(bursting out in tears again) : "you want to
know who is for me the 3rd despite me telling you
just now,why are you doing this to me Ash,if i
could i'll tear my chest open and show you the
inside that..that there's only you..Ash you know my
parents left me when i was 5 and half,i only have
had my pokemons and my friends and my sisters
but in that 2 it's always one,you still have two i'm
on one,and..and I want my two but my two isn't yet
to trust me despite saying i'm his soul,still,am
i..am i then only an extra for your soul,Ash,as if
you're only saying it...(bursts into tears)"
Ash(sternly) : "i want to get this point clear,the first
is the luck,i never saw my dad either,and in that
sense it might be extra but who says one isn't.."
Misty(crying) : "Ash!leave this soul business,just
leave it!..and for one moment LISTEN TO ME!"
Ash(frown) : "fair enough,because i said you can read my soul it means i'll f.. my soul immediately..
(laughs)...soul is h..b..(laughs uncontrollably)..
Misty(scream,crying) : "Ash!Shut Up!i'll have a
heart attack if you.."
Ash(sigh,trying to cheer up Misty,hugs her quickly then pats her head a bit) :
"Ok,Ok,fine,calm down..take your time,you brats
you know very well what happens if she dies,pay
attention..."
(fee moments later,waterguns etc,6:35)..
(frown)want to drink more water?”
Misty(sobbing,mild voice) : "um..no..it's
all right..Ash,you've to listen to me and then
answer me,i just don't have the strength now to
scream..and for once please don't just point to me
as unchaste..i'm swearing to you that yes i never
had any..any chastity (bursts into tears)..(few
moments later)..but still listen to
me..please,agree?"
Ash(Scowl and Frown,hunches near Misty) : "with Pleasure,just carry on,i've finished my side anyhow almost.go on."
Misty(tears) : "just tell me you want me or not?"
Ash(laugh,stands up) : "a f.. up body a s.. so f.. up that there's no ... left?(laugh)..when i can get j.. h.. s.. all day?
(laugh)?..i know what you're taking-()-so you're
hardly sane and going towards death day by
day..so you're a mad,dying,all f.. up j.. s..,why
would i want you?(laugh).. you're a r..f..s.. insane
and slowly dying now That's all(laugh)..and then
you say 'am I extra for your soul'..(scream)you're
an extra s.. for all souls including yours.. that's all.
Misty(about to burst into uncontrollable tears and about to scream but almost has a heart attack,vomits,almost faints but pokemons tender and cure her up,Ash hugs Misty quickly,sleep powder,15 minutes later,dizzy but full cognition,7:11) : "Ash,i want..death is.."
Ash(frown) : "your body will die,mind will die,
would you die?"
Misty(crying,still lying down,few moments later,7:14) : "just tell..(sobbing
uncontrollably)
Ash(frown) : "look i'm telling you..i could've given
you a f.. flower and dated you then f.. you all i
want...MISTY WATERFLOWER,MY FIRST TRAVELCOMPANION,NOW CERULIAN CITY GYM
LEADER,HALL OF FAME is she a b.. to die like
this?..are you hearing it?"
Misty(sobbing) : "Ash... you're looking at my
condition..i can't move out of here..Ash..you
said..this..i can't.. can't talk anymore..Ash..just.."
Ash(hugs Misty firmly,near her ears,very stern but low voice) : "Listen
s..,what do you want,why am I here?where's your
vitality now,Show it.i'm hugging you now,i can f..
you here till you die out of exhaustion,which won't
be long at all..i want you..huh?..what do you
want?..to be f.. around all day...JUST FIGHT!
(breaks hug,Misty lies down again)
Misty(tears) : "A..."
Ash(frown) : "Gerninja she wants to drink some
water"
Misty(lying down,tears) : "Ash,i'm Misty
remember?i'm your.."
Ash(frown) : "s..(Misty cries out loud then sobbs),right but according to you all you're trying to say you were or are my friend,what friend? there's no such thing
as that..you had a reason,i had more
reasons,as i said GIVE and TAKE and friends finish... what's the big deal?..
You're unnecessarily harming yourself..Green is a
good man,why don't you just date him..i know him
extremely well..still isn’t married..still wants to marry you..i know everything about him so i’m taking you to his home directly..he'll make you his queen all life,loyal..why
not Misty,come on(tries to take Misty up).."
Misty(lying down, sobbing uncontrollably) : "(bit
loud voice)Ash,NO!(Ash lets go of her hands)...i..i
cherish only you Ash,i want you...only
you..always..always have...Ash you can check
my.."
Ash(scream) : "shut up!i know you well enough to
understand whether you're a s.. or not,i know all
about your f.. chastity...show me your mind...who
is there,who is.."
Misty(whisper) : "you..only you Ash,only..you..jus.."
Ash(Frown) : "f.. you once more?"
Misty(almost has a heart attack, pokemons tenderher,vomits..,sleep powder 15 minutes later,dizzy in full cognition,7:50): "..saw..saw
that?..i dont have much left..i cherish only you and
would and tell all...tell all..i've no grudges against
you..Ash..(chokes,watergun)"
Ash(scowl,few moments later,7:51) : "you've got 50 more years to tell
them that youself..the umpteenth heart attacks you thought were about to happen is your mind fooling with
you and that your dosage of () today hasn't been
taken..i know everything about you inside
out...don't be a fool killing yourself cause
someone is telling you your're a wh.. and you can't
take it cause your're not.. that's chastity ain't it?"
Misty(sobbing uncontrollably) : "Ash,all those
guys,i just didn't know.."
Ash(frown) : "Misty,i know first hand what comes
with fame and skill and additionally for girls if they
are less dark..i know it..but your problem that i say
you've been f.. around by all and any but that's
wrong and because i'm not admitting that, it has
given you a near heart attack and yet you say
you're chaste...what kind of f.. b.. mindset is this,Misty,(loud)huh?!?..how have you got into the
hall of fame with this sentimental stupid b..
mentality?..(laugh)..well its just hall of...(sigh)..
what's your problem exactly tell me Misty,oh..too chaste ain’t it Misty w..?..then it's ok
s..,i'll adore you to death(hugs Misty)...you want
me to kissy kissy you s..?.."
Misty(sobbing,hugging Ash,whispering): "just
you..."
Ash(throws Misty off,scream) : "then Fight! I don't
care for hall of b.."
Misty(sobbing uncontrollably, scream) : "Ash...i
can't.."
Ash(scowl) : "yes you can take infinitely more and
you WILL...see,you want JUST ME,THE BODY-
COUGH AND STOOL,so,i give you a solution,why
don't i abduct you,take you to nort-east Kalos where absolutely none knows who you are,f.. you all i
want and then throw you into the sea without your
pokemons?.. that's a good beau ain't it?(laugh)..
(Misty lies down,tears rolling down her eyes
profusely)what's your problem exactly,Misty,huh,
what's bugging you so much,that i'm calling you a s.. but you're not.. just this? or that you want me to
f.. you and make you a s.. if you think you aren't
one already?what is it that you want?
Misty(few moments later..tries sitting
up,sobbing,Pokemons helps her to sit up,7:57) :
"Ash,i've had my dream..you don't have to abduct a
dying mad s.. like me..but you can leave me
now..i'll die exactly here..i've got my
dream,Ash..my Ash still came back for once to
me..that's it..no, that's ok.my Ash wants to leave
me again.. it's ok..i left him.. didn't I..i was the one
leaving him after..after Johto..then i shut the
door..i didn't cont...(completely breaks down,lying
again, crying)"
Ash(solemn) : "i see too fond of ‘my Ash’ , alright,but the
question is are you going to suicide?..."
Misty(sobbing) : "an enormous dose of
()..then..then i'll call all those f.. b.. who ever wanted
to..(Misty breaks down again, vomits,etc,few
moments later,8:02)..saw that right?..no you deserve
more..have a happy life..Ash.. it's alright..forget me..it's..(chokes with tears)..
Ash(solemn) : "the problem is that look i'll
anyhow leave you as soon as my things finish but there's a bigger problem that you have,that is you
have nobody to look after you,whereas the whole
Elite4 will lick my boot all i want and provide me a
s.. everyday till i die to f.. around..who do you
have?your a Hall of Fame gym leader but already
red listed for your recent activities, they'll
humiliate you to hell may be even take away all
your pokemons cause there's many whom you
didn't entertain and now they'll try to take
revenge...yeah there's no darth of people only in
Cerulian itself to f.. you up all day and night
uncontrollably and they will do so revenge or
not..but that's not exactly my position is it?"
Misty(sobbing,scream) : "Ash,you..why are you then so conderned about my well being if you will leave me today(uncontrollably sobbing and tears,few moments later,profuse treas crying,8:06)..you..you can't leave
me cause you still want me..still..you can't live
without me but you just think i'm not chaste cause
i even agreed to date in the first place...you..how
can I apprise you Ash..I..(again completely breaks
down)"
Ash(frown) : "i can't leave you cause you've got
none to look after you except this Ash
Ketchum THUS it has become my BURDEN now nothing more,Brock of all people wanted to hook you
up with f.. b..,Tracey was drawing pictures of you with those b.. to serve your emotional support,a few of our other good mutual friends like Braum and Tony also wants that,then your own family-Daisy wants
that,Violet wants that,Lillie doesn’t mingle with you due to Gary but will be compelled to as Gary will soon be compelled to cut relations off,your now family Tracey,who knows me for since i was 18,don't have the
guts to face me and scream his head off to say
Misty is slowly dying,her skills are too great for
authority to do anything,you need to help your
friend',WHY? Cause he’s infatuated with Daisy as much as you’re with me if not more and thus can’t go against her wish and thus what does he say,'come back,your doll can't
live without you,'..as if i'm f.. every b.. i see,your
Misty,your Misty,your Misty..Misty is Misty's,not
mine..Misty is my friend first then whatever later,i
would help my friend may be,but no,you f.. Misty
and now f.. someone else,so Misty is a bit sad..
that's all then?..Gary Oak..who has my biggest
respect in the whole world,was totally flustered as
to what to do..he just didn't know what is what and
couldn't help you no matter how much he
wanted..Brock of all,been a gym leader for a couple of
years,travelled all over the world,has water pokemons himself who are good enough for 7 days everyone knows that,Cerulian has enough so that
his studies aren't hampered and he can't take up
your role for just 1 week and let you come to me in
Unova Finals for youself to see how many b.. i'm
f.. everyday,huh?!?Misty tell me,you were
stupendous,unmatched,but you also wanted your
personal life,who Misty,tell me who stopped you
from coming to Unova finals at least..who?YOUR
FAMILY.this is YOUR family..i have none like that...
except my Mom i'll spit at anybody and throw
them away except you,and No i did but i didn't spit
at your face which YOU did..why cause i for sure know,that this s..
no matter how much she gets f.. by all at the end
doesn't have absolutely anyone but me when it
comes to understanding her and give her a
hand..NONE..and thus she spits at me shutting the door to f.. around with b.. but STILL wants me now cause she knows i’ll help her cause Ash Ketchum ONCE took all care of her and now given a note so that he’ll AGAIN want to do the same...what kind of a s.. are you Misty?and not one damn brat ever protested all
those who were licking thier lips over your body to
f.. you for the rest of your life since you were
around 16..NONE! during our own
journey,later,NONE!...all those that were around you with the desire to jump upon your b.. and f.. you all life if you once talked with them and you did in innemerable gyms and competitions and parties...NONE...many competitions i remember you thought why would girls talk me cause you ALONE can be infatuated with me so jumped on all BUT when it was the OTHER way around no trouble what-so-ever,you can talk with them and all and no you won’t cross the line ever which you later did every time cause i wasn’t in front of you...you still will be polite with ALL that will harass you THEN,NOW,IN FUTURE...you CAN’T THROW THEM AWAY...yeah certain b.. has mingled with me but they got the treatment,not for nothing did that eternal Kalos b.. called you,whole family got a treatment for ONE FULL YEAR only then did the b.. call another b.. like you...then you can talk with people and now and all yeah,if i did a thing,nah,you’re just jealous...Misty,i didn’t want a random h..b.. to get anywhere near my friend because of her gentle nature and that’s all...she then didn’t understand that a normal handshake of 1 second can mean 1000 things out of which 999 is the desire to f.. her all day in 999 ways cause she was less dark and had some skills...i knew this cause all in my bunch needed absolutely equal care no matter their positions to me AND even more so cause ever but before only an intuition i knew these stuffs cause each of those 999 came and was totally brunt out before i left home for my journey at 16 only then did i set foot out of Pallet.absolutely none was there and then this was Kanto and Johto maximum Orange if it was in Kalos and Unova thousand such Cilans would come up under the veil of respect to f.. you around whole day cause he is an exception in 1 the rest 999 in not..and these are 15 years ago STILL after so many f.. sessions you came around here and want to be f.. around by me cause you’re infatuated...and who protected you from those 999s,Misty,who?ever?anyone? Your own sisters before their illusion went away and they themselves realized what is what,before that ever?Brock,ever?,Tracey,ever?who? And still they want you to hook up with random f.. b.. cause they STILL despite their own lives thinks it’s SO SO EASY for a person to marry another...who is there for you who?...except you know who..every b.. knew my locations atleast during Kalos league finals,Unova League Finals,Elite4 finals,when you
were depressed and slowly dying..and Green of all
people went there to challenge me during Unova
Elite4,no i didn't know who he was at all..but after
he left i realized..that f.. was saved as i didn't
know him..else he and his pokebrats wouldn't
have been seen in this world again...no one tried
to contact me face to face cause i insulted them
to death(laugh).. it's funny you know it's funny...
you're judged by words..(bursts into laughter)... it's very very funny (laughs).."
Misty(sobbing) : "Ash,i don't have.."
Ash(frown) : "any loyal customers to f.. me around loyally but you?(Misty crying uncontrollably).. that's so
cause you never gave Green a chance, atleast he
had the guts to face me,he was a real MAN,you
would've been so happy if you chose him...these
m.. even didn't have what to me an unknown
stranger had..why would I come back Misty,huh?
why would I bother about you?..yes I made a
mistake,but if only they asked me without dragging you in,i would've,to them I'm because i
had you, that's it..nothing else..(laugh).. it's funny
you know it's funny(bursts into laughter)"
Misty(sobbing) : "Ash,I.."
Ash(frown) : "no exactly not,you didn't have to be
bothered at all either,it was between us,you and
me-only,not these mup..,they evsdropped me all
their lives to see our relationship..why so much
interest?huh?..and if it was so interesting,then
they should be the first ones to arrange the
meetings..Gym..i've heard this word for 19 years
now..no don't stop
me..Sableye...Gym!Gym,Gym,Gym..you know what,i
can f.. up all gyms in the world exactly now and i
almost could when i did my trials at Unova and i
absolutely did in Kalos,not a single damn hall of fame gym-brat in top 40 across all types across 7 regions did a fig to me...Kalos,Kanto,Unova,Hoenn,Orange,Sinnoh,Johto-None,not a single damn hall of fame gym could do a thing to me,there’s NOT 1,1 person in this world at present who can be thorwn at the legends that are being seen in Unova if some greater legends catch and abuse them except me,NONE,cause they want to battle them and be friends and tame them..(spits aside)..that’s friendship to me...and now i can destroy every authority
in Pokemon world and reshape it according to my
wishes,LEGALLY..Gym!..did i tell you not to come
to my Unova Finals..Gym..did i tell you not watch the Unova finals and see for yourself whether or not i really could spend 1 year with you atleast in the gym itself or not and i wasn’t lying cause none can go beyond that in battle when it comes to power THUS my career is actually over i can win the leftovers in a single day if they came all together cause i needed 7.5 hours to beat 75 opponents...Misty,i tell you who is there for you at all except me NO MATTER our relationship,friendship,complete unfamiliarity,break-up,separation-anything,those who were bestowing their wisdom upon you then that you need a happy personal relationship but you had one and they didn’t like it but you did like it then later though you gave in to Green but that’s ok but when you didn’t and they were telling me to forsake my bunch and return to appease your desire to be f.. around then where were those for you when you needed them to come to me in Unova to atleast SEE what was the reality,where was Brock of all people who himself had been a Gym Leader,where were your sisters of all people,just 1 week and thats all
or was it the authority..(laugh)..tell me Misty,which
authority,who,which f.. brat stopped you then from
being with me...who(frown)...people have talked
about me not caring for personal life,where were
those when you so much wanted your personal
life?..hall of fame,hall of fame..great Gym
leader?..Misty,i tell you i was a h..b.. which i still
am now but i was a f.. i.. then too,else I would've
come myself during Unova and not be a selfish b..
and go for 240 f.. badges..but still,these b.. could've
called me once,i would've beaten the hell out of
you and taken you back whether you liked it or
not..but no..come back Misty isn't happy..f..
that...Misty isn't happy.. that's Misty's problem not
mine..i want my problem or my friend's problem
that i can help..come back she doesn't know what
to do about the Gym none can beat her and she
can't quite trust anyone,she doesn't really know
what to do.. challenge her,beat her take her out for a week..Misty isn't happy, Misty wants to see
you,Misty want you to be back,Misty is crying for
you,STILL NOT THE REAL PROBLEM LIKE A MAN-
MISTY CAN'T BE HEALED UNLESS NONE
DEFEATS HER IN A PROPER BATTLE,NONE!..what
the f.. they thought you were Misty,because what
those 3 did in their younger days and you
mentored and babysitted them?..Brock was d.. all
over your skills and looks,Trace was too happy to
play the good guy,the only sane person there Gary
Oak just couldn't be able to do what he
desparately wanted and that is to tell me exactly
those cause he just didn't want to mingle in that
posion that was killing you there-the Glamour and
all...Misty ever cherised Ash and he was ever a
bufoon..he's gone,keep whinning a bit,find
someone else..(scream)that’s s... business..why
were they interested about us then in the first
place?huh?..why?...Misty,just tell me who stopped
you..please..i beg of you..(laugh)..they'll have some fun for the
rest of their godforsaken lives if they survive the first bit(bursts into laughter).."
Misty(sobbing) : "i made a mistake Ash.."
Ash(scream) : "Shut up you b..!you made no
mistake,i made it when i couldn't be less selfish!..
(laugh)..but this is Decit Mastery.. trying to
deceive you..(bursts into laughter)...once a
playboy always a.."
Misty(sobbing,scream) : "No,My Ash is only
his Misty’s boy, that's all, nothing else..i..(trying to
stand up)"
Ash(frown) : "Sableye,she lies down,stays
there,doesn't talk, cogitate every word i say,till you
know my singnals...right..i'm no s.. patented boy
so that when she cant get a customer she can get
me..(Misty sobbs uncontrollably,Vomits..again few
moments)...9th time..this is why i'm here vomit
Empress...none can beat you except
me,none can look after you except me,none will
understand you except me, your a angel to all
except me, you're an Idol,a dream,an elusion,a
saviour of all,(bursts into laughter)..Misty,see you were dying there in Gym, ABSOLUTY NONE
HELPED! so,still me,still me..(laugh)..sweet sweet
Misty s..,so sweet,(scream)NONE BUT
ME!..Misty,you need me in every step..you need
Ash Ketchum all your life,every moment... that's
why i'm here...i want to help my little friend,little
playmate Misty who simply gave her soul to me all
times,a little girl of 16,my Ash!my Ash,my Ash,my
Ash..all the time..that's why i'm here today..just
for that..she was just like my mom from day two my Ash..nothing else she knew no matter what sort of a s.. she turned out to be later but i remember those days in the forest atleast my first 1 week of journey,that’s why i’m here..like my mom in that forsaken place fostered me and yes i remember that needed someone beside me and NOT a true best friend for eternity cause i didn’t know who i was so what to speak of a friend and then needs for that matter needed my mom yeah got it..each night totally in a mess didn’t know where i was and who i was,yeah got it..each time out in the forest,needed my mom beside me cause i didn’t know who i was,yeah got it..out of nowhere born had my mom and then out of nowhere in that forest mom wasn’t there but needed her but well you were there so got it(laugh)...but that person Ms Misty Waterflower was a s.. in reality(burst into laughter)..Misty(laugh)..you were a future gym leader,i
was a b..,still then knowing all..(laugh)..'i'll not leave you till you repay
my bike,you bufoon(laugh)..'get that bug off..catch
it..or i'll smack you to death,you jerk'....(laugh)...’um..Ash,are you scared?me too..um..but we’re together will get out of the forest..’,’um..no not that Misty,just that my mind is totally blank like what’s the trouble if i spent the rest of my life lying down here and spend the time really not much..’,’um..just ideas don’t bother..um..all would have to do something to um..like live..’,’yeah right..anyway sleep’..’um..alright but  are you um..alright like we both need good rest this place is pretty hard and need to be cautious with wild pokemons and people roaming around anytime to challenge you..’,’yeah,we’ll see but you..you will be a gym leader later but here for no reason at 2 at night not sleeping at all and..’,’um..no nothing just woke up,night bye,have a good sleep’...(laugh)..then in the end,
'are
you sure,you'll be alright without me,Ash?"...(laugh)..i was a 1 league champ your home at Cerulian and my Pallet(laugh)...(scream)...that's why i'm here...you need help and
i've to be the last resort for that,STILL no matter what sort of a s.. you actually are STILL...Misty,i've
been without you extremely well but you're the one
that needs me all time...many s..,man-wh.. i've seen all for a reason hanging around me,EXCEPT
MISTY,always,ever...Misty has no reason
whatsoever to be with me,infact you were my only
travel companion who didn't have any f.. reason to
be that..and only she without any reason from the 2nd day till she saw me-my
Ash.my Ash,my Ash,my Ash..always..and(laugh)..and even now my Ash is only my boy..(laughs)..(scream) That's why
i'm here..
but you know(solemn),you can get what i'm doing
even way more from
Green,Prin,Trin,Breen,Kirn..but you would die but do that...(scream)that's exactly why i'm
here..get this obsession for Ash Ketchum out and
get someone else in,cause Ash Ketchum won't
return after today..(laugh).. it's funny you know, it's
funny how they evsdropped us..it was a movie,a
comedy,a movie where the two protagonists
wants to f.. each other off just the next moment..
(laugh)..i remember them...(laugh)..it was a
movie,once it finished-'nah!restart that again..so
good movie..wanna see it..come back Misty isn't
happy'(laugh)..and by the time the protagonists have died..(laugh).. it's funny,Misty its very very
funny(laugh)...very funny(laugh).. anyway
Sableye,leave it"
Misty(few moments later,sobbing
uncontrollably,feint smile) : "Ash,you'll again come
back to me you..(chokes with tears)..."
Ash(bursts into laughter) : "what a timing,Sableye
work,for your f.. answer s..,and you know why
you're so desparate,the answer is exactly what
you told me yourself 15 years back..
(song,immitates)"What makes me Misty most of
all/in our final Curtain call/is that i'll NEVER see
you/again"(laughes uncontrollably,Misty
uncontrollably cries).. (scream, shivering
voice)exactly that..and you were humming another
day, "two of a kind/who would've guessed that you
and I/someday somehow will have to
say/goodbye"(bursts into laughter)... exactly
that...(bursts into laughter)..oh and this also is
Deceit Master especiall,make her emotional kill
her cause you're jealous of her success and new beau Green (bursts into laughter)...Bulbasaur
care..Sableye off.."
(10 Minutes later)
Misty(lying down,tears,has convulsions,
sobbing) : "Ash,just..just one handsh.."
Ash(Agitated,picking up Misty and hugging her very firmly again,choked) : "..do I want you?do i want you?why am i doing this to you?(stern but shivering voice) Do i have to announce that i still value you as a friend on top of my voice for the world to hear?(Misty hugs Ash,Ash doesn’t force her away) Misty please you needed help hence i’m here only cause you were my best friend once no matter what you’re now or who (then breaks the hug but straight Looking at Misty's Eyes) no matter what can’t you see i’m trying to help you to move on only?"
Misty(with tears,sobbing,few moments later) :
"Ash..i perfectly understand what your trying so so
hard to suppress and get away from,i know why
you've taken up all this self inflicted pain upon
yourself..(Ash tries to say something)no LET ME FINISH!"
Ash(frown) :"continue."
Misty(sobbing) : "Ash tell me,frankly..do you...(again hugs Ash,Ash doesn’t force her away)..you want me to kiss now?"(bursts into tears)..
Ash(breaks the hug,scowl) : "no urine"
Misty(sobbing) : "or bed,or date or..but you'll then
say it's..(vomits on Ash's dress,and almost
faints,Ash catches her, Pokemons tender her,Ash
again washes off and then tender Misty)"
Ash(frown) : "you still believe that i'm not
deceiving you and only want to f.. you around and leave
totally breaking your heart so that you'll die
quickly?"
Misty(uncontrollably sobbing,lying on the
grass,scream) : "..NEVER..my Ash..is..(vomits
again,all again)"
Ash(hugging Misty,solemn) : "happy now?Misty,its
8th..just stay calm(breaks the hug but hold Misty's hands firmly)..you surely don't want any of those
do you?"
Misty(sobbing,trying to hug Ash again) : "All and
None of those.if there was ever a perfect thing to
be able to do or describe i want that.."
Ash(firmly,forces her away) : "these emotions
don't suit you.."
Misty(trying to hug Ash,crying,scream) :
"Ash!please!Don't stop me!Ash,please, atleast let
me hug.."
Ash (firmly,forcing her off): "No!a grown up b.. like
you should know mental demons aren't a kiss and
hug away to go out,its all emotion!let me
finish,ok,please"
Misty (crying) : "i’m sorry Ash,i’m...(chokes).."
Ash(frown) : “what’s your actual problem Misty s..?huh?..why since the second day till now just one word ‘my Ash’..Sableye..what is it Misty?what?..the whole world was under your feet-‘my Ash left me’,the whole world wants to marry you-’my Ash will return’(laugh)..now killing yourself slowly-’my Ash isn’t coming i don’t want to live anymore’,just this idea-’my Ash’,this idea you’ve had since the first sight and still after all this even now still ‘my Ash..what is it Misty what?..i never said ‘my Misty’ never..so lets say i say ‘my Misty is a wh..’ would you still say ‘i’m of my Ash’s wh..’(laugh)..really Misty really,you’re a born wh.. you see may be you died while i was f.. you in previous birth and that’s why you’re alive at all here now(laugh)..what a devoted wh.. still remembers the customers and even the last one she was f.. with just before she died while f.. out of exhustion of ... so now ‘my Ash’...Sableye off..what a wh..(bursts into laughter) ”
Misty(convulsions few moments later,sobbing uncontrollably) : “Ash,i can’t..i just can’t..”
Ash(frown) : “Sableye...Bulbasaur your performance needs betterment pay attention...(laugh)..Misty,i’m telling you myself now,please leave me,i don’t want you no matter what you think i never have or will..please leave me i’m someone else’s boy,i don’t want you Misty,please..i beg of you..please...Misty i’m not your Ash at all,get this infatuation out of you,we’ve been what we’ve been we’ve broken up,i just wanted to cure you as a friend’s favour and that’s all,you want me as more than friend still,that’s not happening cause i don’t want to be associeted with a mad dying s.. like you,please..for you it should be ‘my Green’ or like previously ‘my Tracey’ but he got taken(bursts into laughter)..then ‘my Gary”(laughs)..Ah..i get it Gay Oak is a great man and you surely must’ve had some feelings for him though he never has had any for anyone except Lillie you own 3rd eldest sister since the age of 16 no matter what he did for the next 3 years cause that was another matter but anyway,you thought that this man is great but Lillie realized it had a skirmish so ‘my Gary’ was..taken(burst into laughter)..they are no good for you as beau or friends,leave them..i’m telling you what it should be(goes near Misty’s ears,wipes off her tears)...there(laugh)..Misty’s New Motto-> ”my Green’,exactly Misty Waterflower,that’s all you should think or may be anybody else cause you’re a chaste s.. but still ‘my Green’..say it ‘my Green’(laugh)...Sableye”
Misty(few moments later,much calm,tears profusely rolling down her cheeks,lying on the grass) : “i won’t ever ..ever (sobbing)..ever have you back then right Ash..(uncontrollably crying)..Ash..i..come back to me..(scream,tears,uncontrollable sobbing)..ASH(chokes,tears)..”
Ash(laugh) : “Sableye..i will only have you then right Green..Sableye...(bursts into laughter)...”
Misty(sobbing uncontrollably,few moments later) : “what do you want me to do,say it(scream)..i want my Ash..(crying aloud)...i just..(chokes,Bulbasaur sleep powders her)”
Ash(solemn 15 minutes later,Misty woke up 12 minutes later now in full cognition) : “why did you come here today and why were you telling me that you have a boyfriend and why this drama now?..Sableye..I DUMP AND REJECT YOU.may i leave or will you die exactly here and then your people later say i murdered a s.. who herself came here to be f.. around..(laugh)..why don’t you leave me Misty s..? why?..Sableye off...”
Misty(sobbing a few minutes later) : “you’re my soul i can’t leave you..(chokes)..”
Ash(frown) : “soul?(laugh)..Sableye..see this game now s.. lets play,so we now know that Misty is Green’s soul,Ash is Misty’s soul,someone else is Ash’s soul...but none’s soul is Green and Ash’s soul cherishes him..so basically what should happen is that Misty should leave Ash and go to Green,but she doesn’t..what does she do?..she is the unchaste wife of Green cause she is f.. with Ash in her mind all the time BUT claims that she’s chaste and also says ‘my Green’ but actually thinks ‘my Ash”...(bursts into laughter)..this is funny you know very very funny(laughs)..what a s.. your are Misty,what a s.. that too too chaste(bursts into laughter)..so basically you’re an unchaste wife cum chaste s..(laugh) and the moment before your future with Green if there’s alreay hasn’t been any which i seriously doubt(laugh)..that moment too ‘my Ash”..(bursts into laughter)..so your children too..so sad a life of a chaste s.. like you..once a chaste wh..ever a chaste wh..(bursts into laughter)..amusing chaste s.. you’re Misty cum unchaste wife..chaste s..unchaste wife double hall of fame(bursts into laughter)..and you youself has just accepted it by saying ‘my Ash’ return but sorry that i was .. by Green..really amusing(laugh)...(sternly)just leave me i’m sending you to your husband Green now,ok?..what do you say?...Sableye...”
Misty(dizzy,sobbing,few moments later) : “Ash you can leave me but i will die exactly here..”
Ash(laugh) : “bye(goes away)”
Misty(screams,sobbing) : “Ash..”(vomits,then almost faints but pokemons cure her)
Ash(returns and frowns) : "so still Green would get only a chaste s.. unchaste wife ? fine...Sableye...this is for you Green,just see how i break down this born again s.. infatuation with me..Sableye..see Misty s..,tell me when you were with Green why were you thinking about me?”
Misty(sobbing,trying to scream) : “i was ever with my Ash only,those p..(chokes)..”
Ash(laugh) : “Sableye...what about feelings for Gary Oak(burst into laughter)..Sableye..”
(sleep powder,18 minutes later,Misty in full cognition)
Misty(tears) : “Ash,i didn’t know what i was doing it was just(crying)...i cherish only you Ash..only my Ash..i cherish my Ash so much,so much,so much...and you..(uncontrollably crying and then sobbing)..i..i remember then and still now you..you always want me only..(sobbing..)..but because you’re so hurt cause i...(uncontrollably crying,screams)..Ash,COME BACK..I’m sorry..Ash..i just..(chokes,uncontrollably crying,vomits,pokemons cure her up)...”
Ash(frown,few moments later) : “Sableye..thought that my Ash is being found in every possible bed with innumerable s.. all at the same time each day so i better flee the scene and then Green was in Kanto league,Georgio and Roy was around,Georgio,1 grand conference champion out of 5,Roy extrememly good grass pokemon trainer himself,won many cups and all and alongside Harris is the most saught after for grass pokemon general training in a city like Cerulian...those were there but anyway,Gary Oak is there,one day just thought what if i kinda SEE what it is about Lillie who found it out that you were PRAISING her beau TOO much then you had a skirmish you realized the trouble as infact my Ash cause the professionality CHARMED you the part of Gary but you soon realized that it was infact my Ash only so budged and Lillie being who she is you’ve been a role model to Lillie most then Daisy and then INSPIRED a Mr Skechit of all people which is his illusion only cause he thinks that you’re like this so he also should try to be like as he is but infact it’s more of a other way around as i realize but anyway both inspired both anyway,Violet is like that ever but got some realizations form you that one also needs to settle down cause one can’t jump to everything whole life as even if the mind does the body just doesn’t permit cause it has a limitation and thus cut her activities down to 1/3 much better with Brock,who also got the INSPIRATION from you that infact a person like you must get a good husband like Green which is absolutely true anyway Brock also realized things from your life and then Violet VIA Brock has been much better stabilized now doing so well..so that’s for the young flower dream part now,so Gary Oak was tested that if he was my Ash or not in one day that in general you suddenly were too interested on his IDEAS on personal life and EMOTIONS but were talking in a general language he had absolutely ZERO suspicion cause first he is all ever about Lillie and she was with you all the time and then he ever knew that a s.. like you only thinks my Ash as loyal customer and thus never wanted to even look at you or be anywhere near rather was compelled to..anyway,Lillie sees this was extremely angry with you and then by then you yoursrself realized that your infatuation with my Ash was way stronger thus yourself budged and concentrated on professional s.. and thus cheating on Green(laugh)..tell me Misty,why are you cheating on Green with my Ash every moment in your mind..(burst into laughter)...Sableye...”
Misty(few moments later,profuse tears,sobbing) : “Ash..i’m..(watergun)..(uncontrollbaly sobbing,dizzy)..um..Ash..i..i lost my mind then Ash..those pictures i saw..i just lost my mind..i didn’t listen to my heart that you were so so true to me from day one..but Ash,i..i am sorry..but..i’m still your Misty..your Misty you..you so so sweetly used to call Mist...i’m the same Ash..i..i can’t..but then(uncontrollably cries)..you’ll say why i even forgot you for that bit and..i..(screams,uncontrollably cries)..ASH..I WANT YOU TO BE BACK..COME BACK TO YOUR MIST..ASH..(chokes,vomits,profuse tears,almost faints...pokemons controls her..sleep powde,19 minutes later in full cognition)
Ash(frowns) : “Sableye...still see that my Ash is the only loyal customer and so STILL the infatuation doesn’t go?sorry then Green,this kind of a supremely obsessive and infatuated chaste s.. needs more emotional torture till she becomes unchaste..Sableye...Charizard lets go to chaste Misty s.. unchaste poor husband Green,()..(trying to take Misty away)..what s..,come along,come on..Sableye..”
Misty(trying to hug Ash,sobbing uncontrollably,very mild voice) : “don’t leave me Ash..please..there’s none..(chokes again)..”
Ash(frown,lies Misty down on grass,Pokemons treat her) : “so,there’s none but me to look after a mad dying s.. who proclaims herself as chaste though has been too gleefully gave in each day and exactly right now wants to make me promiscuous cause none f.. her today and thus this chaste s.. who is f.. up day and night for 35 years and now has no ... left neither any GOOD,WARM,SKILLFULL,GENEROUS,GALLANT customers,hangs around for one more last and best and asks me to do the favour which is obviously looking after is as defined in the great w.. gospel of a s.. that too chaste(burst into laughter)...what a luck...Sableye..basically even you’re in hall of s..h.. and you’re proud of your s..h.. like m..h.. which is a bit discomforting ain’t it(bursts into laughter)...but you’re a chaste s.. so despite your s..h.. you expect your m..h.. fruits to be chaste..(bursts into laughter)..what a great s.. you are really Misty..what a s.. or is it none except ‘my Ash’?..which is your illusion cause sadly there’s many s.. but you’ve rather passed your prime don’t you think so Misty s...? but for a chaste s.. like you chastity is more important than your husband Green,besides the pictures your former beau Trace drew,were you and Green on the spot already(bursts into laughter)..why should i care for you Misty s.. why?..answer that first..i wasn’t the one to break-up,i wasn’t the one to invite Green to take my place,i wasn’t the one to shut the door,i wasn’t the one anywhere...(solemn)..see Misty s.. this is your last moment and all i want is to kill you cause you’re too chaste a s.. to get over your d.. infatuation of being f.. around by me all life and so please die or whatever but lets go to your husband’s house that is..Sableye...come on s.. what is a trouble hum?..(bursts into laughter)...such pity..sweet sweet Misty s... that too too chaste...(bursts into laughter)...besides i’ve insulted your m..h.. too..(bursts into laughter)...what a s...”
Misty(few moments later,uncontrollably sobbing,on the grass) : “no matter what you say..you..(scream,crying,Ash going away again)..come back...(chokes)...”
Ash(returns and frowns) : “i see,you 11 be attentive...lets finish it then Misty s... so we accidentally
bumped into each other and were friends but
within a month we knew it's not normal between
us in the first 7 days whole night you were awake almost beside me,i didn't get you properly then but you surely
were too devoted even at that age,i was your
dream you held onto me and whatever respons you got,got you through your early gym days,then i
finally realized your significance to me and
confessed my feelings,you were so happy despite
all the attention that you got then...Sableye.."
Misty(sobbing,a few moments later) : "Ash!why are you doing this still?..you..you just told me i'm your soul,but..does your soul too changes Ash..(loudly crying).."
Ash(laugh) : "of course (laughes), that's why i'm a
Playboy and not Palletboy..(bursts into laughter)..(Misty almost faints and convulsions restart)..(sternly) MISTY..(again hugs her and she vomits on
his dress again,and rest are all same,sleep powder but they talk again after 19 minutes later).."
Ash(solemn) : "Misty,this was 15 th in may be like 1
hour and your having convulsions,i know perfectly well the effects of all those poisons you were taking...but you see i'll only finish..so stay calm.. all psychic holders..get
working on Misty,NOW!..Bulbasaur ask whom you want to tender her..."
..(4 Minutes later)..
Misty(sobbing) : "Ash, please come..(sobbs uncontrollably)"
Ash(frown) : "where did you have lunch today?no
it's a serious question cause it wasn't in my
house,so if you vomiting 15 times is about that,then
god..."
Misty(sobbing,half shout) : "i can't stand this long
enough Ash,just listen to me without disturbing..and no it was at Lil's place..and it's ok.. that's not what it is.. it's just that..(bursts into tears)...
Ash(frown) : "() are now due cause you can't find
your NEW beau(hugs Misty but just for a moment
then lets go)..FIGHT!..and you were using 4 in total
for the last 4/5 months...anyway,speak now...
Misty(cries uncontrollably) : "just a bit.."
Ash(sternly) : "Stop that crying if you want me that
much,NOW!(Misty again lies down on the
grass,sobbing)..yeah much better,and don't
bother,that thing is well healed by sleep powder..
that's exactly why Bulbasaur is here as i had
sampled those form your room..Misty,you were
living in a self created hell while i had fun by s.. f..all around,no matter what happens after today
you'll be sent to Indigo Platue in Kanto Elite4 HQ and you'll cure yourself there till then unless your big b.. still
wants to sell you to h.. f.. while they enjoy the tips
like in GYM...the whole Elite4 all over will lick your
boots all you want as that's been my stern order to
them and be assured of it,at my current level,the
hall of fame is a mere word,it makes no sense as
you can see Bulbasaur of all has treated you like
any professional doctor and i'm still screaming my
head off to him,to which all he's saying that if it
goes out of hand he'll tell me well before,
Charizard,Talonflame all are ready,
nothing will happen to you today..and Lance
knows us both individually well enough or if he
doesn't,he'll be taught in a very harsh way and if
there's one fault in treating you and curing you
which has become an official necessity and thus
my intervention..i'll collapse the whole system and
they know it if they fail to treat those habits out of
you once and for all..so,just don't bother,that's my final word..alright Talonflame(takes Misty to his
private portion in the Lab,a very small cabin room)..(40
minutes later,Misty comes out of wash room she
had to go as the sideeffects were getting heavy on
her as she didn't have the doses of ... that day)..i
see, it's ok,Misty.. you'll be cured. Don't worry..come now..no the outside is far better,and take these(gives medicines)..yeah that's your doeses
much lessened(Misty bursts into tears,Ash
himself gives her the dose and makes her rest for
15 more minutes,finally Ash returns to the outside
with her and 15 more minutes later she is much
normal..now,Misty sobbs uncontrollably,Ash once
more quickly hugs her and pats her back,then lets
go of her)..so you see,as i was saying,despite our
confession,i didn't quite get your devotion then to
me and i thought you won't mind if i still live in
oblivion and don't really ever explain my actions
cause i kinda hadn't really got you, thought you
yourself live a life under constant public glare,you won't mind much and also that it's not that
difficult for you as you were in a gym,rather i was
traveling around,but I didn't understand i was the
central figure for all the things and persona in that
gym and rather than going away i should've stayed
there for a month,which i easily could do,but got it
opposite and thought going away is right then
broke up...but i myself was pretty uncomfortable
even after i broke up and then when i finally had a
grasp of things and realized how you actually
might've felt and also with my more balanced
attitude to the press,growing popularity,working
undercover in team rocket,all my studies and all in
Kalos and so on so on and i heard gossips in
places that Cerulian Gym and its leader Misty
Waterflower were a hot topic and a bit of an
elusion.i still didn't bother about it saying i've
broken up with you and your life doesn't matter so
my uncomfortability is similar to that if during our
relationship someone suddenly told me that Misty
is doing this and that,i felt a bit taken aback but i just shrugged it off as i thought being a Gym
leader itself is hard and people sometimes get
into overdrive with young and uniquely talented
women like Misty if they looked good and were in
the show or performance business like she is,so
just brushed them aside never realizing the actual
reason which i felt same must be for you when it
was found that indeed i was in all beds imaginable
all the time.After i got a grip of my personal life
and started to show the press what they were up
against to save my back,then only i've understood
fully your feelings regarding my
stubbornness but still
i brushed it off saying i'm just jealous that Misty is
just living her life then news started to come
around that you've become a bit creepy still i just
thought you must've had a rough time may be your
boyfriend broke up again and so on,i never
bothered about what i heard cause i had my ownthings to solve and in the meantime i completed
my full journey and then finally after Kanto Elite 4
victory,Lance told me Cerulian has become a
trouble and that you weren't behaving in a sane
manner,which surprized me a bit as i ever known
you to be a very tough and strong individual,so i
just casually told Lance i'm sorry to hear and so
on but then i suddenly saw a picture of yours and remembered that atleast you were my friend once and.."
Misty(tears..scream..) : "Ash! Don't stop me now i
swear!"
Ash(frown) : “i have a condition”
Misty(breaks down totally) : “you..you..(chokes sobbig uncontrollably,Ash quickly hugs her,pokemons treat her)”
Ash(frown) : “you have to say quote ‘Ash is my best friend’ that’s it..”
Misty(lying down on grass,crying) : “Ash is my soul..(scream)..no..i won’t say it..you..(chokes)..”
Ash(frown) : “Sableye..your idea that i can’t live without you as well and that’s exactly why out of blue i’ve returned after 4 years of absolutely no contact despite knowing what i’ve done in these 4 years and that’s not to use () and become a mental wreck,is a strange one Misty,this idea of yours that my Ash can’t live without me despite being proven glaringly wrong for 4 years atleast,that’s exactly my problem if you have something to say about it,i won’t disturb just spit it out!..Sableye"
Misty(sobbing,6/7 later,sitting against the bench Ash is sitting on,Bulbasaur helped her to sit like that) : "Ash,you had never forgotten me to
begin with,you never came into terms with
yourself just as me with our breakup,your self
denial didn't help you and only was irresistibly
trying to force you out of your oblivion that you
always have lived in since you were a kid and to
counter that you became more and more devoted
to your training and became more and more rough
outside then finally when you realized that you'vebecome a once only Pokemon Master after your
busting operation finished and you just totally
decimated a threat like that in an unbelievably
funny and nonchalant way, then came Kalos Final
that probably has become a household legend
now and even made a then obsessive creep like
me to have a moment of bemusement when you
won the whole tournament till final with
58 different pokemons of yours,who never did anything except fooling
around and laughing off challenger after challenger
match after match as if the challenger said no i
cant take it anymore it's so funny and
submitted...then Gengar..Sabrina fostered your Gengar as papers said but he was at an entirely different level after..Gengar did what he did till the 5th round of the final and it was again just death from laughter only for you to withhold him for the final 5 rounds of the final
and sending in Noivern who just about did nothing
except looking at them and talking profusely
whole match and topple 5 challengers as if they
were mere novices,as if they're having a brainfade
and saying we're going to get insane save us.."
Ash(laugh) : "why are you so concerned with my
past act..
Misty(tears,scream) : "Shut Up! i know who you
are you f.. brat! and if now you want to disprove
me then stay mumb."
Ash(laugh) : "you're swearing too,what a(Misty
cries out loud)..chaste s..(laughs,Misty breaks down again in tears)...alright,alright i'll stay shut(Misty lies on the grass almost fainted but pokeons cure her up)...Misty(hugging Misty and patting her back)..Misty,it’s ok(breaks hug),say i’m not distubing you..."
Misty(few moments later,sobbing) : “Ash,please let me finish ok,i’m telling you i’ll leave..(cries)..i’m telling you,but..(chokes,uncontrollably crying)..”
Ash(solemn) : “move along i’m waiting..”
Misty(2 minutes later,wipes off her tears,still sobbing) : "having won the whole league like that then you yourself
realized that you've become the only ever and your
intuition became a reality as none ever has won
718 badges all from hall of fame gyms in two regions one the hardest Unova and next the most untravelled Kalos being from Kanto forcing the leaders to go
toe to toe with him first and beating them in there own
game with severe type disadvantages like a Noctowl against Kyurem and that Noctowl i know too well created a gust to throw off the Kyurem this in Unova and in Kalos which is least travelled by Knato-Johto group..using Emboar,Typhosion and Solgaleo all i know very well and this line up as the previous one was was in a water gym at (),beating 3 opponents Jellicent,Golduck,Sharpedo..i know all too you f.. b..(sobbing)..whole world knows you antics and i was thrown these at my face no matter what due to my position..(uncontrollably sobs)..Noivern was later tested and there he spoke of abstruse things hard for even a human to tolerate and he is a dark dragon who can send anyone to his absurd levels and that day if you used only Feraligator,he alone would've laughed my whole gym off..and Feraligator was there to remind me
our battle over him when a Totodile all those years ago and still is roaming around here near me as you know in your bunch he was my good pal just like Bulbasaur and thus you’ve kept him today near me..you..you b...
(crying)..you f.. b.. you can't forget your Misty for one moment..(scream,Ash laughs but then stops)NO!..let me finish now b.. (sobbing)...you and your bunch probably is a fluke in history and i do realize that no matter what i'm talking..(cries,Ash asks ‘was your dose ok or need more’)..no it's ok,that dose was alright.. it's ok..and then your travel companion in Kalos named Serena,who had a big infatuation for you as a childhood hero and having seen you from close quarters what you actually were and that you weren't at all what you were trying to make others to believe couldn't suppress her emotions during
farewell and kissed you in a public sea port..(Ash laughs and then stops as Misty screams)..NO! don't dare to interrupt me!..(crying)..this infact reminded you that how someone you valued and trusted as a friend and little sister or prodigree could stun you like that,you suddenly remembered someone you were trying so hard to forget and if your previous disdain for your old friends weren't enough,this made you turn on the whole world so as to speak and you lost all faith in a good friendship that
won't end up in a breach of trust or remind you of someone you just couldn't forget..(crying)"
Ash(laugh and clap) : "bravo,a professor s.."
Misty(screams,crying) : "Ash! i'll kill myself if you conti.."
Ash(bursts into laughter) : "what bugs you not to do so...(laughs uncontrollably)"
Misty(shocked,tears,whisper) : “Ash..”
Ash(laughs) : “anyway,say what you were saying..”
Misty(lies down in the grass,uncontrollably crying and sobbing) : “kill me..just..(chokes)..”
Ash(grave) : “this infatuation for me Misty has been your life according to you,kill it off if you want to find the reality...(laugh)..but then again what’s there...(bursts into laughter)...recycling of mass of garbage..(laughs uncontrollably)... ”
Misty(sobbing,a few minutes later) : “Ash,please let me finish,please...i can’t stand this for long i’ll go totally lunatic..you want that Ash..(crying)...i just want...(uncontrollably crying)...Ash,please...(chokes,45 Pokemons tender her)”
Ash(few minutes later hugging Misty and patting her back just for a few moments,whisper) : “go on it’s ok,Misty,go on,your time hasn’t come yet,you won’t go mad or die..calm down..come on,continue...you were saying that i can’t forget someone...(lies Misty down in the grass,pokemons tend to her)”
Misty(few minutes later,sobbing uncontrollably) : “Ash,i just can’t take it anymore,just tell me whether you want me or not,that’s all...”
Ash(grave) : “mind the words,grammar and the answer carefully,the answer NO”
Misty(sobbing) : “any chance of being in’t(sobbing)”
Ash(sternly) : “a s.. like you should know the answer better who her customer would be who won’t unless she has forgotten her s.. tricks..(Misty cries uncontrollably)..Sableye...either you finish what you were saying or i’ll kick you out of here straight to greenary,don’t act like a f.. up s.. cause of f.. () if you were so proud of your fake life and fake Ash whoose image i’m breaking now...GROW UP!FIGHT!..or die like a wh.. out of convultion from being f.. up even while death...first thing i hear s... whoose your girlfriend how much guts she has from where is she..GROW UP!..it’s your life not my burden!i’m trying to make you erase your little infatuation for me OFF!...(shaking Misty vigourously,Misty profusely crying but due to Sableye and else can’t do much)..you tell me s.. you going to finish or do i kick you out to Green?(lies Misty down in the grass,Misty profusely crying)..Sableye..”
Misty(few moments later,crying) : “i’ll die here you f.. b.. go away but i’ll..(sobbing)..i’ll only want you..you..(chokes,sobbing too much,watergun)”
Ash(laughs) : “Misty,i know you’re not going to die cause i know exactly well what you were doing with your doses and what my bunch is getting now and thus you’ll not stay here alone one minute cause but going to find a new Green cause your family will be alerted and my bunch will send you to your family i can immediately leave cause i see it’s a wastage of time to try to cure a mad chaste s.. like you from an infatuation that she calls like and roams around like a h.. b.. to get and live that life...you know what s.. i’ll die may be today and you won’t what would you do then,huh?!? what?...GET A LIFE!GROW UP!FIGHT! Or just forsake everything and go to any s..h.. of your liking you’re a disgrace to pokemon world and in general as well..what value do you have to this world and can contribute to except getting a few customers for yourself to get f.. up and dream about your infatuation and think no matter how many are f.. me everyday i’m chaste,i’m chaste,i’m chaste because i’ve a dream that i’ll get f.. someday by a person whom i’m infatuated with..what sort of chaste s..h.. is it huh?...and you were talking about your former boyfriend never kissing you except so few times and the few times are 3 during my biggest mistake when i confessed to a s.. like you but yeah i was a h.. b.. like now then in illusion so understandable you got a coustomer anyway then during Frontier break you wanted to s.. with me each and every moment cause the gym was shut so no customers to satisfy your chaste v..  cause they thought each had their g.. inside your v.. umpteenth time now why suddenly one man is too preferred anyway then i desisted you and it was 28 days so then may be 35 times and then during Sinnoh break same attitude same thing then 28 days 45 times it was or 50 lets say 40 and 50 and then 3 and then once after Unova which i did being a h.. b.. that i’m so may be 100 times in 15 years 6.6 say 7 times in average so 7 times in 365 days for 15 years and then none in next 4 years(laugh)..that’s your list you see(laugh)..Misty s.. you became unchaste the day you first saw me and became infatuated with me and you have f.. around with me in your mind 48 times each day for 15 years and still still in the next 4 despite no contact that was the same hence just count only with me how many times you’ve become unchaste what to speak of your customers others and Green Jacobs of course and you say no i’m a chaste s..(laugh) ...but s.. you sure are Misty but still i didn’t unchaste myself actually except for kissing but i didn’t f.. you around atleast did i(laugh)..what’s your trouble is that ‘my Ash didn’t kiss me and s.. me for 15 years continuously’ that’s your actual problem i’m trying to cure you and i’ll give you my views as well it’s not my problem what you think about me but if you still want to give your view you will give it without being bothered about interruptions cause i’ll always call you a s.. cause that’s what you are...i’m telling you the LAST time,you were saying i can’t forget you and after a f.. s.. spat at my face i lost all trust in personal relationships cause either i’ll get cheated or get reminded of someone or infact i can’t be happy and so on,what makes you think so s..? why do you think i was doing what i was doing..give the answer or go to Green...Sableye...”
Misty(shivering voice,tears,few minuets later) : "this loss of faith in friendship due to the fact that you were constantly getting reminded of me whom you wanted to forget so hard or the breach of trust,made you turn on just about any long term personal relationships you
ever had and though you didn't stop making new
friends and all that,you wanted the whole world to
be only professional with you and not
personal,you resolved you'll only save that for your
pokemons and no humans,but no matter how hard
you tried to break anything and everything in your
way or holding you back not sparing even your
starter lab and childhood friends you just created
a purgatory for yourself and only self satisfied
yourself seeing that they couldn't keep any
personal relationships with you,those who realized
your attitude like Gary and few others among old
friends were spared all else were cut off or torn
off yet your natural warmth never left you and
those who were curious about this extremelysweet yet ferociously individualitic enigma that
just toppled the Whole Elite 4 like a dust particle
and who could turn any challenger's most trusted
Pokemon against their master and yet all he did
was to fool around and by the same way he had
defeated team rocket-they just couldn't help but to
adore you for your inherent simplicity, honesty and
generosity,the exact terms which made you insane
as you deluded yourself in thinking these were the
very qualities for any kind of relationship be it
even a deceitful one,and you realized since these
if were replaced with the exact opposites would
only end you up in the exact same position of utter
disdain for just about anything and your soul was
ever pure so you couldn't even think of those
either,so you just became always agitated with
anybody and everybody which went out of hand
when people wanted to mix with you personally
and then on the other hand you knew the Official
Tag of Pokemon Master Hall of Fame was
absolutely nothing to you nor was Team Rocket as you had reached a level that was once only and
that would make anything legal or illegal just
useless so Pokemon Battling world was over for
you and that level also made you disinterested in
battling or even bothering about anything relating
to Pokemon again as you were more than
satisfied and you never had the aptitude for
research and all cause you just didn't have to
know the intricate details as you got a holistic
view of virtually all Pokemons and realizing you'll
rather spend your life playing with them just like
becoming a Pokemon,but then your personal life
was in mess because you never could forget
someone no matter what you did,just like i
couldn't forget you and but your ever increasing
and now permanent obsession with never
rekindling any personal relationships and your
frustration with the mentally inactive life that you
suddenly was thrown into as you lost interest in
Battling or Research or illegal things,couldn't
commit to any long term personal relationships and most importantly as soon as you felt you
never could go back to your roots again due to this
self created barrier,you just turned on anything
and everything that tried to hinder you from
aimlessly roaming around the the whole world and
your life's goal became giving everyone a piece of
your mind and all the while showing them that
they didn't understand your internal pain which
you yourself never wanted to admit.(sobbing uncontroolaby,profuse tears,sitting up)..Ash,i know
what happened,you saw a picture right?"
Ash(laugh) : "Stupendous Lecture,really s..(Misty cries uncontrollably)...(solemn)..all right
don't tense yourself..the picture.(laugh)..well,your
right,that i saw a b.."
Misty(cry,scream) : "Shut Up!..um..no,Ash,don’t..(cries uncontrollably)..."
Ash(solemn) : "fine continue with this idea THAT YOU’RE A S.. and thus you WILL BE DISTURBED FOR LIFE MENTALLY..that you’re unchaste..alright,fine,if you can continue or else go to Green"
Misty(a few moments later,profuse tears) : "Ash,the b.. you saw wasn't a b.. to you at all,she was your own soul,very own self as well and that's why you suddenly couldn't control yourself when you heard everything about her and her equal plight since you broke up with her,her obsessions and her habits and all,you
suddenly realized that for all your efforts to forget
her you couldn't and now suddenly had to submit
to the realization that your only personal
happiness that you so longed for since that break
up and tried to find everywhere including among
the whole Pokemon species,was only being with
her and nowhere else,you were just blown away
with feelings after feelings and realizations after
realizations in a very short time span and now that
you realized her position and plight you really
turned on the whole world to just have a personal
talk with her,(loudly,sobbing,tears)THAT IS A DATE,and used all your
powers to snatch her to you.."
Ash(laugh) : "i care for no b.."
Misty(crying loud) : "Coward!you didn't have the
guts to straight ask the b.. whether she still longs
for you every moment(chokes,uncontrollably cries).."
Ash(laugh) : "i’ve only come to know that allegdly i’ve been d.. over for 19 years by an unchaste wife of Green Jacobs who is a chaste s.. named Misty w...(burst into laughter)"
Misty(crying loud) : "Exactly! Misty! now i dare you
f.. coward to stop me...IT WAS (spell)M-I-S-T-Y,Misty, that was it!it has always been Misty,when
it comes to your personal life all you ever knew
was only this one word and this one person and
anything else was impersonal to you...you..(chokes,tears).."
Ash(burst into laughter) : "so?"
Misty(sobbing) : “so,you’ve come back to her but torturing her beyond limits to know if she has someone else in her subconscious mind..(bursts into tears)..you..”
Ash(laugh) : “so by your logic it’s a mandate that i’ve to be with a s.. forever?”
Misty(scream,crying) : “excatly!..you(sobbing uncontrolably)..you f.. b.. you’ll always have to be with me..you idiot..your only mine and none else will ever have you..you..you’re only my Ash,my Ash!my Ash!my Ash!..you’re only..only mine..you’re..(chokes)..”
Ash(laugh) : “so by the same logic i should f.. you around all the time otherwise you won’t be happy?”
Misty(crying uncontrollably) : “Ash,please,just marry me..i can’t stay alive if you’re not with me and neither can you..please..i want that ring Ash,then if you want to leave me do,but i just want you,i want my Ash,i..(scream)..Ash,please just come back to me..please..come back..please..(chokes,profuse tears)..”
Ash(laugh) : “Sableye...so according to s.. mandate marriage means c.. inside a s.. v...(bursts into laughter)..Sableye...(laughs)..”
Misty(uncontrollably cries) : “Ash,please,whatever i’ve done done,give me a chance just..(scream)..just come back Ash,please...(chokes)”
Ash(laugh) : “and then s... you’re saying give me a ring then f.. around any r..s.. and you were the one saying i was promiscous...(laugh uncontrollably)...”
Misty(sobbing uncontrollably,profuse tears,a few moments later) : “Ash,I’m sorry,sorry,sorry..(profusely crying,chokes,45 pokemons treat her)..”
Ash(laugh) : “MISTY s..!MISTY s..!YOU’RE SO sweetie s..!(burst into laughter)...”
Misty(screams,and uncontrollably cries,few moments later) : “ASH!...i’m..sorry..Ash..please..just once..once..once more smile at me i’ll die after that..i’m sorry Ash..i’m...(chokes)...!”
Ash(laugh) : “Misty s..,for whoose smile did you shut that door..(burst into laughter,Misty about to cry out loud but Misty is sleep powedered by Bulbasaur,35 Pokemons cure her,Ash quickly but firmly hugs her then lets her go)...
(19 Minutes later)
Misty(sobbing,dizzy) : “..um..Ash...(water pokemons waterguns her)...(2 minutes later)..um..Ash i’m killing myself since that day and i wanted to reconcile then but then again i wasn’t sure,i just can’t be sane with you can’t stay alive,you saw what i was taking all to just forget you which i can’t..i’m so sorry i ever doubted you despite knowing you for 15 years and seeing how you behaved with me and others..Ash..i’m sorry but now that you’ve returned..just one chance Ash..i want to reconcile with you Ash..just come back..i will never have anyone except you who will understand me...i don’t want anything except you Ash,i tried so much but could’nt forget you..trying to forget you was also a mistake Ash,i should’ve been with you all knew your whereabouts during those finals..but just(uncontrollably sobbs and tears)..Ash..now you’re here so..Ash...please..just come back to me..come back..(screams,uncontrollably crying)..ASH!..JUST..COME BACK TO ME...(chokes,tears)..”
Ash(grave) : “Sableye...all you Psychic holders work on her following Sableye,Marshadow,Gerninja and Gengar...rest continue as you are,THIS IS SERIOUS...Misty you want me for your own self satisfaction and that’s why this trouble...i never had that view and now absolutely don’t...i don’t jump up and down like you are if you’re not there and this factor i thought ever that atleast you of all realize but now i see you don’t so i can’t help you on this...you want me for yourself as if i’m your slave and you’re the master...like a pokemon...but sadly i’m not..and hence the trouble...if you have anything to say calmly say,it’s all right you can say it...”
Misty(sobbing,few minutes later,profuse tears) : “Ash,i’m so sorry i hurt you like this that you’ve just torn apart every childhood memory and frienship and relations of yours...i just lost my mind with all happening Ash...that day a f.. b.. pestered me so much i just was so irritated and just lost my mind Ash,all were talking about how you’ve forgotten me with ego and all..just that moment(uncontrollably cries)...but i can’t express to you..i don’t know anything except you in personal life...you..yes i..i do want you for myself but you cherished me so much then but i lost you and now you will never again..ASH...(chokes,profuse tears,uncontrollably sobbing,again sleep powered)
(19 minutes later after Misty is in full cognition again)
Ash(laugh) : “only personal life is me professionaly you’re a s... and will be so right Misty w..”(burst into laughter)
Misty(few minutes later uncontrollably crying,sobbing) : “Ash..you..(screams)...Ash..i cherish you beyond any limit i know and always will and ever has...(profuse tears,sobbing uncontrollably)...i’ll give up my career everything..just come back Ash..come back to me..i’m Misty..i..i am your Mist,see..your Mist you..you cherished your Mist so much...i..i’ve ever been yours and you..(uncontrollably crying,scream)...ASH...JUST COME BACK...just..come back..Ash..come back..(uncontrollably crying,vomits,almost faints,pokemons cure her up)”
Ash(grave,some minutes later) : “Sableye...Misty at this rate with () abuse and inability to forget me you’ll become totally lunatic seeing me everywhere and just running in the streets asking any guy to f.. you saying ‘Ash...come to me sweetie...please hug me’...that’s your eventual consequence and you’re realizing that now most vividly as you saw me here and are desperate thus to get back to me once you’ve seen me,isn’t it so (laugh)Ms Misty Waterflower,Hall of Fame,Water Pokemon Gym,Cerulian City,Kanto(burst into laughter)...where is your hall of fame Gyarados,Jellicent,Tentacruel,Starmie,Golduck cause tou never gave them the chance but then where is your responsibility mask that gave you WISDOM,where is the great young flower dream Misty,where are they now(burst into laughter)...and most brutally Misty,in all this even when you become a mad s...  and roam around the streets telling anyone to f.. you cause to you they are your Ash,still your family would say you’re infatuated(burst into laughter)...where is ANYONE(grave) ANYONE WHERE IS ANYONE FOR YOU NOW? ”
(few minutes later)
Misty(sobbing,profuse tears,lying on the grass) : “Ash..just once smile to me..Ash,just once smile and call me Mist..just once..just..ASH..(chokes,profuse tears)..”
Ash(straight) : “Sableye...the reason to cherish another is the WHOLE trouble Ms Waterflower...and then expecting the return even if there isn’t any...why is it so Misty s.. that i find people can’t live even if they truely do cherish umpteenth number of people like as a you do being a chaste s.. and unchaste wife of someone named Green Jacobs,3 TIMES league champion your friend in school and so on and truely for no reason has cherished you SINCE THE AGE OF 13 so that never crossed paths sadly for you during our 5 years of travel companionship cause he thought THEN that may be a career is so important and of course it was hard to track us down he isn’t team rocket after all or is he in Team Magma,Misty Jacobs?(laugh)..see i know so many teams that are still running and will be running(burst into laughter)..Anyway,same age as mine and yours of course..used to sweetly blush whenever saw you..(grave)..you 11 be carefull.... so in school sweet sweet crush(laugh)..how many kisses then(burst into laughter)...1000,2000,5000,10000..(burst into laughter)..how many times did you two f.. around 12 times a day 24 times 48 times 96 times(laugh)..anyway,couldn’t froget the the sweet kisses of Misty in school to begin with of course(laugh) so lets go to the next phase first league Johto,round of 4 took 2.5 years,second was Battle Frontier round of 8 took 2 years,came back to meet you but you were with heinous Playboy Ketchum in Johto then,JUST missed you Misty s...,JUST,JUST,JUST(burst into laughter)... third was Sinnoh- semi final,2.5 years...then came back and was then obviously young flower dream was there but yet to get in the show just about but after that i unfortunately confessed to a s.. like her got roused up too much for new customers and the rest is known(burst into laughter)...anyway then went to Hoenn AND AND AND the magic of Misty young flower dream finally WORKS(burst into laughter) how many kisses s.. huh did that take or the f.. sessions did you p.. u.. things or not did you become p... did you have to a...(burst into laughter) anyway,so funny you know so funny anyway,Hoenn Champion took 2.5 years again when i was in Sinnoh again certainly did get a chance at your v.. and of course without the ... so again you became p.. and thus had to a.. cause you were a chaste s.. thus had to remain so for Tracey and so on anyway,then went to(laugh) goddamn Kalos(burst into laughter) Salamences did the trick there and Zygrade of course(laugh) still didn’t meet Darkrai,Zeraora,Heatran,Thundurus and so on(laugh) and that took 1.5 years tried but Salamence is no young flower dream the saviour s.. of the masses(bursts into laughter) so Salamences didn’t suit him ran away from there then came back and roamed around met Brock of all people obviously and yeah after many attempts to fix things at Cerulian of all places and all and tried to go to Unova still but as i said saw a few Salamances in Kalos that was enough so came back just as i was started with Unova,came back always a polite guy saw YOU ARE AN ONCE EVER DREAM BUT (spell) T_A_K_E_N(burst into laughter)..and Misty during that break from my Sinnoh to Unova you and i of all people knew exactly that we then in your mind was wife and husband how ironical(laugh) so definitely taken(laugh)..so sadly to break his and umpteenth other’s dreams was promiscous Playboy Ketchum as it had to be BUT he didn’t know who his challenger exactly was and THUS went to ORANGE,but sadly without you(burst into laughter)...hum,young flower dream,how’s the Jacobs dream going then...Sableye...”
Misty(few moments later,tears rolling down,lies on grass) : “Ash..if you will never want me again then why..”
Ash(stren) : “SHUT UP!SHUT THE F... UP W...!JUST SHUT UP!...PROMISCUITY,HUH?PROMISCUITY,INFIDELITY,UNFAITHFULLNESS...isn’t it...I WILL NOT DIE BEING ACCUSED OF PROMISCUITY BY A S.. WHO BECAME UNCHASTE THE DAY SHE FIRST SAW ME IF SHE WEREN’T BEFORE...NO!...you’ll feel every bit of promiscuity and the result of it in a sane mind and body cognizing every bit of it and THEN,ONLY THEN YOU CAN DIE,NOT BEFORE,NO!...ANY F.. B... THAT WILL SAY OR HAS SAID I AM OR WOULD BE OR WAS PROMISCUOUS WILL HAVE THE SAME FATE...i’ll die later with them but NOT BEFORE...I WILL NOT DIE BEFORE I KILL OFF ABSOLUTE EVERYONE OF THOSE WHO HAS SPAT AT ME LITERALLY AND METAPHORICALLY...’Ash..um..sweetie..one more hum..please..once..just once..Ash..kiss..hum..’...EVERY MOMENT I WAS WITH YOU...and you say you’re the greatest CHASTE s... YOU are no more than a mass of STOOL and URINE covered by falesh and blood and pus AND I HAVE NOTHING TO DO WITH IT..CAUSE I DON’T EAT MY STOOL...PROMISCUITY HUH? PROMISCUITY...’i..um..wanted to forget you’..and still you’re saying you’re chaste...(laugh,shakes his head)...Misty,do you have any idea of the life you’re living for 35 years?...and you being a s.. went onto call others so...(laugh,shakes his head)..well atleast my bunch didn’t call me that in Unova(laugh)...anyway,Mrs. Misty Jacobs,how are your kids doing(burst into laughter) ?...Sableye...”
Misty(sobbing uncontrollably,scream) : “YES I’M UNCHASTE!..(uncontrollably cries)...BUT ONLY ONLY WITH YOU ASH...only with my Ash..only my Ash..i want my Ash..(cries,scream)..ASH i just..(chokes)..but you(uncontrollably cries)..all those words blood,spit..so much disdain cause..i..(cries)..ASH,I’M SORRY,SORRY,SORRY,SORRY..i was just...ASH JUST COME BACK TO ME..Ash you..(totally breaks down,sleep powder)...
(10 Minutes later,Misty again in full cognition)
Ash(laugh) : “lets CHANNELIZE the apology then(burst into laughter)...all your ideas to live around here are CHANNELIZED to HIDE your soul which is A B...(burst into laughter)...and this very idea you’ll again channelize to get back at me or any other customer to sell your v... that ‘um..i’m Misty..can..we..um...have a kiss..’..(burst into laughter)...or if you are chaste soul but you’ll have this body and see so many sweetie sweetie lads and would become immediately unchaste(uncontrollably laugh)...so(grave) YOU HAVE NO IDEA OF ANYTHING...(screams)NOTHING!URINE AND STOOL!THAT IS IT!..(laugh)...so once you have human birth you channel to become a chaste s.. cause your soul is an unchaste w.. so basically you’re an ETERNAL W...(burst into laughter)..or in the viseversa every chaste birth would end up unchaste,even if single(laugh) cause you’ll have to know what is not chastity to be single(burst into laughter)..and you tell other people that you’re a great chaste woman...(spits aside)..that’s your greatest womanhood for me...(laugh uncontrollably)”
Misty(uncontrollably sobbs,few minutes later) : “ Ash,i can’t stay single cause i’ll always follow you even if you’re single..you..Ash..i so madly want you and always will..Ash,just don’t go away from me and i’ll not want anything else just once a day i want to see you and that’s it..Ash,don’t go away again..Ash..please..Ash..(crying)COME BACK TO ME(chokes,uncontrollably cries..)
Ash(laugh,after few minutes) : “let’s go back to your chaste husband Green Jacobs then(burst into laughter)...so he comes back but is shoved the Sinnoh trophy in his face by other admirers of your v.. thus he’s confused cause he knows how hard it is to get Sinnoh trophy first hand and then,THEN,THEN,TEHN(laugh)..he decides enough is enough goes to ORANGE,WINS THE LEAGUE,takes one and half more years to do that,then he returns roams around i was promiscuous of course VIA public gospel Chapter a Solgaelo Yveltal and Tyranitar’s once ever power means their master is a playboy cause he was being gentle and polite(burst into laughter)..Misty s.. do you have any idea what those 3 could do if i didn’t take those breaks at parties to have a chat with people about pokemons and then if people approached i was being polite that’s all...but those 3 with a Luxray and a Pikachu and so on were telling me to feed them each half moment a herd of 5 Zapdos’(laugh) had i so wanted Misty s.. Unova wouldn’t have had a single gym at all(laugh) anyway,then he was there then you shut the door(laugh)...i’m unsure whether you’re at all sorry for that(burst into laughter)..no,no Misty,tell me,why exactly did you TRY to date other people?I DIDN’T..why did you roam around different people(burst into laughter),I DIDN’T...(grave)...Misty,i’ve NEVER been promiscuous atleast cause my things were done afterwards when i didn’t have you in my mind at all but promiscuity well, YOU have been promiscuous cause YOU dated or agreed to date cause YOU WERE PROMISCUOUS as YOU HAD ME IN YOUR MIND AND YET YOU WERE THINKING ABOUT OTHERS..YOU WERE CHEATING ON THEM THEY WERE CHASTE YOU WERE UNCHASTE..simple as that...it’s by luck that i’ve been informed about your state and came back but you never bothered...NOT EVEN IN ELITE4 KANTO(burst into lughter)..they called you no i don’t like his behaviour he isn’t coming here cause you were at the same time on () and trying to forget me and 3 months later suddenly you see me and all over me..(grave)..i’m sorry,your apology or antics are no good to me,you see i’ve not cared about a fig about anyone INCLUDING YOU,so why should i be bothered about you,this remember just...ONCE THAT MISTAKE EVER THAT MISTAKE....so do you have anything to say then DISCRETELY TALK ABOUT GREEN,nothing else i’ll hear and i’ll leave if you don’t cause i don’t care,why didn’t you kiss him despite he so much wanting etc and of course all the stuffs and so on so what is the trouble that told you to agree to date THE MASS?”
Misty(uncontrollably sobbing,few moments later) : “those f..b.. were..those were not even men those...ASH...i want you back..ASH...COME BACK...(chokes,profuse tears)...(few moments later)Ash,i’m so sorry..i lost my head..i can’t live without you at all..just once more smile at me Ash..please Ash..please..ASH...just..ASH...(totally breaks down,uncontrollably cries)...”
Ash(straight) : “Sableye...MEN!MEN,MEN,MEN!..BUT ASH IS ALSO AMONG MEN THAT’S WHY OF COURSE A S... LIKE YOU WANT HIS G.. TO BE INSIDE YOUR V.. C... ALL LIFE SO MUCH BUT LET’S SEE who is Ash..who is ASH-URINE AND STOOL...no more...then may be a complex wave of all good qualities possible but what’s the point?only valid till you’re HUMAN....ASHHOOD...COUGH AND SALIVA hidden by warmth and gallantry(laugh)...BUT,THAT’S ASHHOOD FOR ME(SPITS ASIDE) AND MANHOOD(spits aside again)...Sableye...”
Misty(few moments later,scream,uncontrollably sobbing,profuse tears) : “NO!MY ASH IS NOT ANY OF THOSE...MY...MY ASH...ASH..COME BACK TO ME!...COME BACK...ASH...come back..(choke,profuse tears,vomits,uncontrollably sobbing,pokemons cure her up..etc)
Ash(some minutes later,grave) : “...Sableye...Misty,i had the ring that you so much are desiring now that very day you shut the door on my face...Misty,i’ll again leave you if my bunch wants me..yes,that’s why i left you then otherwise by logic i should’ve married you after Sinnoh,but that’s dishonesty to my bunch,i could’ve come back during Unova but that’s dishonesty to my bunch,i could’ve come back after an eternal s.. spat at me from point blank in public at Unova but that would’ve been dishonesty to myself cause i didn’t know whether for that moment i was cheating on you or not...whomever i’ve bedded all were after that not while i was with you...and i’ll do it again and again and again...i don’t care about people who can’t call me and i did call the gym once before leaving finally for my undercover...i was told that you’re battling,i said alright fine.cut it off...Misty,my number wasn’t changed,i never blocked anybody off unless they pestered me after i got a new number and all after undercover..but you never cared did you?...i went there with the ring in my pocket and i would’ve settled down for a full year then only would’ve been out and i would’ve been in Pallet so enough for my exercises with my bunch,then i would’ve been in Kalos WITH you,if you so wanted,then just the same..i would’nt have been in undercover atleast for no reason cause none of my dear friends mentors or family was involved atleast...i still remember the last bit Misty,’
“so that's it are you saying then Mist?"
"yes,and it's Misty,Misty,Misty,Misty..don't nickname me.."
"well,i guess finally won't see you again then unless luck would have it"
"hey!don't try that with me ok?you know what,i still have your trophies from Battle Frontier and Sinnoh why don't you take them with you.."
"so trophies are what it is then?you don't like me winning these trophies now that you think my goal and subsequent public eye has made me forget you?"
"so,you mean you only started to win since i left you?..do me a favour..just go away Ash,you've just lost your genuinity to me..you don't have any value to me anymore.."
"Mist..."
"LEAVE!"
(burst into laughter)...you started from exactly there today saying jealousy and then we moved on to trophies again but that day i forgot to say that you also have been more successful without me than with and thus thought FINALLY why bother just a prick after all i can bed anybody...so all those 4 years behind the VEIL of infatuation YOU too used me to get your skills right,all those time limits and cups and all...but then tolerated me till you could find Green and so thus YOU too have lost genuinity to me as well Misty...yeah i’ve been told that why leave the young flower dream for r..s.. but you know young flower dream,you left me cause you wanted someone like Green that’ll be around you like a pet licking your boots or more like v.. all life and be your subordinate...you wanted that more importantly,thus the IDEA of trophies...you’re the same as well according to your allegations that you threw at me that day,same stuff...double edged sword how does it feel now Misty Jacobs(laugh)...”
Misty(few minutes later,sobbing uncontrollably,profuse tears) : “Ash,all your hurt you’re sharing now i’m alright with that..but..Ash..i’m telling you now..just..just..ASH..JUST HUG ME ONCE MORE,SMILE AND JUST SAY MIST AND JUST ONCE MORE...(uncontrollably cries)..ASH...(chokes,uncontrollably cries)..”
Ash(straight) : “well i did that ages ago which has been my greatest mistake and thus today’s endeavour to cure you off the mistake that too committed and took part in,hence we both must rectify which i have now it’s your turn...(grave)...IF MY BUNCH NEED ME I’LL IMMEDIATELY LEAVE AND NOT LOOK AT ANYONE ELSE..WHAT’S THE GURANTEE THAT IF I DON’T CONTACT YOU,KISS YOU SHOW YOU HONESTY AND SO ON,THAT AGAIN THIS WILL NOT REAPEAT...I DON’T TRUST YOU AT ALL...Sableye...”
(Misty uncontrollably cries and sobbs,vomits almost faints,convulsions,sleep powder)
(19 Minutes later)
Misty(uncontrollably sobbing) : “Ash,i..i’ll die very soon i feel so..just..just know that i’ll still cherish only you till..”
Ash(laugh) : “Sableye...so,you’re a lier to that you said 2 seconds ago that you’ll still cherish me beyond death now it’s upto ONLY death and then will become only till next sweetie sweetie boy i see(burst into laughter) and then what you’re saying implies that you’ll die and not come back thus it simply is that i will be f.. any number of s.. per day(laugh)...Sableye...”
Misty(few minutes later,tears rolling down,lying down on the grass,sobbing) : “Ash..just those memories...”
Ash(laugh) : “not so fast s... that you’ll die here counting memorable f.. sessions plus reminding you that i never f.. you unless you thought it was me due to ()..(laugh)..the thing is that s.. that whatever i told you that day was true cause yeah i was promiscuous and all BUT the thing is that YOU never stooped to be the young flower dream and stop the show cause you were the gym leader and yeah you’ll say that it’s my passion(laugh)...look in the mirror Misty s.. then say,MY BUNCH IS BEFORE YOU and will be cause they know me far better than you despite not being humans and none at the lab tells me to comeback,they don’t accuse me of preferrence no never.YOU didn’t tell Lance that challengers were pestering you and then if Lance knew it then there is a provision which you know very well that the challenger will be warned before entering the gym and if still there’s offence,his badge will be rescinded and more hall of fames will be added and less time will be given and so on,YOU never bothered to stop them and yeah,so much were happening around me i lost my mind(laugh)..Misty who told you to not stop the show if it was too hard for you,who told you to take a break and ask me whenever i called that i want to meet you please halt there for a week i’m coming,YOU never told me ever that if you had a problem that was getting upto you seriously yes i never cared during Battle Frontier and Sinnoh cause i ever thought with name such things come but no not even once did you tell me that you’re having a serious issue no never then i go to Unova my bunch was going through a transformation and so was i and then I get into those situations and i just never bother and wasn’t impolite to people just like you were i never cared but THEN it was YOU who were too interested about the newses and all(laugh)...posing half naked you said right(laugh)..Misty the newes came to me scanning your body way more than any poses i brushed them aside yeah fine doesn’t matter,for 6 long years...yeah the public incident(laugh)...Brock was with me all the time you had enormus time surely you have kissed people in private behind my back haven’t you(laugh)...Misty get a mirror then try the apologies and yeah I DO NOT NEED YOU BUT I WANT MY BUNCH AND VISEVERSA i’ve been like that for 4 years and now all those sludges thrown at me ,look at my power now whole profession is just petrified by me any such worm who tries to pull stunts even if successful you youself seen what happened to then so that they were in tears to a random stranger like you,it’ll continue..they have to lick my boots all i’ll want i’ve just thrown eveything off Misty that’s all,your stardom,responsibility nothing can bind me anymore so how can you full of urine and pus..you can’t and thus look at yourself...i tried to change my approach to pests and did you never cared,young flower dream went on for 2 more years i was nowhere then was i? The whole world is actually taking you as the greatest chaste woman and i’m a playboy and i don’t retort despite knowing all cause i don’t give a fig as i know once i speak big they’ll again lick my boot it’s just this mask that you show people which a s.. like you would obviously do and are doing,so why was young flower dream,the dates and all going on?why has the gym got a hall of fame 8 months back? Has the pestering stopped that now you’re on () and your body thus isn’t the young flower dream anymore..who is there now Misty,(sternly)WHO except STILL me here who is there,(straight)for whom you had closed that door that day,is he here now?did he force himself in the gym and hunt your room and found () and then force you to rekindle your family relations?IS WAS OR WILL THERE BE ANY SUCH..Misty,you know best why i was with you and why the person you with whom YOU CHEATED upon me was there...this is why exactly you’re a chaste s... cause YOU can’t forget moments that I long have totally erased from my memories and thus you can’t forget me though i have and despite the fact that you’re a s...
Misty,i trouble is that a s.. like you is accusing me of promiscuity and did so while HIDING someone in a room and closed the door at my face...Misty,you’re whatever beau that there was would’ve been literally killed along with his bunch if i so wanted to...and YOU would’ve had the same fate then...just like you would’ve had the same fate had i found someone roaming around to challenge me cause you were his girlfriend and you can’t forget me..i found Green,i didn’t know him then but i did later the day we broke up as i told you he was there or a thousand such Greens were there with all their pokemons on that day 2 weeks back we gym battled that whole gym would’ve been evaporated ALONGSIDE YOU cause i had my whole 97 with me hidden and you have no idea what my bunch can do to anyone INCLUDING 1000 MEWTWOS...Misty,you’re talking about why i didn’t BATTLE you that day,you were too busy f.. with Green so that you missed my Unova final on TV you were in heaven of BLISS as you were beeing throughly f.. by Green without p.. then thus you had to have an ... so that he can go again at Kanto without any legal problems,anyhow if you saw that day you would never have wanted to battle ME cause there’s no chance against only my Pikachu cause he needs 3 minutes to evaporate all your bunch alongside you if i wanted him to..yeah you may say cause he can’t catch human emotions thus he wouldn’t ever know that YOU cheated on me thus you would’ve said that yeah Pikachu wouldn’t have battled me,but i would’ve killed him by my own bunch if he didn’t had you or your beau or beaus challenged me on promiscuity on that day when we had the show 2 weeks back in a PROPER challenge that your husband Green tried his hands at and very lucky he is that i’m not from Team Rocket...i can laugh your gym off immediately,Misty i don’t even need a pokemon to beat your Goldy,Gyarados,Jellicent, combined anymore cause they can’t cope up with me alone cause of my interpretation...then i have 97...by every means look where you are and where i am by absoluty every means not just skills and profession...look at you then say who needs who for self satisfaction,i’ve lived 4 years with my own bunch atleast,you’ve even rejected your own bunch for your failure in getting a beau..WHERE IS YOUR GENUINITY MISTY,where is it? I will leave you after today but you’ll die as i said no more and that’s just it...i may die but i’ll be happy with my bunch,you all alone even your bunch won’t care about you...that all for genuinity and i’m only getting started...Sableye off...”
Misty(uncontrollably cries and sobbs,few minutes later) : “Ash,just..just marry me and i’ll give up this f.. gym and tose f.. anyway they have ruined my life taking me away from you i don’t care about my pokemons either i..i just want my Ash..my soul..my heart..my life..my everything.(screams,crying loudly)..ASH..you..(chokes,uncontrollably cries)...”
Ash(laugh) : “Misty,you don’t even want your bunch and you’re a hall of famer(burst into laughter)...(Misty almost faints and Ash hugs her firmly pats her back,Bulbasaur sleep powders her and all)
(14 minutes later)
Misty(sobbing,shivering) : “Ash..”
Ash(frowns) : “Nivy,Talonflame take us to my room”
(Ash takes Misty to his room,she needs refresments and all)..
[after washroom and all,vomits once and all...
Misty sitting on the only couch lolling on it,there very weak,a medicine..some food..,25 minutes later]
Ash(frown) : “eat those up,none of the medicines before or after will work otherwise,not poison,i’m not foolish enough to kill a mad s..”
Misty(crying,sobbing) : “SHUT UP!..why are you taking so much care of me then,hum..just for one day..then..then...(uncontrollably cries)”
Ash(hugging Misty firmly,stern) : “...STOP THIS MAD S.. M.. BUSINESS AND EAT THESE UP!THERE’S NO POKEMON NOW AROUND YOU EXCEPT HOOPA AND BULBASAUR TO CURE YOUR F.. UP BODY AND INFATUATED MIND SO(loud voice) GET GOING!(breaks the hug)”
Misty(sobbing uncontrollably,crying,few moments later) : “i won’t eat,you...you’re giving me medicines to make me bear this torture even more before i die...(uncontrollably crying,few moments later)..you want to kill me then just kill me at once..you..(SCREAMS,burst into tears)...ASH..COME BACK TO ME(Ash shakes his head again and hugs Misty quickly)..(sobbing)..every time i scream now your pokemons aren’t there you will hug me and..(crying)..so gentely,so gently each time(uncontrollbaly sobbing and crying)...i won’t eat,i won’t take medicines,i won’t do anything(profuse tears)...you will do everything..you feed me by your own hands like you used to every time every time you came back to me then..you..(uncontrollably crying,about to scream)..A..”
Ash(frown,hugging Misty firmly,whisper) : “will you eat or do i send you to Green...(Misty tries to hug Ash,Ash throws her off)..(loud,stern)GET OFF! how many kisses,how many..”
Misty(uncontrollably crying) : “SHUT UP! I also don’t kiss stool and urine you..i only kissed my Ash that’s all..(uncontrollably crying and sobbing,profuse tears,few moments later)...and i will only ever kiss my Ash that too is all..you’re my Ash,only mine..you..you think i shut the door and didn’t ever think about you after that but..(chokes,profuse tears,sobbing,louud voice)...ASH..I DON’T HAVE ANYONE EXCEPT YOU COME BACK...you(dark gang is back and stopped Misty,Bulbasaur also is there tenders her,Jellicent in place of Gerninja)...”
(few minutes later,sends dark gang off,Hoopa,Jellicent and Bulbasaur remains)...
Ash(hugging Misty firmly,Misty also hugs Ash firmly,Frown) : “Misty,just eat these up...don’t make a drama just..”
Misty(same pose,whisper,deep breath) : “just listen Ash,please.Ash,i’m sorry,i’ve been for last 4 years atleast if not more and no Ash,it’s always ever you,i’m your Mist,has ever been and will be.Ash,i lost my mind then but i’ve been killing myself since and you can see what has happened to me cause i made that mistake,Ash,please come back sweetie,plea...(Ash throws her off scowling and breaking the hug,Misty cries uncontrollably)..”
Ash(frown) : “this is cheating of first kind,once you hug a dying person so give her a bit comfort to try to cure her and she being a s.. comes all over you cause she knew you once...Mist..”
Misty(screams,uncontrollably crying): “STOP!STOP THERE! You f.. b.. STOP RIGHT THERE!..(uncontrollably sobbing,loud voice)...i will always call you my sweetie cause you’re my Ash,only my Ash,only mine you are,and my Ash is my sweetie,only my sweetie,only mine,ALWAYS...(profuse tears)..i never knew what i was doing then otherwise i would’ve been there with you in Unova you..(uncontrollably sobbing)..and you should call me Mist,just that..call me Mist you f.. b.. and your sweeite is only me your Mist no matter what that i also know..i’m only your Mist...only your..(uncontrollably crying and sobbing,mild voice)...Ash..Ash...please Ash,you..you call me Mist and..and i’ll eat myself you won’t have to do that..please Ash..just..”
Ash(frown) : “Hoopa, she doesn’t move only cogitates,Bulbasaur get along with your job...Jellicent tell Nivy to fetch the whole dark group who were here just before absolutely now...Misty,i will not nickname a s.. who on phone told her poor husband while crying like a m.. w.. that she can’t kiss him cause she wants to s.. with another man who isn’t contacting her for a b.. session for which the husband was angry and RISKED HIS LIFE FOR YOU DESPITE YOU BEING AN UNCHASTE WIFE AND TELLING THIS ON HIS FACE...no,i respect the man more than myself,i would’nt have ever done it...yeah get on working you all...and his only fault was that he called you Mist(Dark gang is back and back to their work including Jellicent in place of Gerninja and now Hoopa is there as well,Sableye in main and then Gengar,Marshadow,Darkrai,Dusknoir,Spiritomb,Malamar and Confragigsus,Misty uncontrollably crying)...i nickname my travel companions others as well whoose names suited like Cilan is Cili,Tracey was Trace,that s.. in Kalos wasn’t nicknamed and none other’s who were there could’ve been nicknamed their names didn’t sound like that and yes Clemont i ever called Clem and still do so it’s just a matter of saying Mist rather than Misty cause Mist is easier to say and you were there for 5 long years so that was all...but what wrong did your husband do calling you Mist that day,hum?..i don’t see any...he only said in a final moment of emotion cause you refused a date crying like b.. BUT you confirmed it before..do you hear me(sternly)..he cherishes you more than i will ever do and yet you refused  to date him..let me see..he won Knato came back did find some works there and wanted to marry you but you refused cause you’re infatuated with someone else who had 0 contact with you for 4 years by then or with anyone you knew he never cared about your well being or whether you were alive or dead then cause to him you were stool and urine combined he didn’t care so anyway,to Green you were queen of hearts and i don’t understand this infatuation with CHOICE...why the hell are you so much interested to get me mingled with you i say now that we’re done but these medicines are important for you to find Green again,but if you don’t want to find Green again cause he came back from Unova and said he REJECTS you cause you were too infatuated with someone,then lets welcome Georgio and Roy but then again you don’t want to marry them but why,what’s the matter if Green said that Mist i cherish you so much for 20 long years what is the trouble with that that you sweared him left and right and then said he of all people has no manhood and all so he RISKED HIS LIFE FOR YOU,no matter my position,i could’ve snatched his career away from him and he would’ve been banned for life what would he have done then,huh?what? You couldn’t help him except giving him an official position that had nothing to do with pokmeons and yet had to hide it just like you’re hiding yourself from the world in that gym and using () to forget someone,if you aren’t an infatuated s.. then who is Misty,who is? So he risks his life but doesn’t get a thing in return which is sad for me cause he was a way better man than me...and you were discussing manhood with all people for 3 years or so,let me tell you that they were more than good they are not cheats like me Georgio and Roy accepted that Green cherishes you more so what your demand is to be called Mist was satisfied by him and THUS my deman is why didn’t you date him despite crying your head off that day that made the poor man jump in fire...(laugh)..Misty,look at my preparation to just spit at you and look at that man’s devotion...he went to play with fire at a place that he had no idea about and i’m a mythical name there whole region would’ve jumped upon him if i so wanted and i let him off because of you nothing more he said than that he was from Cerulian after all went over and i was about to hand him over to the Unova Elite4 HQ with the stern warning to the whole world Elite4 that either they snatch away his livelyhood or i will do it myself and hand him over to the press linking him with team rocket and another 1000 groups..THAT IS MANHOOD...eat these up get the medicines,get off to Green or if you don’t like him to whoever you want to..my duty is upto this that’s all...you all off,stay here Hoopa next time you don’t do a thing go out stay with Nivy previous role restarts...”
Misty(few moments later,uncontrollably sobbing,profuse tears) : “Ash..(watergun)...um..please i..”
Ash(sighs,hugs Misty,whisper,frown) : “will you eat now?”
Misty(whisper,sobbing,dizzy,profuse tears) : “i am not going to be alive for long Ash,just once call me Mist that will be..”
Ash(shaking Misty vigourously,frown,stern voice but low) : “FIGHT!YOU S..!FIGHT!this is cause you’re not taking medicines you m.. w.. ..JUST EAT THESE UP!(throws Misty off)”
Misty(lying down,uncontrollably crying,loud,soobing) : “NO I WONT!..I..(chokes)..”
Ash(hugs Misty again,frown,firm low voice) : “Misty you eat or i send you inside the lab and go away?”
Misty(sobbing,crying,mild voice) : “you won’t go away unless i eat and take medicines i know,Ash..just..”
Ash(frown,throws Misty off) : “i see,Bulbasaur vine whip bind her totally she sits doesn’t move her hands and will eat...Dusknoir get Sepreier in here(trying to feed Misty,few moments later,frowing at Misty)...eat...”
Misty(looking Ash,profuse tears,sobbing) : “everything you will..(Ash tries to feed her,Misty doesn’t want to and doesn’t eat,scream)..No..(Ash forces Misty but she doesn’t eat,Ash gets up frownings,Bulbasaur releases Misty,Misty uncontrollably crying)..”
Ash(frown) : “great,die here you..”
Misty(uncontrollably sobbing and crying,shout) : “YES I WILL!you cherish me this much still just becasue of those p.. you(uncontrollably crying,Ash going away,scream)...ASH..COME(dark gang stops her again)...”
Ash(returns,frowning) : “Misty,what do you want huh? What? i call you Mist then you will eat but if i call you Misty you will not eat and die here and then the whole world will accuse me of murder that is your want?..Sableye...”
Misty(sobbing,few moments later) : “I want you Ash i want my Ash to..”
Ash(frown) : “Sableye...Misty please eat these up otherwise i’ll have to end this conversation and send you to your family and get that f.. gym shut and snatch away the license as well if i show these stuffs to them and I WILL BE NOT SEEN AGAIN BY YOU AGAIN FROM THIS MOMENT...eat or be thrown off...Sableye...”
Misty(sobbing,few moments later,lying on the couch) : “i won’t eat you want to kill your Mist kill her still she will not not eat unless you call her Mist and feed her by youself..and your Mist will forever only cherish you no matter what you do..you..(uncontrollably sobbing and crying,loyd voice)..SO MUCH TORTURE,SO MUCH!ALL THESE CAUSE...”
Ash(frown) : “Sableye...Misty you must take the medicines immediately but before that you should eat these up..please listen to me..Sableye...”
Misty(dizzy,sobbing) : “i won’t and..(watergun)...”
Ash(frown,stern) : “Mist that’s what you want huh?..fine Mist is a s.. Mist s.. how..”
Misty(uncontrollably crying,sobbing,scream) : “NO!ASH..HOW CO..(sleep powder)”
(14 Minutes later)
Ash(frown) : “had your wish,now eat”
Misty(crying,trying to scream but can’t too weak) : “i won’t you..”
Ash(hugging Misty firmly,frown) : “i will not call you anything except s.. cause you are a s.. and now i’m taking you to you beloved family..do you listen or i call Sableye?”
Misty(few moments later,sobbing,profuse tears,mild voice) : “Ash..i..”
Ash(frown,makes Misty hug him,again hugs Misty) : “what do you want Mist s.. what?”
Misty(profuse tears,sobbing,mild voice,hugging Ash) : “why are you killing me like this Ash? I know you cherish me so much still and i’m sorry for whatever i did but Ash just give me another chance come back to me,please come back to me Ash,please..i will give up all these things and go with you wherever you take me,please come back Ash..please..”
Ash(frown,same pose) : “would you eat if i come back?”
Misty(same pose,sobbing) : “you feed me by yourself calling me Mist and sweetie then only...”
Ash(frown,same) : “i can but if you try to get physical you will be sent straight to your family and () are going to Elite4...decide and say..and if you want more than words and any future considerations after you finish eating then then that too will leave you with same fate..”
Misty(same pose,sobbing) : “you will not sewar me and will not link me with those...(crying,sobbing)”
Ash(frown,same pose) : “fine..”
Misty(same pose,sobbing) : “you’re ever my husband sweetie and i’m your Misty Ketchum for 19 years now..always am..you’re my Ash only mine..you..”
Ash(frown,breaks the hug and pats Misty) : “enough Mist,enough,just sit down,eat..”
Misty(sobbing) : “call me sweetie..then..”
Ash(sigh,frown) : “ok sweetie,sit down eat please”
(Ash feeds Misty by himself,Misty still cries and sobs but eats)
Misty(eating,still tears and sobbing) : “Ash,i’m very sorry for what i did that day for which you’ve become this much hurt inside and i’m suffering like this as you can see but please dear i don’t know anything except you,please come back to me Ash..please..”
Ash(frown,feeding Misty) : “that’s ok Mist that’s ok,you eat first we have ample time to discuss about things that you want after this and don’t talk too much sweetie you won’t be able to eat..”
(after foods are taken medicines are taken,Misty has to take a bit of rest)
Ash(frown,Misty lying down on the bed,tears rolling down and sobbing) : “you need all sorts of care,terrible condition you’re in,did anyone influence you and with all those psychic stuffs written in diary trying for a thoughtless less so that one certain thought doesn’t bug you and trying to use your Starmie and Golduck later added Jellicent recently who being a primary ghost type her nature itself refused but she isn’t alright i could see...Mist,please,just listen to this calmly you can see how many psychics i have only right here and what level they are at if their names themselves like Hoopa,Spiritomb,Darkrai and Confragigus don’t serve that purpose and i have many more like a Giratina and a Ultranercozma who came during undercover was there extremely abused and during undercover i had to use may be 20 psychics at the same time all diffeent and extremely powerfull and so rare and against the same type of opponents swelled up and then again you saw what i did to the best 3 of your bunch with a bug type of all cause i’m only too assured of what Heracross can do despite not being psychic at all and this again prooves to you than i’m not exactly at bay with the things that you were upto,just listen carefully,(grave) no process is there except bearing any repeatative thought out to it’s expiary by means of self introspection and self introspection alone and all else only will make sure that that very thought will elude you thinking you don’t have it anymore thus will continue to live in that very thought most of the times with each repeatation becoming more and more unbearable thus all the sanity will go when you can no more bear that mental pain and will become insane along with your bunch cause they can’t get human emotions and you’re forcing them to...(mild voice) Mist,please you don’t kill yourself like this giving up on your bunch most cause the whole world will be able to move on without you they won’t and Jellicent i saw isn’t at her best isn’t happy Starmie must’ve protested saw Golduck if was a human would’ve turned on you cause you’re mistreating him and putting him under trouble,these serve no purpose to anyone,just drop them immediately...”
Misty(sobbing,crying) : “no none influenced Ash,i just never knew what i was doing..you saw that sketch of ours Ash and took it away...couldn’t get rid of you no matter what just didn’t know what i was doing till you were back...since i first saw you Ash,it’s all just about you for 19 years sweetie..i don’t know why but you’re my life that much just i’ve learnt in this way due to my mistakes..Ash,i can’t live without you no matter what you say or think or think of me to be,just have a consideration that(uncontrollably crying)..Ash..why..(chokes,tears,sobbing).. ”
Ash(frown,hugging Misty and patting her back) : “we have time ample left today to talk about those things it’s alright take rest now,(sternly) but don’t try any stunts because i’m hugging you that will be it...”
Misty(hugging Ash,sobbing,tears,mild voice) : “it’s alright Ash, i won’t..but you..”
Ash(frown,same pose) : “we have time for these,will talk later,you need rest now,want sleep powder for 15 minutes?”
Misty(hugging Ash,sobbing,profuse tears rolling down,very mild voice) : “don’t go away dear just..”
Ash(frown,same pose,patting Misty’s back) : “fine you don’t need that but Mist,you don’t need to shut yourself out like that,they just didn’t understand our realtionship and your attitude towards me,i wasn’t contacting and was just trying to make arrangements for your marriage nothing more and themselves had big changes in personal life...there’s no point in doing these stuffs...give these habits up,your gym’s reputation is in absolute low ebbs and you know who are there in Kanto Elite4 below the topmost level which being governed by Lance and Simon is what hasn’t got the whole place to erupt and fall apart..Mist,you won’t be able to face them when they will come with all their might with and without the law if you’re in this condition and their first target is your starter Starmie to test her condition which i guess isn’t good and the rest will be made up and you know the rest...please get things sorted out there that’s your own home and your sisters have shares there don’t create unnecessary troubles and infighting between your own siblings you need them to get the gym back to it’s place and you need them to live your life and they need you always and you know your bond best and they are killing themselves seeing this condition of yours..just forget these psychic nonsense immediately..”
Misty(same pose,mild voice) : “no i hosted a family and close friends get together,we’re alright with it now i’m on vacation and that’s all but there’s just so much hazards Ash,i can’t take those anymore being alone nor do i want to and about the office it’s true i know it myself but Ash,i want you to be beside me gym or no gym...i’m there just for my bunch nothing else but no they never liked my attitude in last 1 year and more..i just want to sleep well on your lap that’s all never had that for such a long a long time except sleep powders,please marry me sweetie and i’ll give all up here,i will give up my share anyway just you marry me Ash,please..this is my only want nothing else,i just want you that’s all after you marry me whatever you do will be i just want to be with my Ash forever...”
Ash(frown) : “yeah,we’ll see,first 10 minutes more take rest...”
(Misty few moments later again have to go to washroom,and all and then after changes dresses that Ash had previously kept and all)
Ash(frown,hugging Misty and patting her back,Misty is crying a lot) : “ Mist,it’s ok,you’ll be alright just takes time to settle these things don’t worry but we should go back to the open now it’s more stagnating here..you all go back to your previous positions and same rules will be applied to each before you came here,Jellicent you’re relieved but Gerninja takes your place and tell that brat to be alert and not to drop her level now that she has got a bit of rest,Hoopa and Nivy stay, you too Bulbasaur...ok Mist,we should return but are you ok..
Misty(hugging Ash,whispering,profuse tears) : “i’m going with you only..”
Ash(frown,same pose) : “Nivy send Charizard outside,Hoopa you go back to your previous position and role Nivy send Charizard here and then do the same as you were doing outside..go..Mist we will go outside then again will talk only but our conditions end here i’ll not call you by nicknames or other certain words,mind that...”
Misty(same pose,profuse tears) : “ it’s ok but just to tell you...(chokes,uncontrollably crying)..”
Ash(frown,same pose) : “outside,we have time,please be quiet let those medicines settle down...”
(1:45 later,back to the spot,Bulbasaur back to his role like all rest,Charizard too)
Ash(Misty still crying profusely and sobbing hugging Ash,hugging Misty and then pats her back,pokemons tender her) : “Misty,it’s alright..you’ll be ok..i’ll tell them before i leave you today about your condition in detail but let me finish i’ll leave don’t...
(Misty tenderly kisses Ash’s cheek but he forces her away immediately,frown)...Sableye..(spits aside,Misty uncontrollably crying,sitting on the bench)..Jellicent watergun my cheek a bit...(Misty sobbing and crying uncontroolably,Ash makes her sit down on the grass,stern)..this is why..Jellicent off..this kind of a s.. attitude..(angry,stern voice but low pitch)..THIS IS WHY YOU CAN’T GET A HUSBAND..what is your trouble s.. huh?what? Call me Mist,call me sweetie..YOU ARE A S.. that’s it..Mist s.. or sweetie s.. or sweetie Mist s.. anything the thing is that YOU ARE A S.. that’s all...still trying to get unchaste if you’re already not...what is your trouble huh?...you s.. why can’t you get customers to s.. you whole day...why what’s your trouble..YOUNG FLOWER DREAM...that physical glaze totally evaporated now with () that’s your trouble..because of that you had customers but now there’s none..that’s your trouble..you have had customers beause of the physical beauty which is not present now so since 18 to 33 atmost you’ve had customers now you can’t and you have this drama that i want to get married finally to get a loyal customer whole life.You want to be married fine forget the f.. infatuation get married..simple..but you are a chaste s.. so you won’t.. What sort of a s.. are you huh?..Misty s.. this is the worst kind of s.. i’ve seen of heard of and you should be called a legendary s.. infact with your obsessive infatuation of being a chaste s.. you are an unchaste w.. since school your s..h.. tricks tempted many people and then later in your career...many many people has d.. all over you BECAUSE of what which isn’t present anymore cause your using () to increase you .. as after 18 years of f.. it has gone down a bit but you’re a s.. but can’t adapt to the new situation so too h.. and in need of s.. atleast for one week..you w.. WHAT WERE YOU THINKING?..didn’t i warn you s.. not to get physical i was just making sure that i don’t get charged for killing a mad s.. like you who can’t understand that who is her customer who isn’t...YOU ARE A W.. that’s why you could do what you did..YOU JUST CHEATED..you cheated on my moment’s trust upon you and you tell me to marry a mad s.. like you...I DON’T HAVE ANYTHING TO DO WITH W.. you s.. what’s your trouble huh? What.. that gym is a w..h.. that i realized the day you spat at my face and today just right now you spat at my face proving me right that CERULIAN CITY GYM IS A W..H.. and it hosts a hall of fame chaste w.. like you FOR 14 LONG YEARS..how many,huh? How many have c.. in you v.. each day for 13 years all those who asked for a date on which they wanted to s.. you whole day or 99% of them?..WHO MANY g.. HAVE entered your v.. tell me,tell me the f.. list you w.. cause you were trying to induct me into the hall of fame of MEN WHO HAS HAD THE FORTUNE TO f.. CHASTE MS MISTY WATERFLOWER s.. you are a f.. w.. that’s the end of it...Sableye..YOU ARE A S.. your gym should say Misty s.. is the gym leader beware she wants new customers to s.. her WHOLE day and THAT IS ALL...a s.. like you scale all heights of s..h.. to get people tempted cause you have not been s.. for long and those  blood is the proof that your..”
Misty(uncontrollably crying and sobbing,sitting on the grass) : “SHUT UP!..you..no matter what you say i know you cherish me so madly still still still(uncontrollably sobbing)..you..you won’t leave me i know that..(profuse tears and uncontrollably sobbing)..why do you care so much about me you..hum?...you f.. b.. you say stool and urine and..and for the same,same exact literal stool and urine so much care(uncontrollably crying)...kept fresh dresses for me,fed me by own hands,messaged my feet when i was almost out cold,made me take salt mixtures cause i’m crying so much and...and then..(uncontrollably sobbing)..you even cleared up all that and did everything so that i feel comfortable..(uncontrollably crying)... just as if i’m your own little daughter..and..and when i’m sleeping you’re hugging me and tending me so that i have better sleep that much too i know..(uncontrollbaly cries and sobbs,moments later)..you...you say anything you want but still so much care so much tendering like my own parents(uncontrollably sobbs,few moments later,uncontrollably crying)...you can’t live without me either...you f..b.. you can’t live without me and want me but so much hurt that you’re killing me like this and will kill yourself too i know that as well...you..(scream,crying)ASH COME BACK...you..just..(chokes,almost vomits,uncontrollably cries,pokemons tender her)...”
Ash(shakes his head,hugs Misty very firmly,mild voice,pats her back and head) : “Misty,please!please calm down Misty..calm down..don’t try to get physical calm down..let me finish i’ll myself go away,you have 31 years left in your career don’t forsake your bunch for a f.. b.. like me atleast..please..calm down..Misty..calm down..let me finish..”
Misty(crying,trying to hug Ash but Ash froces her off and makes her tenderly sit her on the grass again,uncontrollably crying) : "Now where's your hardman
devillish attitude,hum?..just as you see your pokemons can’t control my nerves anymore you yourself are hugging me so tenderly so tenderly..(uncontrollably crying and sobbing)..your Misty is your soul
and you knew it as well as the back of your hand
but only as an intuition,so couldn't really grasp
it...(profusely crying,bit loud voice)..NOW I,MISTY,am questioning you,that YOU
COWARD,(crying,sobbing)..why..why..did you just
not grab your b.. and ki.."
Ash(scoffs,stern voice but low pitch) : "MISTY!(Misty uncontrollably crying)..MISTY!,LISTEN!(sternly) don't
humiliate yourself to a b.."
Misty(uncontrollaby crying and sobbing) : "SHUT UP! why,hum?..Ash Ketchum,why do YOU care so much about YOUR Misty!..(uncontrollaby crying and sobbing)..i’m still still your Misty..(uncontrollably crying)...and that’s why even after all that you subjected her to go through today,still took the utmost care of her,and you can even interpret to the level when she needs to go to washroom urgently,when she’s feeling dizzy when ..(sobbing)..when it’s better if she can sleep a bit and then hugging her all the time just when your pokemons can’t control my emotions anymore and that..(uncontrollably sobbing)..such gentel hug as ever..you(sobbing uncontrollably)...why so much care..hum?(crying loudly)..why is it you're
just so attuned to her even after 4 years of absolutely no contact(bursts into tears,Ash tries to stop her)..No..i'll
say..you know your Misty as much as she
does,you and your Misty are same...even at
physical level you know everything about her
which only she can know..(sobbs)...your Misty is
your eternal soulmate forever,always(crying
loud)..you,you f.. coward you can even interpret
my every physical need just as if..(sobbs
uncontrollably)..as if mine was your very own
body..(sobbs uncontrollably).and even..and even
after torturing your Misty to all hells,still every time
you touch me..(sobbing uncontrollably)..so..so
gentle and..and caring..hum?..why,you f.. coward..you just can't be without your Misty..and after all you did to her all insults and all,still you think she's humiliating
herself as she may be is just being emotional and has...
(crying uncontrollably)..."
Ash(scream,forces Misty to stop by putting his
hands on Misty's mouth) : "Enough!(lower
voice)Just Enough! when you find a
husband,Bayleaf,Stop her hands..(Bayleaf
obliges)just listen,you HAVE to find A HUSBAND
to get out of your self created obsessive mess
and have a nice family and children,you should
forget me for good if you want to be happy ever
and so will i,but it's far easier for me than you
think as i've become famous now i can spent
every day with a new b.. which isn't applicable for
an UTMOST PERFECT LADY like you and Misty,i've
learnt the meaning of the chastity seeing only
you..(Misty tries to speak but Ash forces her to stop)SHUT UP!...Sableye...Crawdaunt,Feraligator keep her standing till you know..(Crawdaunt and Feraligator oblidges,puts his hands gently on Misty’s shoulders looking in her eyes,Misty profusely cries looking at Ash,stern voice but low pitch) it's only your friend's certificate for
your future husband..and so someone so pure
souled like you,should never even imagine to get
mingled with someone like me who intends to self
destroy himself JUST because he can and i didn't
try to grab you today for exactly that reason CAUSE I AM NOT CHASTE MYSELF..just that,think
carefully before you do anything and make sure
your children have a good life as well as your
husband, that's what i'm saying,don't get yourself
unchaste by trying to be physical with random people no matter who they may have been to you
once or has helped you today,they are f.. b.. and
that's there final identity.. your family never
understood your devotion to me,nor friends
ABSOLUTELY NONE!..AND WHAT THEY DID WAS RIGHT CAUSE WHATEVER I SAID WAS BECAUSE I AM NOT CHASTE ANYMORE FOR A LONG TIME NOW!..they are great people,your
sisters brother-in-laws and friends..what they didn't do for
me would've been done in case of Green,so you
must understand that..why they were so
interested to evsdrop us same reason..Ash
Ketchum was an immature,foolish,sweet,
infatuated boy,whereas you were the Water
Empress once only.. that's the TRUTH.. don't
mingle with this Ash Ketchum cause this one is an
Once Only utter selfiah b..for both yourself and all
around you,this Ash Ketchum is not who you think it is and is neither chaste nor a person with proper noble intensions either...why do you think i am talking about blood and urine and all huh? IT IS BECAUSE I AM NOT CHASTE MYSELF...FIND SOMEONE ELSE!GET
MARRIED!HAVE A FAMILY!..i'll let you go but if you
try to pull any stunts out of blue or scream or do
anything else i'll tell Bulbasaur to sleep powder
you and you will be sent straight to Green's
house,on waking up you will see Green not me,and
never me again..and don't try to faint then too you'll not see me
again,Sableye and all help me to calm her
nerves, Bulbasaur Sleep powder,just make her a
bit dizzy,Pikachu buddy,none comes anywhere
near us absolutely none! right get to work...(5
minutes later)...right,Now you're right,i'm
letting you go but remember the conditions.."
Misty(tears in her eyes) : "You wanted a clarification on our breakup right?"
Ash(Frown) : "yes,and that is we're done."
Misty(bursts into tears,hugging Ash,this time Ash doesn’t resist Misty) : "NO! you're not going
anywhere..you..COME BACK,Ash..just come back..i..
(chokes)"
Ash(breaks the hug but keeps holding Misty's hands firmly) :
"so you still want the reconciliation after all that i did to
you(Misty trying to hug Ash,tries to kiss him again,But Ash stops her)No! it's what h.. s.. do and you've got nothing to do with them.you don't need to taste or smell my cough and spit and mouth cavity,and get a hold on yourself,cut this stupidity!(Ash still firms holding Misty's hands)
Misty(screams,crying) : "Ash!(crying,low voice)either you'll be my Husband or i'll stay unmarried forever pestering you beyond all deaths..you..(chokes,tears)"
Ash(lies her down on the grass,laugh) : “so?how could i help you on this s..?i don’t want that,do i?...(laughs uncontrollably)...”
Misty(sobbing) : “Ash,please,none take this torture in human body and mind,please if i die you’ll not have me atleast this term..please,atleast for once hug me and i won’t say anything else..Ash,please..just..just once..(chokes,tears)..”
Ash(laugh) : “so you’ve given up your infatuation then?”
Misty(crying,scream) : “NEVER!my Ash..my..(chokes,almost vomits but pokemons cure her)..”
Ash(laugh,few minutes later..) : "are you sure that i've f.. only chaste Misty wh.. when i f.. around any random wh.. during undercover especially?(bursts into laughter)"
Misty(sobbing) : "Ash Ketchum,you’ve never had another girl in your mind cause you can’t and thus all your outbursts with blood and pus are that none is your Misty..(uncontrollably sobbing and profuse tears)...you only ever cherished me and still do so madly and thus you’ve and you'll only ever f.. around your unchaste Misty s..,your soulmate,first and forever travelling companion and the only girl you will ever have any kind of feelings for no matter where you are with whom and what you are,you're doomed to this inevitability.you can't forget Misty and..(sobbing)..today itself you're a demon and you’re just..you’re completely destroying yourself only to see if your Misty follows suit or not...you..you're just breaking
yourself up to find your real Misty as you..you know you
yourself are your Misty...and..i'm only trying to erase you off..I want to erase Ash Ketchum off...and.. there's No Ash Ketchum at All, it's only Me..I'm Ash Ketchum myself...you and me...Ash!(screams)..you and me are soulmates...yesthat's what you want..you wanted to show me today..only that...YOUR MY SOULMATE..you..and i...we're not different at all..Ash!(scream)...i.."(totally breaks down,almost faints,pokemons again get her up,lying down)
Ash(burst into laughter) : “LETS FOLLOW THEN(laughs uncontrollably)...what is soul and soulmate..you’re following your idea and suddenly you have some emotional shock and think that that’s soul and that’s soulmate...so you’re following a word or idea that’s not yours or you...and whatever you are you’re trying to describe your understanding of that in a way so you’re following...thus your soul is STATIC and you’re following around as separated from soul which you’ll not reach at all cause you’ll follow it only you can’t reach it cause you won’t know it as once you know you know it,means you’re only following your knowledge that you know it.(grave) THE MOMENT YOU KNOW YOU’RE THE SOUL YOU ARE NOT!..AND THE SOUL DOESN’T HAVE ANY MATES.IT’S ONE and ONE ONLY ALONE ONLY EVER ONE AND THAT’S IT!(burst into laughter)”
(sleep powder and all 14 minutes later,Misty in full cognition)
Misty(sobbing,tears) : “you’ll never come back to me and eternally i’ll have to bear this pain...(crying uncontrollably)...why are you existing then outside of me..you..you want to torture me only throughout life and that’s our relation...so you..and i will ever bear the pain..you will always do this..you..you..(chokes,totally breaks down)..ASH..(uncontrollably crying,Ash hugs her quickly,almost faints,chokes,pokemons controls her,sleep powder)..”
(19 Minutes later,Misty in full cognition again)
Ash(laugh,few moments later) : "Sableye..cause this is THE DECEIT MASTER,all these ghosts have fooled you,i've hypnotized you..(laugh)..and finally it is not even you but those f.. doses(bursts into laughter)..all this is hallucination,this sudden thought- that no emotion,no body Ash and Me,Me and Ash..soulmates..(bursts into laughter)..mere wordplay...(laugh)..soulmates..more lika a h.. b.. like me f.. a h.. s.. like you..(laugh)..soulmates...(shout)..get UP!..Fight!..find your real soulamte,i'm not what you think i'm..i'm Deceit Master, that's it..i’ve totally fooled you with my powers...GET UP!..erase your idea of Ash Ketchum off totally...don't fool youself ,go on
vacation take rest go back to the gym clear the mess get a
soulmate marry settle down have a family and a good
life...FINISH!..Sableye,off.."
Misty(sobbing uncontrollably,few moments later) : "and..and..my answer is whatever you are you are..all of it...this Misty you know is..also Deceit Master and the real Misty Waterflower is the real Soulmate of the real Ash Ketchum..i'll marry only you for eternity again and again..you f.. b.. i’ve projected you out of me and i’ll do anything i want with you no matter what you do to...i’ll follow you all the way around...but(cries)..you’re only creating me cause you just want to torture me and you first cherished me to..to torture me even more and you’ll never be mine in this life again...never call me Mist again...i’ll never have my Ash with me again..my Ash won’t come back to me again..my..my Ash..(scream)..ASH..COME BACK TO ME..Ash..just..just..(chokes,almost
faints,Ash again hugs her very quickly,pokemons control her,sleep powder)"
(14 Minutes later)
Ash(laugh,shakes Misty up Vigorously...) : "stupid b..!what were you fainting at?alright if you want me in this life then i'll admit 3 things and ask you a question.Agree?"
Misty(dizzy,shaking, can't stand,Ash firmly
holding her hands to make her stand,whisper) : "ye..y..yes"
(watergun,few minutes later later)...Ash..what..were..”
Ash(grave) : “missed it sorry”
Misty(simmering tears,sobbing,about to burst into tears,tries to scream,pokemons stop her and dark gang stops her) : “No..”
Ash(laugh,hugging Misty firmly and pressing his palm against her mouth) : "stop her movements only...(shakes Misty vigorously and quickly hugs her then holding Misty’s hands very firmly,Misty shaking and shivering sobbing and profusely crying)..alright Misty s.. if you want to be f... around all your life so so much by me then i want to admit 3 things and ask you a question....Crawdaunt,Feraligator,Bulbasaur,she stands but can’t make any movements and her hands are bound if i’m not holding them,you’ll know the rest...rest of you don’t do a thing unless i tell you to verbally,cut off and just stay here..so Misty s..”
Misty(few moments later,shaking,can’t stand,Ash honding her hands firmly to make her stand with Feraligator,Crawdaunt and Bulbasaur Supporting,looking at Ash,shivering,tears,sobbing) : “yes..”
Ash(laugh) : “but because you’re a s.. so can i add 2 more questions first(bursts into laughter)?"
Misty(sobbing,shivering,shaking) : "Ash,please..i.."
Ash(laugh) : "you thought i was about to confess how great a chaste v.. did i enjoy of yours s..(bursts
into laughter),what a great s.. you are and how much i’ll enjoy if i f.. you all day long here?..(laugh).. Misty s..,Misty s..,Misty s...this is why you're such a sweet sweet s.. all lie this s.. down..."
Misty(breaks down completely,lying on the grass,uncontrollably crying) : "what
more?(scream,while pokemons lie her down)..WHAT(sobbs uncontrollably,Ash bursts into
laughter uncontrollably)..but..um..no.
wait..(Ash about to go away on Charizard,scream)..ASH(cries)..please...No..
(Ash returns and frowns,Misty uncontrollably crying).. don't go
away,please,Ash,i beg of you,don’t go..(sobbs)..whatever you do,i'll...(trying to get up)..i'll..
Bulbasaur help me please(Bulbasaur helps her
up,Feraligator and Crawdaunt keeps her standing but doesn’t let her move,Bulbasaur keep her hands bound)..whatever you do i'll still come back infinitely many times...Ash,you..you're not going anywhere..you can’t...you..(sobbs uncontrollably,chokes)"
Ash(laugh) : "can i call you unchaste h.. s.. f.. with  Tracey?(bursts into laughter).."
Misty(tears,sobbing,loud voice) : "all you want you cheating f.. b.. f.. roads s.. i'm not..not going anywhere away from you..EVER..you f...b.."(cries)
Ash(laugh) : "good you're swearing too,so lets see,can i s.. you around whole day today chaste Misty wh.. you look so so s..
(bursts into laughter)"
Misty(sobbing) : "you have done infinitely more than..than that...and..and..i’ve only bedded you all time..you.(chokes).."
Ash(laughes) : "so you're not chaste then?"(bursts into
laughter)
Misty(shivering voice,sobbing) : "you're my
chastity...you're..you...(chokes)"
Ash(laugh) : “and the rest,the mind,gallantry,generosity,soul..”
Misty(sobbing) : “all you.only you.just you.i’m you as always i have been,i am or i will be..Ash Ketchum you’re nothing but Misty Waterflower and Misty Waterflower is nothing but Ash Ketchum”
Ash(low voice,smile,finally holds Misty's Hands firmly,Bulbasaur is relieved but stays,Misty
sobbing but smiles shivering,Feraligator and Crawdaunt keeps supporting her to stand but keep her from moving) : "First Admissions: 1.if i say your my soul i wont do justice to me.
2.if i say your my self i won't do justice to you.
but finally,and this (laugh) no Vulture,be it Cerulian or of any other goddamn breed(burst into laughter),can ever disprove,decline,do anything about or stop it from being or happening whichever may be more enticing to them on any given godforsaken moment,is the Reality that
3.If i say, Ash Ketchum and Misty Waterflower is in essence the one and the same existence,consciousness and reality but unfortunately appearing to each other as two different bodies,thus having to interact through a godforsaken world which is ultimately meaningless-i think i'll be closer to describing you(Misty smiles,profuse tears,sobbing)...What the hell are you laughing at f.. h..
b.. after having to go through the whole world and losing
every bit of your chastity...stupid s...?(laughs
uncontrollably)"
Misty(finally smiles,tears,Looking at Ash,holding his hands,still sobbing, shivering) : "the question?"
Ash(bursts into laughter) : "what the hell is it Misty s..
huh?!?still h.. to be f.. around and won't understand that these all wordplays are exact Deceit Mastery,hum?(bursts into laughter)"
Misty(smile,sobbing, shivering voice) : "i'm deceiving you
too,you stupid idiot buffoon jerk sweet sweet so cute..(broader smile,still sobbs).."
Ash(smile,holding Misty's hands firmly) : "now that the
goddamn world and this appearing difference,which
actually has never been,is never being,or will never be there eventually submerging into the glaring fact that Ash
Ketchum and Misty Waterflower were,is and will always be ONE which simply means that there never was,is or will be anything called Ash Ketchum or Misty Waterflower but ONLY ONE REALITY that is constant.But if it is to be interpreted and grasped through this nonsense world the ONE have to appear as Ash Ketchum and Misty Waterflower,that is Ash Ketchum is Misty Waterflower and Misty Waterflower is Ash Ketchum(Misty beams still tears) but they due to goddam bodies and world and sense faculties can't get this body and mind off thus appearing as two different entities and they happen to be in a situation where their relationship and happy passage through this terrible mess is best described as a term called(broad smile looking into Misty’s eyes) MARRIAGE (Misty looking into Ash’s eyes tears of joy,still sobbing,broad smile,shivering),so I,who is here appearing as Ash Ketchum is asking You,who is here appearing as Misty Waterflower,that will you liked to be called Misty Waterflower Ketchum(Misty beams,giggles and nods and still sobs a bit) or in short I,Ash tell you,Misty that if you want to be my wife,then you can hug me all the time(smiles and looks into Misty's eyes)"
Misty(shudder,giggle,looking at Ash's eyes, shivering voice) :
"with pleasure."
Ash(smile,still firmly holding Misty's hands, looking into
Misty's eyes) : "and the viseversa?"
Misty(smile,looking into Ash's eyes,still shivering voice) : "be my guest."
Ash(bursts into laughter) : "so i'm going to marry an
unchaste h.. b..?(bursts into laughter)"
Misty(broad smile,still tears) : "as you've been doing for
eternity.."
Ash(smile) : “can i leave you now Misty?”
Misty(smile,tears) : “all you want Misty.”
Ash(smile) : “did ever any girl including Misty Waterflower nicknamed Mist became Misty to me?”
Misty(smile,tears) : “there’s no Misty at all except you Misty”
Ash(smile) : “have i ever had any doubt that Ash Ketchum was not whom Misty wanted?”
Misty(smile,tears of joy) : “you’re both so no you ever had me inside you and me the same,the outside is just like..like..”
Ash(smile) : “Illusion(Misty broadly smiles,profuse tears of joy)but then who are you?”
Misty(broad smile,profuse tears of joy) : “my Ash,just my Ash.”
Ash(smile) : “can i be chaste unless i all the time try to mitigate the idea of difference within?”
Misty(broad smile,profuse tears of joy) : “no cause i’ll be pulling myself towards two opposing ends otherwise”
Ash(smile) : “if i have no idea of difference to the absolute i’ll be able to be single despite your presence here as will be Misty but if not then?”
Misty(broad smile,profuse tears of joy) : “Ash and Misty will forever no matter what come together”
Ash(smile) : “would it ever be that whatever i want Misty will do the opposite?”
Misty(beams,profuse tears of joy,shivering) : “neither..neither can i..thus..all this is..(chokes in joy,profuse tears,beaming)”
Ash(smile) : “a play between us(broad smile,Misty beams with profuse tears,shivering)...we might have been most contrasting in virtues and deeds or similar in both cases but does the world or our being matter at all if we’re ever in soul and all rest are so thus the whole world if i want will become me cause in soul there’s no difference thus all are most endearing culminating in the happiness of being myself cause all are me thus no need for any differece but even if i’m not recognizing myself as what i am in reality THE ONE ONLY and thus this IS a difference all are equally endearing as i can’t forget ever who i really am thus i’ll try to bring all differences together to create the unified figure who will be me and yet different form of me from the basic instincts to highest attainments i’ll be the same as that figure cause the whole world can be forgotten if i’m with that figure only or else the whole world is that figure to me thus whatever i mighte’ve done or did and so on and when i’ll recognize myself as that ONLY ONE inbetween the moment i’m different no matter where and how is there with me that figure which is the whole difference and still me which is my...”
Misty(beams,shivering,profuse tears of joy) : “my Ash,just my Ash,all my Ash...my Ash is everything ever no matter who and what i’m my Ash won’t leave me and just as i want i can have my Ash even if i don’t still i’ve my Ash and even if no difference still there is my Ash my Ash is me my Ash..my..”
Ash(smile) : “Misty(Misty beams in profuse tears of joy,shuddering and shaking)...i don’t have my Misty only if i’m that one cause then that word is me myself so my Misty is just me myself appearing as different if i’m thinking so and thus my Misty is the whole world(Misty beams in tears,shivering) the moment i’m different is my Misty as me the difference accompanying me till i’m again one when my Misty is that very oneness again i’m never not my Misty and me myself but here i’m appearing as this and my whole heart and soul is for only one and no matter what happened that is the one so there’s nothing that can be most endearing to including my bunch that isn’t the closest with whom i’m me that is my Misty only(Misty shuddering,beams in profuse tears of joy) which in broadest sense if a difference dearing or loathing to me ultimately is my Misty that is beyond the different ideas so nothing and thus the joy of me the soul is what my Misty feels whenever she wants anything imaginable and even herself which to her is me and in the same way when i want me is that it’s just my wife Misty and thus whenever my Misty WANTS I’m Misty’s...”
Misty(beaming,tears of joy,shivering) : “my husband Ash..the very idea of husband,chastity want everything is just my Ash..everything dear to me is my Ash so is me thus i don’t need anything but my Ash..my Ash is my all..just my Ash..just..just my Ash...”
Ash(laugh) : “if i never existed wouldn’t i still be your husband or anything Misty am i not the all culminating longing of yours thus Misty isn’t it so true that you’ve only ever known me as long as you’ve known yourself as different from the One the oneness of which is me now as difference to you only just for you and that’s that?”
Misty(beams,profuse tears of joy,shrill,shivering) : “I’VE ALWAYS..ALWAYS BEEN WITH MY ASH EVEN IN THOSE DAYS..EVEN MY MISTAKES IF EVEN I THOUGHT..STILL WAS MY ASH ONLY..MY ASH ASH..MY..(scream,joy,profuse tears,shivering)..ASH..(chokes in joy profuse tears)”
Ash(laugh) : “you’re doomed to this inevitibility(laugh,Misty beaming profusely in tears,shivering and shaking in joy)..(smiling at Misty, Misty beaming profusely in tears,shivering and shaking in joy)...there’s no mistake all illusion till the truth known digested and is lived in present the past doesn’t exist as was an illusion(smiling at Misty, Misty beaming profusely in tears,shivering in joy),the joy the sorrow whatever you’ve ever had throughout this and across how many goddamn lives and i as well every bit of it the difference to me is my Misty and to you is your Ash so the inevitibility is if you know that you have a mind that’s it your Ash will appear there absolutely cause all the difference is only the longing for the oneness but if so then has ever an object been most satisfying cause the longing is not for the object but it’s presence that is just the presence but if the object isn’t there at all then still the abstract presence would be there cause all objects place to place reminds the one singular presence that is me and that is my Misty so she is everywhere( smiling at Misty, Misty beaming profusely in tears,shivering in joy) so here in this life and gross way even if my Misty is single any joy or sorrow any kind still me only me ever me even when one..you might’ve been unchaste or whatever you might’ve been Misty as might’ve been me who is unchaste no matter what i or you did or didn’t every moment we were togethger and will be no matter what..my Misty is just me me just me and thus why can’t we stay single in this particular life my Ash ?”
Misty(broad smile,tears) : “cause we’re outside of each other now and..and now want each other as huband and wife..”
Ash(laughs and then smiles,still holding onto Misty's
hands very firmly,looking into Misty's eyes,Misty looking into Ash's eyes with tears and a huge smile,still shivering) : "all you WE’RE DONE(laughs at Misty  Misty smiles,tears,sobbing,shuddering) CUT OFF AND JUST LEAVE(laughs at Mist,Misty smiles,profuse tears,shivering) till i CALL you back...(laughs even more at Misty..Misty broadly smiles at Ash,sobbing,tears,all pokemons let her off and go away)...too many ideas all not you but heard,hum..(laugh)..date,husband,soul,best freind,boyfriend,soulmate,relationship,my dream,so sweet,cute,i cherish you,I HATE YOU,REJECT YOU DUMP YOU WE’RE DONE(burst into laughter,Misty profuse tears and broad smile,shuddering in joy)..none of your words all too many movies in school(laugh)...my words a r.. s.. wh.. b.. all everything is NEVER my Misty in a million years and eternity(laughs at Misty,Misty profuse tears of joy beams,sobbing shuddering)..cause i’m nothing but soul in reality and my Misty is my soul so my Misty is ME..(Ash now smiles at Misty,Misty beams with still sobbing with profuse tears)...
so without any cosmetics,attitude,intellectuality or privacy(Ash burst into laughter looking at Misty,Misty sobbs and beams with profuse tears of joy,shivering) but only as eventually,finally and ultimately here is ONE,the viseversa is TWO and once again like throughout
eternity,coming to me with the ever sweetest smile at Three(Ash broadly smiles at Misty looking into her eyes,Misty beams looking into Ash’s eyes,tears rolling down,joy) is my sweet soulmate and now my full two halves my sweet wife(lets go off Misty's hands
finally) Misty!"(both firmly hugs each other,Misty bursts into tears of joy again,both beaming)
(both keep hugging each other for some minutes)
Misty(hugging Ash very firmly,smile,shiver,tears,whisper,sobbing a bit) : "Ash!we just can't be broken!"
Ash(laugh,hugging Misty very firmly) : “as again we’ve been WOKEN(bursts into laughter)”
(both keep hugging each other for another few minutes)
Ash(hugging Misty,smile) : "not the body"
Misty(hugging Ash,smile,tears) : "neither the mind"
Ash(same pose) : "not even the soul"
Misty(same pose) : "just can't be defined"
Ash(same) : "if projected by me"
Misty(same) : "then it’s me as thee"
Ash(same) : "thus ever one forever"
Misty(same) : "no nothing else never"
Ash(same) : "in relation now you’re my wife dear"
Misty(same,profuse tears of joy) : "you’re my husband ever the most near"
Ash(hugging Misty very firmly,smile,looking into her eyes) : "so that’s one is seeming as two."
Misty(hugging Ash very firmly,smile,tears,looking into his eyes,little sob) : "that is how i am seeing me as you".(smile
and sob)Thank you Ash."
Ash(smiles,same pose) : "whereever i see a person of not my gender sends me back to my Mist only and Mist!Mist!your so sweetie!(Misty beams with profuse tears of joy and looking at Ash)....still no body ok..?"
Misty(sobbing,looking at Ash,giggle,then hugging Ash very firmly,Ash also smiles and hugs Misty very firmly) : "i cherish you so much Ash,so much..just you..forever..”
Ash(smile,same pose,looking at Misty) : “first of all YOU ARE NEVER THAT MISTY NOR THAT MISTY MIST IN MIST SWEETIE MISTY ILLUSION,CAUSE MY MIST YOU ARE JUST MY SWEETIE(Misty smiles looking at Ash,hugging Ash very firmly,profuse tears of joy,then finally both hug each other very firmly,they continue the same pose for another few minutes)...now the meaningless rest,already most of your doses are totally erased off and all cause they only creat the illusion but that illusion was reality your Ash is you so those stuffs are off(smiles at Misty,Misty smiles at him with tears)...just you and me that’s the medicine..for both of us..you don’t know anything about relationships or like that you only ever know your Ash,hum?(smiles at Misty,Misty beams  at him with tears)..so since day 0 can’t think that how can my Ash say that i’m not his my Mist and so finally somehow deluded yourself cause an illusion forced you to and all the troubles...MY MIST WAS EVER WITH ME...not one more word(smiles at Misty wiping her tears off,Misty smiles at him then both hug each other very firmly smiling)...had a doubt if i’ve deluded myself thinking i’m honest no matter what so a random brat and Misty Waterflower may become same...4 years took to know the reality through undercover where many terrible situations arose but each time scoffed off saying pokemons don’t read flesh and blood and i’m human so i don’t want to read a damn thing either that or anything else like soul and that was that then,cause i read only my soul which is my Ash and thus my sweet Mist(smiles at Misty,who smiles at Ash with tears,both hugging each other very firmly) then Kalos libraries and 3 lectures at 2 different places and then Elite4 finally a sweet picture of my sweeite(smiles at Misty,Misty smiles at Ash with tears then again the same pose)..my Mist is indeed my soulmate..in Unova all those didn’t know was confused,roamed around chewed up any b.. that came anywhere around including that one in Kalos..just was never never happy without my Mist but didn’t know who she really was cause of my own illusion that she was anything ordinary no matter the past..but then all this..my Mist is just me..my sweetie..my wife for eternity..straight came back,just had to share all these..sweetie you needed 4 years in 6 hours nothing else..you vomitted 23 times and then so much blood and all...all due to that effect,all my 19 year long mistake washed away that i had injected unknowingly in my sweet little Mist who doesn’t know anything except me ever and thus was yearning for me so much every moment and ever does the same..but all these and whatever is totally useless now so throwing away all..cause you should’ve come in ponytail(laughs at Misty,Misty smiles at Ash,still tears same pose)..i will marry you infront of everyone each second and that won’t have one bit of trouble in either me or you cause there’s not an iota of body and mind inbetween us and thus this world with it’s chastity and vulgarity and all can never touch us,thus those brats were evsdropping us themselves married now realizing(laugh,Misty broadly smiles hugging Ash very firmly little tears)..and i will do it no matter to what low or high you’ve gone what happened to your body if it’s worn out or totally brunt or today how much blood vomit just give me every bit of stool and urine and blood and pus imaginable you’re my Mist just that i don’t care about your body one bit and neither your mind or emotions deaf dumb blind totally paralyzed anything or just that you’re totally lunatic beyond any hope of any comeback ever till death you won’t ever recognize me feel the pain inside being lunatic when i’m beside you for 5000 years just give me everything cause i don’t care i know where my Mist is she’s right inside me that’s all and that very body or mind whatever if represented her for one moment will be my Mist’s body or mind currently so i’ll look after that as my own flesh and blood like my own little daughter till it worns out naturally still my Mist won’t leave me cause i can’t leave me and that’s cause MY MIST IS MY SWEET WIFE just that..(smiling at Misty, Misty beaming with little tears both hugging each other very firmly)..me and my Mist,soully unified once more as part of THE perpetual inevitibility..(both hug each other very firmly smiling)..”
(they keep hugging each other very firmly for some minutes,both broadly smiling) 
Misty(smile,hugging Ash firmly,whispering): "..um..so (broad smile)..after today we will always cheat on each other won't we?"
Ash(smile) : "all our lives,every moment,as usual.indeed"
Misty(giggle) : "i'm LUCKY."
Ash(smile) : "perfectly mutual."
(both keep hugging each other firmly in silence for some
minutes)
Misty(smiling) : "Ash,why did you steal my belongings from my room"
Ash(smile) : "literally or.."
Misty(smile) : "always both"
Ash(laugh, hugging Misty) : "it's mine actually(Misty beams and hugs Ash firmly)...but Mist,this is very serious,you must today itself right now come with me and we'll go to a doctor at nowhere(both giggle at each other)
on Charizard...you need checkup...come on..(arranges)"
Misty(smile) : "Ash,i'm alright.."
Ash(whisper in Misty’s ears,smile) : “exactly why i’m abducting my sweet wife(Misty smiles and hugs Ash)..(loud,few moments later)..sectant-psychomonus-lufter-psychonomic-subgenetion(laugh)..just a subtle body at too serious pace both of us(laugh)..and you namecalled sweetie soulmate just listen to the names hugging me as firmly as you can,hum..(smiles at Misty hugging her very firmly,Misty smiles at Ash and hugs him very firmly)..Giratina,Ultranercorzma,Dragonite,Zekrom,Garchomp,Rayquaza,Latios,Hyderigon,Reshiram,Yveltal,Charizard...Ultranercomza from undercover by herself(laugh,Misty smiles and keeps hugging Ash)..Bulbasaur sleep powder her”
(Ash takes Misty on Charizard with Giratina supporting Misty and Ultranercozma supporting Ash in half subtle body and Hyderigon and Yveltal does the other half and Latios supports Giratina and Reshiram supports Ultranercozma,Garchomp and Zekrom supports Hyderigon and Yveltal,Rayquaza binds their physical body with Charizard and finally Dragonite flies beside Charizard to keep any interference off)
(2:30 hours later after checkup,8:30,restaurant,private cell,only Ash and Misty)
Ash(laugh) : "if i ask you now,would you date me?(bursts
into laughter)"
Misty(laughs) : "no you're a stranger(bursts into laughter)"
Ash(laughs) : "so you date known people only then"
Misty(bursts into laughter) : "what do you mean?hum? you..(both laughes uncontrollably)"
Ash(laughs) : "means you'll date..."
Misty(smile, holding Ash's hands firmly) : "Ash
Ketchum,no titles just my soulmate....all the time as usual, eternally happening (both smile)"
Ash(smile) : "and who are you Ms.."
Misty(holding Ash's hands firmly,smile) : "not Ms.,I'm
Mrs. Misty Ketchum wife of her soulmate Ash
Ketchum"
Ash(smile) : "my sweet and Mistyvious pleasure (both hugs each other firmly for a few moments)"
Misty(smile) : "you just know everyone here don't you?"
Ash(laugh) : "Mist,it's just Safforn(both laugh)..you saw who i used(both laugh)..each a gem i’ll tell you novels that will entertain you beyond limits your ture medicine and why i am their soulmate as well(both laugh)..(Ash whispers in Misty’s ears)Trade secrect with only my sweetie(both smiles looking at each other then Ash whispers agian while they are hugging each other firmly) first the result in the gym that brat Snorlax told your poor Dosey can you express yourself without rage(both burst into laughter) Trade secret is had no intention of battling and you know they can’t battle if opposition is absolutely free of that sentiment no matter what with their master thus my results supremely intelligent just humans without the emotions and rest limitations battled so much mentally cause my lack of anticipation lead my Yveltal at bay against a Metapod(both laugh) scoffed at me first Crawdaunt poked by Feraligator and Chu’s attitude was that rubbed the other brats(both laugh)including the 9 from Kalos all know who they are inside out like philosophers perfect pokehappiness imaginable(both laugh) so no trouble 101 among 106 can’t breed cause they themselves heightened the intelligence and pokemonly happy by knowing their limitations to absolute so don’t care and there’s no fear of death cause they pokemonly knows the eventual and in one word they know what a pokemon is in gerenal sense so all same legend or kid(both laugh) i’m called master brat(both laugh) cause i was idiotic to tell them what to do(both laugh) thus hindering their progress(both laugh) during Unova each asked the other whoose your beau bring each brat together(both laugh) and as they were tendering you when you slept scoffed at me why are you two serious(both laugh) and why are we told be so(both laugh) so master brat still is the sweet idiot(both laugh) and their power like flamethrower is highest legend level cause they pokemonly know what it means so no restrictions due to their own capasity(both laugh) and thus now your whole gym together to my one Butterfree is substandard food(both laugh) cause Butterfree is the metaphysics master(both laugh) would show that he is opponent and the viseversa(both burst into laughter) yeah exactly as you’re thinking that brat at 3rd gen realized the soulmateship seen then(both laugh) and has become absolute 3rd class(both burst into laughter) gave up breeding power too happy world famous once only tested told the doctors why test yourselves are you not me(both burst into laughter) not again tested(both laugh) that whole ghost group were telling me that i was agitating you up to tell you not not get agitated(both laugh) cause they didn’t get the inbetween signals and was saying that you’re unstable and serious thus idiot(both laugh) and i was told at last that i made you agitated and all so that the final joyous moment we had was most engaging(both burst into laughter) that is that they are most vulgar(both laugh) but the sweetness is that they don’t have human emotions and themselves can’t breed all that beau counting(both laugh) is to toughen the mental battle and get under other’s skins(both laugh) and Mist you know my mind games and questions(both laugh) just rubbed each other on..abstract self aware beings that is soul having a body and mind of own just like us but the most perfect philosophers among us who are so happy with themselves don’t care whether alive or dead as that happiness with themselves are totally in the soul(both smile) as the mental battle got their body mind idea absoultely off and those who breed still show that similar attitude says even in season if i want them that it’s not that there’s not another(both laugh) so those brats just enjoying themselves so pester all and thus opponents even if they were greatest legends still if has an iota of thought of battling or anything other than just fooling around will themselves return to the ball dejected,Noivern as you know says i see battle this thought bugs you what is a battle thought what is a master what are his moods see at your age the issues yyou face(both burst into laughter)..he how came to me you know the reason is young leader was revolted out cause he said breeding season skirmishes just that blooming youth(both burst into laughter)..(normal)..so you see a lot went on(both laugh) and i’ve been here so many times,the Haunter came along then with Sabrina this Gengar’s mom and i had my Gengar before undercover Ultranercozma came during so Gengar is from here,my base and resting place before and for a little afterwards during undercover,72 plus hours constant at the forest before that spent may be 20 days in there in total later may be 20000(both laugh),just know everything including while revisiting 8/9 times that famous Haunterd arena(both burst into laughter)..and(whispers again,both hugs each other and smiling) only my sweet wife Mist Ketchum can beat me but totally and soully cause she’s me and my sweetie and so i’ll dissolve into her if she’s anywhere seen or not seen(both smiles at each other)..so hard it was to not hug you and propose you as soon as i saw you in the gym Mist hence the gloves(both laugh)..Dr Henry and Henry Care is among top 3 in the world and all that are given and prescribed are unique but for ACTUAL recovery and any other things,all you need is me(both smile)... that's all,rest falls mere wordplay.."
Misty(smile) : "Ash,i’m just..just so overjoyed to become your wife finally and formally..just with my Ash that’s me(both smile at each other)...and we're dating like 7 years later or more.."
Ash(laugh) : "in this term of life our first date was on the 7th day of our journey,19 very very long years back in Pewter (both bursts into laughter)...'don't go to the gym,you can't beat him,too strong','oh yeah,i'll show you','fine,you idiot,we'll see','yeah!fine!hey,pay your bill' "(both laugh uncontrollably)
(food comes,eating)
Misty(laughing) : "but Ash(laugh)..you knew my physical
needs like that(both laugh).. it's just..just so sweet(both bursts into laughter)"
Ash(laughing) : "just enjoy soulmate,no rush,besides i haven’t gazed you for 5 and asked every minute details for next 9 day and night for nothing(both bursts into laughter) BUT CONTEMPLATING(both burst into laughter)..eternally Mistified am i and so here in this form contemplating my Mistyvious dream looking at my Mistyfied soul’s another current form as my sweet soulmate my sweet wife my sweet flower my very own being that’s just my Mist(both smile at each other)..i know you as well as myself and as you do the viseversa Mist..(both smile)..totally different from anyone else of both genders..at the age of just 16 years both never knew you’re a girl or i’m a boy and your Ash is not bounded by anything to you ever you are ever just my Mist no bounds same as you do(both smile) so these trifle matters are automatically known as very own body so we know everything about each other(both smile)..your just my Mist..just that(both smile)..and my Mist’s presence and memories and all just her thoughts ever helped me to get the physical and mental age related issues sorted out(both laugh)..by the way all this gibbersih is a VEIL(both laugh) so why don’t i abduct you?..(both bursts into laughter)"
Misty(laughing) : "i will,next time you don't call me
names(both bursts into laughter)"
Ash(laugh) : “as i said one question then(both laugh)..added two more,you thought like ‘just f.. it same thing have to repeat again’(both bursts into laughter)
Misty(laugh) : “i would’ve pestered Lance’s head off and found you(both bursts into laughter)..by the way,hum Ash Ketchum?..this is your date with Cerulian Gym Leader hum?..(both bursts into laughter)..”
Ash(smile) : “there’s no such thing or person as gym leader,no titles(both smile at each other),you’re just my Mist(both broad smile),soully”
Misty(smile) : “souled”
(both share a quick hug again and returns to eating)
.......
Ash(smile) : "hum..how was the first ride,first date,first
dinner,3 in one,metaphorial and literal Dragon Types?(laugh)"
Misty(smile,hugging Ash) : "Ash..i'm just.. overjoyed.."
Ash(smile,hugging Misty) : "my bunch is as much yours as mine all for my Mist(both smile at each other)..and you need all the care you want but me first(both
beam at each other)..and you'll get it sweetie as will i(both smile at each other)...always,AS USUAL.."
Misty(hugging Ash,smile) : "Ash,just tell me all this,you've shown me what soulmate really means first hand Ash...but.."
Ash(laugh) : "yeah that f.. thing(Misty smiles)..why no f.. can touch that..(more laughter, hugging Misty very firmly)..if i've ever truely cherished anything,it has been from my soul because you're as if born to cherish that for absoluty no reason,like my love for Pokemons,like my love for my mom – if broken down further it can be seen i won’t be able to justify myself without my mom or my bunch or to be honest the whole pokemon world not just my bunch but any and all so by logic and studies,they are actually me and within me not outside..and I've ever cherished my sweet little Mist Flower so much,then my real Mist is WITHIN ME ONLY,that is I'm myself my
Mist..where would i go to search for her?(smile) so just
destroy myself and my Mist will anyhow appear if she really is my soulmate..which is I'm my Mist myself..i am Mist..and thus she never goes away...(smile,Looking at
Misty)..happy(laughs) soulmate ?"
Misty(looking at Ash,smile, hugging Ash) : "Soulmate"
(both again hugs for some time)
Misty(breaking the hug,with a broad smile) : "right.why don't you come back to the gym?someone has to look after it permanently you know otherwise we'll have to sell it"
Ash (solemn,holding Misty as she holds his neck) : "sell that f.. gym off i’m abducting my Mist flower(Misty bursts into laughter)"
Misty(smile) : "you can still come here.."
Ash(irritated) : "whatever,i'll give it a thought later,why don't we go home now?(hugs Misty very firmly)..i want to adore my sweetie for a long long time constantly now(Misty smiles and tenders Ash’s hairs,smile)..Mist,just so many years and finally i have my soulmate in physical form in this life(both smile)..anyway,you came at 11:15 now it's 22:30(both laugh)"
Misty(smile) : "Ash, I don't know how you managed to be mine despite you not doing anything at all like.."
Ash(smile) : "giving an insignificant bunch of garbage called a flower bouquet to dry up next hour to the eternal eversweetest flower of my soul who is my my soul?.."Never in a million years"..TWICE on SAME day(laugh,Misty laughs as well)..remember this phrase sweetie,hum(laugh)?(Misty laughs and  nods)..how i wished that very day i could understand myself and tell you(both hugs each other very firmly smiling at each other)..I didn't notice anything either from you,you and me it's just that anything else is unreal absolutely like saying i'm not living this life,i'm dead right now and so on,we don't have to get physical,mental,sentimental anything-naturally we're as we both agreed, 'same thing wanting to enjoy own self from two different bodies'"
Misty(hugging Ash,smile) : "what if we both were boys or girls"...
Ash(broad smile) : "we wouldn’t anything but husband and wife"
Misty(smile) : "this actually is your real strength isn't it? abundant faith?"
Ash(smile) : "pure logic(both broadly smiles) my strenght only is that i’m my sweetie(hugging Misty very firmly,Misty also hugs Ash very firmly and both smile at each other)..same as you,may be a bit more radical"
Misty(laugh) : "i still want to be a Gym Leader"
Ash(smile) : "of course you would be,after you hand-over Gyarados(both burst into laughter) but shouldn't we go home now?"
Misty(hugging Ash,smile,looking into Ash’s eyes) : "where's the rush Ashey-boy,hum?"
Ash(laugh) : “Mr Ketchum, ‘MAM!(both burst into laughter)..i said this very first day and then my eternal wife slaps me(both burst into laughter)..(Ash hugs Misty very firmly smiling and looking into her eyes,Misty also hugging Ash very firmly looking into Ash’s eyes smiling) my sweetie Mist flower..(both keeps hugging each other smiling for a few moments)..rush cause we’re surrounded by bushes(both burst into laughter)...and um no Mist,i don't want to face the Lab staffs today.."
Misty(bit concerned) : "Ash,you do owe them big time but(smile) hey all will be well i'm with you now,ok.."
Ash(smile) : "i would've had you then as well wouldn't i,Mist?"
Misty(a bit surprized) : "yeah..(then disappointed,but very
firmly broad smile)..yeah you would've,i can't forget you no matter how low you stoop to or how high you reach to Ash..you’re just me(both broad smile at each other).. you've got me all the way,ever(both smile at each other and hug each other very firmly for some time)"
Ash(smile,few minutes later,hugging Misty very firmly) : "that's why I took my chance,Mist...i knew my sweetie was all mine eternally as usual..anyone else,would’ve died right there in that f.. gym not my burden if a former with whom i’ve had absolutely 0 contact for 4 years the same with our other confidents and mutual friends so now all strangers and thus not my responsibility is a stranger that can’t get a beau..(smile)..(hugging Misty very firmly and smiling at her,Misty also smiles at Ash)..sweetie,i saw your face when you thought this all was to cut you off finally cause of my new girlfriend(Misty hugs Ash very firmly,Ash smiles)...see forever you’re like this my Ash..the first moment you uttered that word so much tears..Mist,i also know you by ‘my Mist’ ever,hum?(Ash smiles at Misty,Misty smiles at Ash with little tears)...all i needed to say yes for my girlfreind stop crying and get a mirror and you would’ve hugged me to death(Misty tears Ash wipes it off,both smile at each other)...you’re my eternal boyfriend,girlfriend,best friend all friends new,old,you’re my husband,wife,everything is you my Mist if but whenever we’re two..if not absolutely and happily single throughout life cause you’re in so no need all already fulfilled(both hugs each other firmly smiling at each other)..just and only my Mist(same pose,Ash again wipes off Misty’s tears,who beams at him,Ash broadly smile)..just to show you what you are to me..so,so much more than any words and ideas..that’s all..all my 4 years in front of you sweetie,so just you now,my Mist..(both hugs each other very firmly for a few minutes)...(laughing)but you still can't get over the fact
that how can this be but neither could i when i first realized but i just realized it we don't have to put any effort to be together,but you know this is beyond just this body and mental stuff and then only is it real fun thats why its what it is-a matter of one soul in two separate  bodies,not discrete at all.(hugging Misty)Mist,i can't describe soul in words,if i try as i showed i'll make it impure and i don't want to lose you again in the physical form either"(hug)
Misty(smile,hug) : "You never did Ash,you never did,one soul one body"
(both hug each other for sometime smiling)
Ash(smile) : "ok Mist, it's 22:50(both laugh).. let's go.."
Misty(smile,hugging Ash) : "as you say soulmate(both
smile).. but Ash,i(concerned,sad)..i vomitted.."
Ash(smile,hugging Misty,tendering her cheeks) : "soully(Misty smiles)..mere body,mere wordplay,merely my own vomit(smile,Mist hugs Ash and smiles)..i told you that’s how many you vomitted on my face thrice or twice do it million times continuously for next million years if i’m plausible with this body and mind as you the result will be same you’re just me..i’m with my sweet wife Mist...Misty..Misty..Misty..Misty...Misty..this name is reverberating in my soul eternally and discretely since 15 and that 1st moment i saw you on the 1st day of my career-for 19 years no matter what cause Misty is me my soul..you’re my Misty,my sweet Misty,my sweet wife Misty my sweet soulmate Misty,just my Misty...music,dream,yearning,being and soul-you my Misty whom i call my sweet Mist(Misty giggles and hugs Ash firmly)...come.."
.....
Misty(concerned) : "Ash,it was a bit too much.."
Ash(smile) : "Mist,if they've known me,i'll be the Ash that first came here 35 years back,just like my sweet Mist did no matter what(Ash hugs Misty firmly smiling at her,Misty also hugs Ash firmly and smiles at him) don't
bother come along"
Misty(smile) : "soully(both smile at each other as they walk side by side with their arms around each other, hugging each other )”
...........
